Deng Youzhou Taiwanese
I didn’t see the ancients before, but I didn’t see them later.
Read the world, let alone.
 
 
"Fight the Sky" Day silkworm potatoes
 
 
The first chapter of the Fallen genius
"Fighting force, three sections!" ”
Looking at the test of the stone tablet shining even some dazzling five characters, juvenile face without expression, lip angle has a self-deprecating, clenched palm, because vigorously, and lead to a slight sharp nails deep into the palm, bring a burst of pain ...
"Citis, fighting force, three sections!" Level: Low! "Next to the test, a middle-aged man, looking at the information displayed on the monument, was indifferent to the announcement ...
The middle-aged man had just spoken, and there was no surprise in the crowded square with a mocking commotion.
"Three paragraphs?" Hey, sure enough I expected, this "genius" this year is in situ! ”
"Alas, this waste really throws away the family's face." ”
If the patriarch were not his father, the waste would have been driven out of the family and left to fend for itself, and there would be no chance of being free to drink in the family. ”
"Alas, Xinian that smell Utan genius teenager, now how come down into such a shape?" ”
"Who knows, perhaps did something to the conscience, provoked the spirit to anger ..."
Around the disdain and regret to sigh, fell in that such as stakes in situ juvenile ears, like a root thorn mercilessly in the heart of general, let the teenager breathing slightly short.
The young man slowly raised his head, exposing a little delicate face, the dark eyes of the eyes of those ridiculed in the surrounding peer swept, juvenile mouth of the self-deprecating, seems to become more bitter.
"Are these people so mean?" Perhaps because three years ago they had the most humble smiles in their faces, so, now want to repay back ... "a bitter smile, Citis lonely turn, quietly back to the last row of the team, lonely figure, and the world around, some out of tune.
"Next, Chongmei!" ”
Listening to the test people's shouts, a young girl fast crowd ran out, the girl just appeared, near the sound is small many, a little fiery eyes, firmly locked the girl's cheek ...
The girl age is only about 14, although not stunning, but the childlike not off of the small face, but it contains a touch of charming, pure and charming, contradictions of the collection, let her success has become the focus of attention.
The girl hurried forward, small hands familiar touch the Dark magic stone, and then slowly close their eyes ...
After the maiden closed her eyes for a moment, the dark stone tablet lit up again.
"Dou Qi: seven paragraph!" ”
"Chongmei, Dou Qi: seven paragraph!" Level : Advanced! "
Yes "Listening to the results of the tester shouting, the girl's cheeks raised a proud smile ...
"Gee, seven paragraph of the gas, really great, according to this progress, I am afraid at most only need three years, she can be called a real fight person ..."
"It deserves to be the seed-level character in the family ..."
Listen to the crowd of waves of envy, the girl on the cheek smile is more a bit, vanity, this is a lot of girls can not resist the temptation ...
With a few sisters on weekdays, laughing at each other, Chongmei of sight, suddenly through the surrounding crowd, stopped in the crowd outside that a lonely figure on ...
Frowning for an instant, Chongmei still dispelled the idea of the past, now the two people, has not been on the same level, to Citis in recent years, the performance of adulthood, at most only as a family of lower-level personnel, and gifted her, will become the family focus on the strong, the future can be said to be limitless.
"Alas ..." sighs a sigh of relief, Chongmei brain suddenly emerged three years ago that high-spirited youth, four-year-old practice QI, 10-year-old with nine paragraph of the gas, 11-year-old Breakthrough 10 paragraph of the gas, successfully condensed bucket of cyclone, leaped into the family century within the youngest bucket!
At the beginning of the youth, self-confidence and the potential of immeasurable, I do not know how many girls to its Chongmei, of course, this also includes the former.
However, the path of genius, seemingly always twists and turns, three years ago, the prestige reached the peak of the gifted teenager, but was suddenly accepted to the most brutal blow in his life, not only the painstaking cultivation of a dozen have just condensed the bucket of cyclone, overnight, naught, and the body of the fight, but also with the passage of time, Getting weirder and less.
The direct result of the fighting's disappearance is that its strength is constantly receding.
From the altar of genius, one night fell to even ordinary people are inferior to the point, this kind of blow, let the teenager from being a distraction, the name of genius, is also gradually by disdain and ridicule replaced.
The higher you stand, the more ruthless you fall, the more likely you will never get a chance to climb.
"Next, Shang!" ”
The noisy crowd, the tester's voice, rang again.
With this some elegant name sounded, the crowd suddenly quiet down, all the sight, sudden transfer.
In the crowd of sight, a girl dressed in purple dress, is quietly standing, calm young Qiao face, not because of all the attention and change a bit.
The girl cold indifferent temperament, as if the Qing Lian bloomed, small age, but has the beginning of refined temperament, it is difficult to imagine, if the future grow up, young girls will be how the dowager ...
The purple dress girl, on the beauty and temperament, than the previous Chongmei, no doubt more than a few, no wonder the presence of all the people are such action.
Lotus Step Micro-move, called Shang son of the maiden line to the magic stone, small hand out, inlaid with black gold silk purple sleeve slipped down, exposing a piece of snow-white delicate hao wrist, then touch the stone tablet ...
Slightly quiet, above the tablet, the glare of the light again bloom.
"Fight the gas: nine!" Level: Advanced! ”
Looking at the font above the tablet, there was a silence in the field.
“...... It's nine, it's horrible! The first person in the family, I'm afraid, is not miss Kaoru. "After the silence, the teenagers around, are involuntarily swallowed a mouthful of saliva, eyes full of awe ...
Fighting the gas, each bucket of the road, the first step of the gas divided into 10 paragraphs, when the body of the gas reached 10, it will be able to pool the cyclone, become a respected bucket!
In the crowd, Chongmei frowned at the purple dress maiden in front of the stone tablet and flashed a touch of jealousy on her cheek.
Looking at the information on the stone tablet, the middle-aged tester on the sidelines is also a rare smile, to the girl slightly gong vocal tract: "Ms. Kaoru, after six months, you should be able to rally the spin, if you succeed, then to 14 years old to become a real bucket, you are Xiao House hundred years of the second person!" ”
Yes, the second man, the first, is the Citis of the aura of genius.
Thank "The girl nodded slightly, insipid small face is not because of his praise and appear joy, quiet turn over the body, and then in all the hot attention, slowly to the crowd the most behind the decadent juvenile before ...
"Citis brother." "After the young girl next to her footsteps, Citis respectfully bent to bend over, beautiful Qiao face, incredibly exposed to let the girl around envy elegant smile."
"I still have the qualifications to let you call it?" "Looking at the front of this has grown into a family of the most dazzling pearl, Citis bitter Way, she is in her own down, very few still maintain respect for their own people."
"Citis brother, before you once and smoked son said, to be able to put down, can pick up, lift put freely, is free person!" Shang smiled softly, slightly immature voice, but warm heart lung.
"Oh, free People?" I can only say, you look at me now, like a free man? And...... This world, is not belong to me. Citis self-deprecating smile, down-hearted the tunnel.
In the face of Citis decadent, Shang slender eyebrows slightly wrinkled, serious way: "Citis brother, although I do not know what is going on with you, however, I believe that you will stand up again and reclaim your glory and dignity ..." here, the little meal, the maiden white face, the first time exposed a faint crimson: " The Citis brother of the year was really attractive ...
"Oh ..." in the face of the Maiden's undisguised frankness, juvenile embarrassed smile, but did not say what, people do not merry in vain, but now he, really not this qualification and mood, lonely turn over body, toward the square outside slowly go ...
Standing in situ looking at the youth that seems isolated from the lonely figure, Shang son hesitated for a while, and then in the wake of the wolf dry jealousy, quickly chased up, and the young side and the line ...                                    
 
 
Chapter II the vindictive mainland
The moon is like a silver platter, stars are all over the sky.
Cliff of the top, Citis reclining on the grass, mouth in Diao a grass, slightly chewing move, let the faint bitterness in the mouth diffuse.
Raise some white palm, block in front of eyes, eyes through the gap in the fingers, looking at the sky on the big round of Silver Moon.
"Alas ..." thinking of the afternoon test, Citis sigh a sigh of relief, lazy back to the palm, his hands on the head, eyes some trance ...
"15 years ..." ... "the low voice of the quiet, suddenly without marginal from the mouth of the young spit out."
In the heart of Citis, there is a secret he knows only: he is not the man of the world, or the soul of Citis, is not in this world, he comes from a blue planet called the Earth, as to why came here, this bizarre passing, he can not explain, but after living for some time, He still knew after knowing to come over: he crossed!
As we grow older, Citis also has some vague understanding of the continent ...
The mainland is called a vindictive mainland, the mainland does not have the magic finger common in the magic, and vindictive, is the mainland's only keynote!
In this continent, the vindictive cultivation has been almost in the effort of countless generations, to the pinnacle of development, and because of the constant multiplication of the grudge, and finally spread to the folk, which also led to a grudge, and human daily life, become closely related, so, the importance of the grudge in the mainland, but also become irreplaceable!
Because of the extreme multiplication of the vindictive, but also led to the differentiation from the main line of a number of vindictive cultivation of the law, the so-called hands have the length, the differentiation out of the method of the vindictive cultivation, nature is strong and weak.
After summing up the statistics, vindictive mainland will fight Qigong method level, from high to low divided into four order 12: Days, ground, Xuan, Huang!
And each step, and at the beginning, in, high three!
The level of the practice of fighting Qigong is also the key to determining the level of achievement in the future, for example, the people who cultivate the middle-level intermediate gong FA, naturally have to be stronger than the equivalent of Huang advanced work law.
A vindictive continent, strong or weak, depends on three different conditions.
First of all, the most important, of course, is their own strength, if their own strength only a person of the level, that even if you are a high degree of advanced rare work method, it is difficult to overcome a practice of Huang gong law.
Secondly, the work Method! The same level of the strong, if your work law level than the other side to a lot of higher, then in a contest, all kinds of advantages, a touch both know.
The last one, called Dou Technology!
As the name suggests, this is a kind of play the special skill of the grudge, Dou skill on the mainland, also has the grade the cent, overall, equally is divided into the world Xuan Huang four class.
There are countless fighting skills in the mainland, but the general spread out of the popular fighting skills, mostly just yellow level, want to get more advanced fighting skills, they must join the sect, or the mainland of the vindictive college.
Of course, some rely on the adventures of the predecessors left behind the work of the law, or have their own matching bucket technology, this kind of work by the evolution of the bucket technology, with each other, the power to be more strong on some.
Relying on these three kinds of conditions, before we can find out what is the strongest, in general, if you can have a high level of fighting Qigong, the future benefits, it goes without saying ...
But the senior vindictive practice is hard to get, spread in the ordinary stratum of the work law, at most only Huang, some more powerful family or small and medium-sized sects, should have the law of the cultivation of the metaphysical, such as the family of Citis, the most top of the work law, is only the patriarch can be qualified to cultivate: Wild lion angry Gang, this is a kind of wind properties, And is the first stage of the middle of the bucket Qigong method.
Above the metaphysical, is the ground order, but this kind of advanced work law, perhaps only those transcendent forces and the great Empire, just may have ...
As for the order of the day ... It hasn't appeared for centuries.
In theory, ordinary people want to get advanced work law, is basically it so hard, but nothing absolute, vindictive mainland territory, thousands of people everywhere, the north of the mainland, there is a claim of great infinity, can be with the Beast soul of the Barbarian, the mainland of the south, there are a variety of high IQ of the senior Warcraft family, but also with the strange and vicious and famous dark race and so on ......
Because of the vastness of the region, there are also many unknown hermits, after the life has come to an end, the patient is withdrawn, they may be the life of the work of the law hidden somewhere, waiting for the fate of the people to take, in the vindictive mainland, spread a word: If one day, you fall off the cliff, drop the cave, do not panic, two steps forward, perhaps, you, will become the strong!
This is not a false, the mainland in recent millennium history, does not pan this rely on adventure and become the story of the strong.
The result of this story is the creation of a large number of daily waiting on the edge of the cliff, ready to jump the cliff has the most of the dream of the people, of course, these people are mostly broken arm broken leg back ...
In short, this is a miracle, and the creation of a miracle continent!
Of course, want to cultivate the grudge cheats, at least need to become a real bucket after, just enough qualifications, and now Citis distance, seems to be far away ...
Bah "Spit in the mouth of the grassroots, Citis suddenly jumped up, face ferocious, to the night sky to growl:" I do your grandmother, the old man through to play as waste? Grass! ”
In previous lives, Citis was just a very ordinary member of commonplaces beings, money, beauty, these things and he is simply two parallel lines, never crossed points, however, when came to this piece of vindictive mainland, Citis is the discovery of surprise, because of the experience of two lifetimes, his soul, even better than ordinary people on many!
You know, in a vindictive continent, the soul is born, perhaps it can grow slightly stronger with the age, but there is no work can be alone to cultivate the soul, even if it is the day order method, it is impossible! This is a vindictive continent of common sense.
The strengthening of the soul, also created a Citis of the cultivation of talent, the same, also created his genius name.
When an ordinary commonplaces, knowing that he has become the capital of countless people, if there is not enough certainty, it is difficult to grasp the heart, it is obvious that the past life is just ordinary people's Citis, and no such superhuman fixed force, so, after he began to cultivate the QI, he chose to become a spotlight on the road of Genius, Instead of growing up in silence!
If there is no accident, Citis may also really be able to top the genius of the name of the longer the larger, but, unfortunately, in the 11 years old, the name of genius, gradually by the sudden deprivation and genius, but also in one night, reduced to the road in the population ridicule waste!
......
In the roar of a few voices, Citis mood is slowly subsided down, face once again back to the loneliness of weekdays, and at this point, no matter how furious he is, is not back to the hard work of the fighting cyclone.
Bitter shook his head, Citis heart actually some grievances, after all, what happened to his body, but also do not know, weekdays check, but did not find the slightest wrong place, soul, with the increase in age, but also more and more powerful, and the speed of the fight to absorb the gas, than a few years ago the peak of the state is still strong on a fraction This kind of condition, all shows that their talent never weakened, but those into the body of the fighting gas, but are no exception to disappear cleanly, strange situation, let Citis dejected ...
Sadly sighed, Citis lifted the palm, the finger has a black ring, the ring is very simple, I do not know what material is cast, it also painted some vague lines, this is the mother died before the only gift to him, from the age of four, he has worn ten years, the mother's belongings, let Citis to it is also a sentimentally attached, The finger gently stroked the ring, Citis wry smile way: "These years, also really disappoint mother's expectation ..."
Deep vomit a breath, Citis suddenly turn over, to the dark Woods warm smile: "Father, you come?" ”
Although there are only three of fights, Citis's soul perception is much sharper than that of a five-star, who, in his earlier days, sensed the slightest movement in the woods.
"Hehe, phlogistic son, so late, how still stay in this above?" In the woods, after a moment of silence, the man's concern laughed.
The branches swung, a middle-aged man leaped out, his face with a smile, gazing at his son standing in the moonlight.
Middle-aged clad in luxurious gray clothes, Long between quite a bit dignified, the face of a pair of coarse eyebrows is added to its heroic, he is Xiao House incumbent patriarch, but also Citis father, five-star big Bucket division, Shan!
"Father, have you not rested yet?" "Looking at the middle-aged man, Citis face on a more strong smile, although he has memories of previous lives, but since the birth, before the father is to his own love, in his own down, love does not reduce the increase, so the act, but is let Citis willingly called him a father.
"Inflammation son, still thinking of the afternoon test?" Strode forward, Shan laughed.
"Oh, there is nothing good to think of, unsurprisingly." Citis adult versions shook his head, smile is a little reluctant.
"Alas ..." looking at Citis that still some young comely face, Shan sighed, silent for a moment, suddenly said: "Inflammation son, you 15 years old?" ”
"Well, father. ”
"Another year, it seems ... It's time for the rite of passage ... "Shan wry smile.
"Yes, father, one more year!" "The palms are slightly tighter, Citis calmly back, what the rite of passage stands for, he naturally knows very well that as long as he has passed the rite of adulthood, he who does not have the potential for cultivation will be disqualified from entering the arena to seek the right to fight Qigong, to be assigned to the family's various industries and to run some ordinary things for the family, which is the clan of the family. , even if his father is the patriarch, it is impossible to change!
After all, if you do not become a bucket before the age of 25, it will not be recognized by the family!
"I'm sorry, inflammation son, if in a year after your fighting gas up to less than seven, then father also had to reluctantly to assign you to the family industry, after all, this family, is not the father of a person to decide, that a few old guys, can at any time waiting for father to make mistakes ..." Looking at the calm Citis, Shan some apologetic sigh. "
"Father, I will work hard, a year later, I will definitely reach seven section of the gas!" Citis smiled and comforted her way.
"One year, four paragraphs?" Oh, if it was before, maybe it is possible, but now ... Basically have no chance ... "although the mouth is comforting father, but Citis heart is self-deprecating smile to rise."
Also very clear Citis the Shan, also have to sigh should be a sound, he knows a year to practice four paragraph of the gas has how difficult, pat his head, suddenly smiled: "Not early, go back to rest, tomorrow, the family has an honored guest, you don't lose the ceremony." ”
Guests Who is it? Citis asked curiously.
"I'll know tomorrow." "To the Citis squeezed eyes, Shan laugh away, leaving helpless Citis."
"Don't worry, father, I will try!" "Stroking the simple ring on the finger, Citis," murmured the head.
In the Citis rise of that moment, the finger of the black ancient ring, but suddenly lit up a very faint touch of the eerie light, the blink of an eye will die, did not arouse anyone's awareness ...                                    
 
 
Chapter III Guest
On the bed, the juvenile closed his eyes cross-legged and sit, hands in front of a singular fingerprint, chest slight ups and downs, a breath between the formation of a perfect cycle, and in the breath cycle, there is a faint white airflow along the mouth and nose, drilled into the body, warm the bones and the body.
In the juvenile when the practice of closing their eyes, the finger on the simple black ring, again a strange faint light, and soon quiet ...
"Shout ..." slowly spit out a turbid gas, juvenile eyes Chaijan open, a touch of Pak Mong in the dark eyes flashed, that is just absorbed, but not fully refined the fight of the gas.
"The difficulty of the struggle to cultivate the gas, is disappearing again ... I'm, I'm a damn! Shen Shen Induction of the body, juvenile face suddenly angry up, voice some sharp scold.
The fist was squeezed together, a long time later, the teenager shook his head with a wry smile, tired of climbing down the bed, stretching some numbness of the wrist and thigh, only three paragraph of the gas, he can not ignore all kinds of fatigue.
Simple in the room activities under the body, the room came out of the old voice: "Three young master, the patriarch please go to the hall!" ”
Three young master, Citis at home third, above there are two brothers, but they have been out of experience, only the end of the year, will occasionally go home, in general, two brothers to Citis this brother, is very good.
Oh "Casually should down, changed a shirt, Citis out of the room, to the room outside a green shirt old man smiled:" Go, ink housekeeper. ”
Looking at the young face of youth, the old man of the blue shirt nodded, turn around suddenly, the muddy eye, skim a touch imperceptible regret, alas, to three young master before the talent, I am afraid it should be a good fight person, unfortunately ...
Followed the old housekeeper through the backyard, and finally in the solemn welcome outside the hall stopped, respectfully knocked the door, just gently pushed the door.
The hall is very spacious, the number of which is also a lot, sitting at the top of several, is Shan and three of the elderly face indifference, they are the elders of the clan, the right is not smaller than the patriarch.
Under the left hand of the four, sitting in the family some of the words and the strength of the elders, beside them, there are some outstanding in the family of the young generation.
On the other side, sitting three strangers, they must be the last night Shan Mouth said the guest.
Some puzzled eyes swept over the stranger, three of them, there is an old man in white robes, the old man smiles, Radiant, a pair of some small eyes, but it is naked, Citis sight slightly down, finally stopped in the old man chest, heart suddenly a Lin, in the old man's robe chest, Impressively painted a silver light moon, in the shallow months around, there are dotted with seven of glittering stars.
"Seven-star big bucket division!" The old man is a seven-star big bucket teacher? It's vain! Citis in the heart of the big surprise, this old man's strength, unexpectedly than his father, but also higher than two stars.
Can become a big bucket division, at least is the name of the strong one side, that strength, will let any force flocking, and suddenly see a such a level of the strong, it is no wonder Citis will be surprised.
Beside the old man sat a young man and woman, who also wore the same white robe, men in the age of 20, handsome appearance, with a tall and upright figure, is very attractive, of course, the most important, or its chest painted five Venus, which represents the strength of the youth: five stars!
The ability to become a five-person age of about 20 years old shows that the talent for cultivating young people is also very unusual.
Handsome appearance, coupled with good strength, the youth, not only the family of some ignorant girls fascinated, is even sitting in the side of the Chongmei, the United States in the eyes of the eyes in the move toward this, is also a little splendor.
Although the girl's eyes, but this does not seem to appeal to the young, at this time, the youth is to concentrate all his attention on the beautiful girl beside himself ...
The girl's age and Citis similar, let Citis some accidents, her appearance, unexpectedly than Chongmei also to the United States, in this family, I am afraid only that is like Qinglian general son can compared with it, no wonder this man to the family of these rouge vulgar powder disdain.
The girl's delicate earlobe has a green jade pendant, a slight shaking, a crisp jade ring, abrupt show a touch of delicate.
In addition, in the girl that has begun to develop the exquisite small chest, painted with three Venus.
"Three stars, this girl ... If it is not stimulated by external objects, it is a brilliant genius! The heart gently took a breath of coolness, Citis's eyes but only in the young girl's small face on the little Leng was moved away, no matter how said, in his childish appearance, but also has a mature soul, although the Maiden is very beautiful, but he also did not xianxin show drooling pig brother to nuisance.
Citis This move seems to some let the girl slightly surprised, although she is not the kind of thinking that the world revolves around her girl, but her own beauty and temperament, she again clear but, Citis of this random action, it really let her a little accident, of course, also only this!
"Father, three elders!" "Trot forward, to the upper of the Shaw War four people respectfully to do a ceremony."
"Hehe, phlogistic son, come ah, sit down quickly." "Looking at the arrival of Citis, Shan stopped the joke with the guests, directed him nodded, waved."
Smile Nod, Citis just as did not see one side three elders to shoot the intolerance and faint disdain, back in the hall swept sweep, but is stunned to find, unexpectedly did not own position ...
"Alas, in this family's position, it seems to be really more and more low Ah, the past is good, now unexpectedly is in front of the guests to embarrass me, these three old undead ah ..." a laugh, Citis secretly shook his head.
Looking at the Citis standing motionless, surrounded by the young people, are unbearable to make a mockery of the sound, apparently very much like to see his appearance of making a fool of himself.
At this time, the above Xiao Battle is also found Citis embarrassment, the face flashed a touch of anger, to the old man next to frown: "Two elders, you ..."
"Cough, really sorry, unexpectedly put three young master to forget, hehe, I immediately ask a person to prepare !" By Shan stare of yellow robe old man, faint smile," remorse " patted the forehead, but in its eyes that wipe sarcasm, but not how much cover.
"Citis brother, sit here!" The young girl's faint laughter suddenly rang in the hall.
Three Elders Micro Leng, the eye moves toward the corner the quiet son, the mouth creep creep, unexpectedly is did not dare to speak again ...
In the corner of the hall, smiled and closed the hands of thick books, temperament elegant calmly, to the Citis cute winked.
Looking at son that smile small face, Citis hesitated for a moment, touch the nose nodded, and then in many teenagers that jealous eyes, walked past, next to her sit down.
"You helped me out again." "Sniffing the faint body fragrance of the girl next to her, Citis with a low smile.
a shallow smile, small face revealing cute little dimples, slim fingertips once again opened the hands of the ancient books, small age, there is a sense of beauty, blinking slender eyelashes in the book lingered for a moment, suddenly some faint way: "Citis brother has three years and smoked son alone sit together?" ”
"Uh ... Now the bacon is a family genius, it is not easy to want a friend? "Look at the girl some resentment of the smooth side face, Shintikan laughed."
"When smoked four to six years old, every night someone slipped into my room, and then with a very clumsy technique and not a strong fight of the gas, warm my bones and meridians, each time to make their own sweating, just tired away, Citis brother, you say, he will be? "Smoked son silent a long while, suddenly of overdo, to the Citis smile, the girl's unique amorous feelings, let the youth around the eyes some light."
"Cough ... Me, how do I know? So small, we are still crawling on the ground, I know. "Heart of a jump, Citis smile Two, and soon some guilty will look to the hall."
"Xi hee ..." Looking at the reaction of Citis, small mouth has a soft smile, the eyes transferred to the book, the mouth seems to be from Nan-like light way: "Although know he is well-intentioned, can be smoked no matter how to say is also a girl?" Which has secretly touched the truth of the girl's body, if smoked son found that person, hum ...
The corners of the mouth cracked, Citis heart some guilty, eyes, nasal view, Buyanbuyu ...                                        
 
 
Zhang IV
In the hall , Shan and three elders , are quite eager to talk with the stranger , but the old man seems to have something to be ashamed of the general , often to the mouth of words ,will be some helpless to swallow back ,and whenever this time , side of the delicate girl , are unbearable to cross the old man one eye ...
Listened listened for a while, Citis is some silly shook his head.
"Citis brother, do you know their identity?" "In Citis bored to want to doze, the side of the smoked son, the fiber refers to turn the quaint page again, sideways smile way."
"You know?" Curiously, Citis asked, startled.
"See the Silver Sword on the cuffs of their robes?" "A slight smile, smoked son way."
Oh "Heart a move, Citis eyes turn to three people cuff, really is found a cloud shape silver sword."
"Are they" cloud LAN? "he said. Citis whispered in astonishment.
Although not out of the experience, however, Citis in some books but read about the sword School, Xiao House the city named Utan, Utan subordinate to the Ugama Empire, although this city because of the terrain of the Warcraft mountains, and among the big cities into the empire, but only in the seat.
Citis's family, in Utan quite the weight, but it is not the only, the city, there are two other major family strength and Xiao House almost, the three sides of each other decades of infighting, also did not distinguish the winners and losers ...
If Xiao House is a Utan, then Citis Mouth said Cloud haze, perhaps it should be said that the entire Udagama Empire of a tyrant! The gap between the two is like a chasm, and it is no wonder that even the solemn father of weekdays is in awe of words.
"What did they come to our family for?" Citis with some puzzled whisper.
Moving slender fingertips slightly, smoked son silence for a while, just way: "Perhaps and Citis brother related ..."
I I mean, I don't have any intersection with them. "Smell speech, Citis Yizheng, shook his head denied.
"Do you know the maiden's name?" Smoked the child lightly to sweep one eye opposite delicate girl.
What wrinkly, Citis asked.
"You have to smile! "The smoky little face appeared a little eccentric, glancing sideways at some stiff Citis.
"And the Sweet?" Udagama Imperial Lion Heart Marshal of the granddaughter of Jie? The man who ... The fiancee with whom I pulp? Citis face stiff way.
"Xi Hee, Grandpa and the Jie is a life and death friends, and at that time coincides with you and the birth of the father, so, the two Don will set this marriage, but, unfortunately, in the third year after you were born, Grandpa and the enemy fighting seriously injured and died, and with the passage of time, Xiao House and the relationship between the family is gradually shallow down ... Smoked son a little meal, looking at Citis that stare big eyes, can't help chuckle a sound, then the way: "The old man not only quite unruly, but also for people and very care about bearing well, the marriage, is he himself should come down, so even if Citis brother in recent years, he has been very bad reputation, he has not sent people over Huihun ..."
"This old man does jie cute ..." heard here, Citis also can not help but smiled and shook his head.
"The clan in the family has the absolute right to speak, he said, generally no one dared to object, although he is also very fond of this granddaughter, but it was a little difficult to ask him to break off his engagement ..." smoked child beautiful eyes slightly curved, jokingly way: "Can five years ago, the" cloud LAN Zongzong the main Yun Yu personally receive disciple, five years , the great cultivation of the gift of the wonderful talent, but also let cloud rhyme to its pet unceasingly ... When a person has the power to change his or her destiny, she will do everything she can to get rid of what she does not like. Unfortunately, Citis brother and her marriage, is to let her the most dissatisfied with the place! ”
"You mean she's here to break the engagement?" ”
His face changed, and Citis a burst of anger, this anger is not because of the discrimination to his heart, say, the opposite of the girl although beautiful, but he Citis is not a body dominated the mind by the lower body of the pervert, even if with her knot not Cheng Qinjin, that Citis is just some men inertia of regret just, But if she really in public under the request of her father to release the marriage, then the father of the patriarch's face, can be counted as lost!
It is not only beautiful, the status of prominent, and gifted, anyone in talking about this matter, will think he Citis is a toad want to eat swan meat is not, but the swan tread at the foot of ...
So, in future, not only Citis, even his father, will be reduced to the ridicule of others, the majesty of the Great loss.
Gently inhaled a cold air, Citis that hidden in the sleeve of the palm, but has been tightly held up: "If he is now a bucket division, who dare so trample on me?" ”
Indeed, if Citis at this time have the strength of the bucket, then, even if the LAN-yan has cloud haze case backing, it is impossible to do so, as young as 15 years old, hey, in the history of the vindictive mainland so many years, but only those few people, and these few people, have already become the Taishanno of the world of vindictive cultivation!
A delicate little hand, quietly through the sleeve, gently press the Citis clasped palm, smoked son softly way: "Citis brother, if she really do so, just her loss, smoked son believe that, in the future, she will be for today's short-sighted eyes regret!" ”
Regret "Laughed a cry, Citis face full of self-deprecating:" Now oneself, have that qualifications? ”
"Smoked son, you seem to know them very well?" Perhaps even my father, in some of the things you said earlier, didn't know? How did you know that? "Lightly put a hand, Citis voice suddenly a turn, ask."
Smoked son Yizheng, but is smiling not language.
Looking at the dodge situation of smoked son, Citis had reluctantly twitched, smoked son although also surnamed Xiao, but with him but not half blood relationship, and smoked son's parents, Citis also never seen, whenever he asked his father, full face smile father will immediately shut up, apparently to smoked son parents very taboo, even ... Fear!
In Citis heart, smoked son's identity, extremely mysterious, can no matter how he side inquiry, this small NH will be clever to the silence to deal with, let Citis even if there is nowhere to be.
"Alas, forget it, do not care about you, do not say it ..." shook his head, Citis's face suddenly gloomy down, because the opposite that in the eyes of the constantly motioned, the old man, finally stood up ...
"Oh, with the help of the" Cloud LAN to Father Shiwei Mody? " This is a good means to the Citis of the heart, the angry sneer sounded.                                        
 
 
Fifth Chapter Poly Gas dispersion
Cough "The white robe old man coughs a sound, stand up to Shan arch of the Hand, Smile Way:" Xiao Patriarch, this time comes your family, the main thing is to beg! ”
"Oh, Mr. Goye, if anything, please say, if you could, Xiao House should not refuse." "For this old man, Shan not dare to neglect, hurriedly stand up polite way, but because do not know the other side exactly ask what, so also dare to say too full."
"Oh, Shing long, you can know her?" Goye smiled, pointing to the girl next to her smiling asked.
"Uh ... Forgive Shan Ching, this young lady ... "smell words, Shan a Leng, looked up and down the girl, slightly embarrassed shook his head."
At that time, when the Cloud Yun-Yan was collected as a disciple, at the age of 10 years, in the "Cloud LAN Zong in five years of practice, the so-called female big 18 change, for many years did not see, Shan nature do not know before the Maiden, is their name on the daughter-in-law.
"Cough ... Her name is "Sweet". ”
"And the Sweet?" The granddaughter of the father? "Shan first Yizheng, followed by the face exultation, presumably is remembered that thing, now, hurriedly to the girl show a gentle smile:" Originally is the niece, Xiao Uncle Shaw has not met you for many years, but don't blame Uncle Ching. ”
Suddenly appeared in a scene, let all is also a little Leng, three elders look at each other, the brows can not help wrinkles wrinkles ...
"Uncle Xiao, niece has not come to meet, the apology, but I, how dare to Blame Uncle Shaw." "A sweet smile."
"Oh, my niece, before I heard you were Yun-yun adult income under the door, then thought it was gossip, unexpectedly, it is true, niece is really good talent ah ..." Shan smiled and praised the way.
"It's just good luck ...". "A shallow smile, a little bit more than Shan enthusiasm, the table under the palm, gently pull the Goye."
"Oh, Shing long, in the next request of the matter, it is related to sweet, and this matter, or the Lord himself to speak ..." Goye chuckle, in the mention of the word, the face of the expression, slightly solemn.
Face slightly changed, Shan is also convergent smile, "cloud LAN Zongzong main Yun Yun Rhyme but Udagama Empire of the big, he this small clan of long, but the slightest have been provoked, can her strength and power, and what need Xiao House help? Goye says it's about a niece, isn't it?
Think of some possible, Shan mouth can not help but a few convulsions, huge palms slightly trembling, but fortunately with the sleeve of the cover, so also has not been found, forced to press down the heart of the anger, voice some fibrillation of the condensate channel: "Mr. Goye, please say!" ”
"Cough ..." Goye's face suddenly appeared a touch of embarrassment, but remembered the Lord to the love of the LAN, and had to bite the teeth, laughed: "Xiao Patriarch, you also know," Cloud LAN Zongmen Stern, and the Lord of the Master of the hope is very high, now basically is her as "cloud LAN the next term of the Pope in training ... And because of some special rules, the master of the descendants in not become a formal Lord, can not be entangled with men ...
"Lord Zong, after inquiring about it, knew that she had a marriage with Xiao House, so ... So the Lord Lords would like to ask Shing to be able to ... Relieved of the engagement. ”
Carbazole Shan in the hands of the Jade Cup, crashing into a peng powder.
In the hall, the atmosphere is a little quiet, the top three elders were also shocked by the words of the Goye, but a moment later, they look at the eyes of Shan, has been more than a touch of sarcasm and ridicule.
"Hey hei, be door-to-door forcibly terminate the engagement, see you this patriarch, later also what Prestige Management family!" ”
Some young teenage girls do not know Citis and the marriage, but in to the parents around, their facial expression, suddenly become wonderful up, cynical ridicule eyes, to the corner of the Citis ...
Looking at Shan that gloomy and extreme facial expression, is also afraid to look up, the head buried, fingers nervously twisted together.
"I know this is a bit of an imposition, but please look on the Lord's face and break the engagement ..." sighed the helpless sigh, Goye light tunnel.
Shan fist clenched, faint blue vindictive, gradually covered the body, finally unexpectedly vaguely in the face of convergence into a fantasy lion head.
Xiao House top of the law: Crazy Lions angry gang! Grade: The middle of the advanced stage!
Looking at the reflection of the Shan, Goye face also immediately dignified up, body block in the front of a small, claw-like hands fierce, cyan vindictive in the talons of the gathering, exudes a tiny and fierce sword qi.
"Cloud LAN Zong Gaoshen gong fa, Green wood sword tactic! Grade: Low Level!
With two people breath of eruption, in the hall, the strength of the younger boys, face a fierce white, and soon chest some stifleness.
In Shan's breath the more rapid sound, three elders of the severe drink sound, but is like thunder in the hall rang: "Xiao War, not stop!" Do not forget, you are the patriarch of Xiao House! ”
The body of a stiff, Shan physical grudge slowly converge, finally disappeared completely.
A butt to sit back on the chair, Shan face indifferent look at the bow not speak of the words of the white, voice some hoarse way: "The niece Na, good courage ah, with your daughter, it is very envy Ah!" ”
Jiao body slightly a shiver, the way of the Na Na yan: "Uncle Xiao ..."
"Oh, call me Xiao Patriarch just fine, uncle this appellation, I can not afford, you are the future cloud Haze Zong's master, in the future is also the man of the mainland, my home inflammation son is only the qualification mediocre, also really is not worthy of you ..." lightly waved, Shan tone cold authentic. "
"Many Shei the patriarch to understand." "Smell speech, side of the GE Ye exultation, to the Shan compensate with smile :" Xiao Patriarch, master Lord know today this request is very some impolite, so specially let bring a thing, as is gift! "
Said, Goye hand wiped a finger on a ring, a pan-green jade box in the hands of a vacuum appeared ...
Careful to open the box, a bromoisovanillic suddenly filled the hall, the smell of all are the spirit of one Chang.
Three elders curious stretched over, looking at the Jade box, the body of a fierce shock, startled channel: "Poly gas dispersed?" ”                                       
 
 
Sixth Chapter Pharmacy
Inside the ancient box, a piece of green, longan size of the pill, is lying quietly, and that bromoisovanillic, that is, from the hair.
In a vindictive continent, to be a real bucket, the prerequisite is to unite the cyclone in the body, and condensed bucket of cyclone, there is not a small failure rate, after the failure of nine paragraph of the gas, will be reduced to eight paragraphs, some people with bad luck, perhaps need to condense 10 times, before it can be successful, and so repeated cohesion, But let people lose the best time period of cultivation, leading to a great loss of future.
Gathers the gas disperses, its function, is can let a nine paragraph fights the gas, 100% the success condenses fights the cyclone!
This special effect, let countless people want to become as soon as possible, all of them covet unceasingly, think night and not get.
Talking about the accumulation of gas dispersed, we have to say that the owner of the manufacture of it: the pharmacist!
Vindictive continent, there is a occupation above the bucket, people call them, the Alchemist!
Smelting pharmacists, as the name suggests, they can be refined to improve the strength of the Magic Dan Medicine, any one of the refining pharmacists, will be all the forces at all costs, trying to draw, status, prominent pole!
The pharmacist can have such treatment, naturally related to its scarcity, practicality, want to become a pharmacist, conditions harsh abnormal.
First of all, must own property belongs to the fire, secondly, in the fire body, must also be mixed with a trace of wood gas, in order to make the smelting drug catalysis effect!
To know that the properties of a vindictive mainland human body, depending on their soul, a soul, will always have only one attribute, there can be no other attribute doping, so, a body, with two different strengths and weaknesses, is basically impossible.
Of course, there is no absolute, hundreds of millions of people, there will always be some variation of the soul, and those who have mutated souls, they have the potential to become an alchemist!
But the soul of the wood of fire alone is still not known as a true alchemist, for another necessary condition of the pharmacist is equally indispensable: the perception of the soul! Also known as Soul Shaping force!
Refining Dan Medicine, the most important three kinds of conditions: materials, kindling, soul perception!
Materials, nature is a variety of natural materials, the pharmacy is not God after all, no Acura materials, they are also Ching, so, good materials, very important!
The fire, the flame needed to refine the medicine, it is impossible to use ordinary fire, and must use the fire properties of a grudge catalyzed by the vindictive flames, of course, the world is full of fire, some of the strength of the fiery pharmacist, will take and use, with these different fire to refine medicine, not only the success rate will be high many! and refining The Dan Medicine, also than ordinary vindictive flame refining the Dan Medicine, the effect of more strong stronger!
Because the medicine is a long time, the long time refining, extremely consumes the grudge, therefore, each outstanding refining pharmacist, actually also is the strength tyrannical fire fights the person!
The last condition, is the soul perception force!
At the time of the smelting, the severity of the heat is heavy, sometimes as long as the heat of a little focus, the whole furnace Dan Medicine, will be reduced to ashes, resulting in naught, so, control the heat, is the pharmacist must learn, but want to control the temperature, it must be strong soul perception, lost this, Even if you do well in front of two, it's just useless.!
Under such harsh conditions, qualified to become a pharmacist, of course, is rare, and the number of pharmacists less, those magical Dan Medicine, nature is also very few, rare for the expensive, and therefore, to create the refining pharmacist that noble even some abnormal identity.
......
In the hall, listening to the three elders of the startled sound, the Hall of young girls, eyes fierce stare big up, a pair of hot eyes, staring at the Goye hands of the Jade box.
Sitting in the father's side of the Chongmei, pink and tongue gently tim add red lip, staring at the eyes of the Jade box blink also do not blink ...
"Oh, this is the honor of the elders of the ancient river in person, you must have heard his old taboo?" "Looking at three elders of the appearance, Goye heart unbearable some complacent, smile way."
"This medicine is still in the hands of King Dan's ancient river?" The three elders were moved by the smell.
Dan Gou, in the Udagama Empire of Great influence, the one-hand alchemy, magic unpredictable, countless strong want to curry favor with them, are no way to find.
Ancient river not only alchemy magic, but also its own strength, has long been Jin Dou Wang Zhijie, ranked among the top ten Udagama Empire one of the strong.
Such a character, from his hand out of the gathering gas scattered, I am afraid its value, will turn over several times.
Three elders look at the Jade box of the gathering gas scattered, if the family had this gathering gas dispersed, I am afraid to create a juvenile bucket.
In the three elders in the hearts of how to give their grandson to take Dan Medicine to get the time, the juvenile repressed anger of the faint voice, but in the hall of the abrupt rang up.
"Goye old gentleman, you still take Dan medicine to take back, today's matter, we may not promise!" ”
The hall is a static, all eyes are suddenly transferred to the corner of the Citis face.
"Citis, where do you speak?" Shut up! The face sank, a elder Nu shouted.
"Citis, back down, I know you feel bad, but here we will decide!" Another old man, too, is a faint way.
"Three elders, if the object of their Huihun today is your son or grandson, will you say so?" Citis slowly stood up, the corners of the mouth with sarcasm, laughing, three elders to his disdain is obvious, so he does not have to install in front of them.
"You ..." smell speech, three elders a lag, grumpy three elders, more eyes a stare, slowly possessed.
"Three elders, Citis brother Said is not wrong, this matter, he is the client, you still don't follow the join it." "The girl's brisk voice, in the hall of indifferent sounded."
Listen to the girl's softly, three elders of the arrogance immediately disappeared, helpless to look at one eye, and then nodded.
Looking at the dispirited three elders, Citis turned over, deeply gazed at a smiles Shang son, you this NH, what is the identity? How to make three elders so afraid ...
To press down the doubt in my heart Citis big Walk, first to the Shan respectful to do a ritual, and then turned around to face the father, deep vomit a breath, calmly said: "Miss, I would like to ask, today Huihun things, the father, did you promise?" ”
Previously looked Citis suddenly from the origin to block, the heart is a little bit unhappy, and now listen to his inquiries, show eyebrow is slightly a wrinkle, this person, at the beginning seems to be good, how is also a stalker nasty dozen hate people, don't he know the gap between the two?
In the heart blame Citis of her, but is never thought, she this public Huihun, let Citis and his father, into what embarrassed and angry situation.
Stand up and stare at the front of his body this should be his husband's teenager, the tone of the flat sweet: "Grandpa never promised, but this is my business, and he also does not matter." ”
"Since the Don has not opened, then also hope to forgive, my father will not promise you this request, the original marriage, is the two Don personally openings, now they do not open the mouth, then this marriage, then no one dares to solve, otherwise, it is blasphemy dead elders!" I suppose that no one in our clan would do such disobedience? Citis slightly overdo, sneer at three elders.
Citis by such a big hat, three elders immediately do not silent, in the strict family, this charge, but enough to let them lose the position of elders.
"You ..." was Citis a burst of Qiangbai, Yizheng, but was not found to refute the language, now angry little face some livid, heavy stamped stomp, take a breath, the perennial is accustomed to the big miss temper is also stimulated out, some disgust staring at the juvenile, in the heart fidgety she, more directly to the words: " What do you want to do to break the engagement? Too little compensation? Well, I can ask the teacher to give you three more to disperse, in addition, if you like, I can let you into cloud haze Zong practice the advanced fight Qigong method, so, enough? ”
Listen to a girl's mouth in a sentence jumped out of the seductive conditions, three elders immediately feel the breathing become hurried up, the hall of the teenagers, is a grunt swallow a mouthful of saliva, into cloud haze zong practice? God, that is countless people dream of ah ...
After saying these conditions, a little white chin Yang, like a princess as proud waiting for Citis answer, in her cognition, this condition, enough to let any teenager crazy ...                                    
 
 
Seventh chapter Hugh!
And a little bit of the expectation of the different, in her words out, in front of the teenager, the body fierce shaking up, slowly raised his head, the handsome young face, but now it is ferocious some terrible ...
Although three years has been suffering from ridicule, but in the heart of Citis, it is his bottom line, the LAN-yan this time high above, like a handout-like move, just mercilessly tread in the Citis hidden in the hearts of the only remaining dignity above.
"Ah ..." was frightened by the teenager's hideous appearance, the girl hurried back a step, the handsome young man, suddenly pulled out a sword, eyes bleak pointed to Citis.
"I ... I really want to kill you! "The teeth tremble, revealing the words of Citis, the fists clenched, the dark eyes burning with fury."
"Inflammation son, not unreasonable!" "Above all, Shan is also be Citis move frighten a jump, hurriedly drink, now Xiao House, can not offend cloud haze Pope Ah."
Fist mercilessly shook up, Citis slightly turn from praise, a moment later, and gently lifted up, but, the previous share of the ferocious terror, but has become a calm ...
Three years, although suffered from discrimination and ridicule, but also so, forged a Citis that far beyond the ordinary people's forbearance.
In front of the "Cloud LAN, is the darling of Zong, if oneself now really to her what thing, I am afraid will bring countless trouble to father, so he had to endure!
Looking at the front is almost suddenly convergence of the inner feelings of the teenager, Goye and the heart of a sudden in the hearts of a few feel hair cold ...
"This boy, if he has been a waste in the future, but also, if you really let him have the power, is a dangerous person ..." Goye in the heart, dignified secretly way.
"Citis, though I do not know why my actions make you so angry, however, you ... Break the engagement! "Lightly spit out a sigh of relief, the old heart from the previous shock to calm down the mood, small face slightly shen way."
"Please remember, this time I came to Xiao House, is my teacher," Cloud Lan Zongzong Lord, personally nod! " "Sip the mouth, and the little head of the smile, some helpless tunnels:" You can take this as a coercion, but you should also know that the reality is that, nothing is absolutely fair, although not want to express anything, but you also know you and I gap between, we ... "
"Basically there is no hope ..."
Listen to the maiden like a divine judgment, Citis mouth overflow a wipe sneer: "Miss. You should know, in the vindictive mainland, the woman Huihun will let the other party have how embarrassed, oh, I thick-skinned, but nothing, but my father! He is a clan of the long, if today really agreed to your request, he will be in charge of Shaw's home in the future? How do you stand in Utan? ”
Looking at the face filled with fury of the juvenile, and the brow of a smile, the corner of the eye glanced at the first on that suddenly seems to be a lot of aging Shan, Heart is also a little bit sorry, and bite the cherry lip, pondered for a moment, smart eyes slightly turned, suddenly whispered: "Today's thing, indeed is a little reckless, today, I can temporarily withdraw the request to terminate the engagement, but I need you to promise me an agreement! ”
"What convention?" Citis frowned.
"Today's request, I can delay three years, three years later, you come to cloud haze to me challenge, if lost, I will be in public, and at that time, you must have carried out the family of adult ritual, so, even if it is lost, will not let Uncle Shaw face too embarrassed, you can dare to answer? "It's a light tunnel.
"Oh, then if lost, indeed will not lose the father's reputation, but I, perhaps this life has to bear the name of the failure of shame, this woman ... It's really tough! "A smile of grief and indignation, Citis face, full of sarcasm."
"Miss Liu, you do not understand the condition of inflammation son, you let him take what and you challenge?" Is it interesting to insult him? Shan a slap on the top of the table, angry.
Uncle Xiao, Huihun this kind of thing, always need someone to take responsibility, if not to save your face, at this moment will be forced to solve marriage! and announce it to the public! "Several times blocked, the Citis is also some not tolerant, turned his head toward the silence of the cold drink:" Since you do not want to let Uncle Shaw face damage, then then the agreement! After three years and now, do you choose the former or the latter? ”
"The Tuihun, you do not have to make such a strong gesture, you want to, nothing more than to think that I Citis a waste is not worthy of you this day of arrogance female, say a mean, you in addition to your beauty, other than the master of the other is not to look at the slightest!" "Cloud LAN is indeed very strong, but I am still young, I have plenty of time, I was 12 years old has become a bucket, and you, the five-year-old, you are 12 years old, is a few paragraphs of the gas? Yes, now I am really a waste, but since I can create miracles three years ago, then in the years to come, why do you think I can not turn over again? "In the face of the girl's aggressive posture, the silence of the Citis is finally like a volcanic eruption, small face cold, cavity words, will be in the hall of all people are shocked into a daze, who can think, weekdays that taciturn teenager, unexpectedly such a stake."
The small mouth wriggling, although by Citis to her evaluation of gas Qiao face livid, but is unable to plead, Citis said indeed is the fact, no matter how he now waste, at the age of 12 to become a bucket, it is true, and at the time of the Na-LAN, but only eight paragraph of the gas ...
"Miss Citis, look at the face of the father, I advise you a few words, 30 years Hedong, 30 years of Hexi, MO bullying Juvenile poor!" "Citis jeong all imply, let the Na-yan jiao body light trembling.
"Well, a good sentence to bully the poor boy!" The son of my Shaw War is extraordinary! "Above the first, Shan eyes a bright, double palm on top of the table, splashing tea."
Gnashing of teeth staring at the youth sneer at, and the perennial was pampered, who has been such a lesson to their peers, now angry head dizzy, with a slight childlike voice is also a bit sharp: "What are you going to teach me?" Even if you have no previous talent, but now you, is a waste! Good, I will be waiting for you to more than the day you surpass me, today, the dissolution of the engagement, I can no longer mention, but three years later, I "Cloud LAN in the case of you, have the ability, you let me see you can turn to what extent! If then you can beat me, I am a man of my life for slavery for slaves, all you decide! ”
"Of course, three years later if you are still such a waste, the paper dissolved the contract, you also give me a good hand!" ”
Looking at the little face of the young girl, Citis smiled and ridiculed the sound: "Not three years later, I to you, really can't afford the slightest interest!" "Finish, also don't pay attention to that Qiao face ice cold of the dissertation, suddenly turn around, walk to the table, quickly!"
Ink drop, pen stop!
Citis's right hand abruptly pulls out the dagger on the table, the sharp blade, in the left palm above, suddenly delimits a Kangkou ...
Stained with the palm of blood, on the white Paper, leaving the dazzling bloodstain!
Gently picked up this contract, Citis issued a sneer at the passing of a smile, in front of the palm will be heavy hit on the desktop.
"Do not think I Citis much care about you this what a gifted wife, this contract, not the contract to terminate the engagement, but the master of the Xiao House you out of the Hugh card!" From then on, you, the LAN-yan, with my Xiao home, no more involvement! ”
"You ..... You dare to break me? "Looking at the blood on the table contract, and the beautiful big eyes, the boss, some dare not to believe the way to her beauty, talent and background, unexpectedly will be a small family of waste, give direct Hugh?" This sudden change, let her feel too unreal.
Coldly looking at the look of the Citis, the appearance of startled, suddenly turned around, to the Shan curved leg knelt down, heavy knock on the end, tight bite lip, but stubborn buyanbuyu ...
Though in the family, nominally he drove the family from his but this thing spread out, other people will not think so, not clear the situation of them, will only think, is to the background of the tyrannical, and forcibly let Xiao House Tuihun, after all, to the gift of the gifts, beauty, and background, with Xiao House a scrap firewood master, That is absolutely more than enough, no one will think, Citis will have the courage to take off a future cloud haze of the helm ... And so, as Citis's father, Shan will surely be subjected to countless sarcasm ...
Looking at the Citis, understand his heart extremely apologetic Shan indifferent a smile, smiles tunnel: "I believe my son will not be a lifetime of waste, gossip, in the future in reality, will not attack and break." ”
"Father, after three years, phlogistic son will go to cloud haze Zong, for you personally washes today's disgrace!" "The corner of the eye some moist, Citis heavy knock a head, and then straight up, without hesitation to the hall outside the line."
At the passing of the Citis, the footsteps of a meal, light tender words, cold spit.
"Three years later, I will find you!" ”
The young man's back in the sunshine, was pulled very long, look, lonely and lonely.
The small mouth of the little Zhang, some blankly stare at that gradually disappear figure, the hand of the paper contract, suddenly become heavy like Jack ...
"Three, since your purpose has been achieved, then please go back." "Looking at the teenager leaving, Shan face indifferent, hidden in the sleeves of the fist, but is pinched fingers white."
Uncle Xiao, today's thing, I apologize to you, in the future if there is time, please go to the family guest! "Gong body to the face of the Shan line of indifference, and he did not want to stay, and get up to the hall outside the line, behind, Goye and the handsome young man hurried to keep up."
"Gathers the gas disperses also to take away!" "Palm a wave, the Jade box on the table, is Shan coldly to fly out."
Goye Palm back a probe, the steady grasp of the box, a wry smile, put it into the ring.
"The Lady of the family, I hope you will not be sorry for the Big Lady today, again, do not think that there is cloud haze case can be lawless, vindictive mainland is very large, than the Yun Yiqiang transverse people, but also not less ..." in the three people are about to go out of the city, the girl brisk voice, with a faint indifference, Suddenly it rang.
Three of the footsteps of a fierce meal, a slight change in the eyes, into the corner, that gently flipping the books of the Purple dress girl.
Sunlight from the windows and doors of the projection into the gap, just the girl wrapped in it, far from looking like in the secular blooming purple lotus, clean and beautiful, do not provoke dust ...
Seems to be aware of three of people's eyes, girls from the quaint pages of the beautiful small face, that pair of eyes like the beautiful MoU, suddenly gush out a niao small golden flame ...
Looking at the small golden Flame in the Maiden's eyes, Goye body Fierce a shiver, frightened look in an instant covered the old face, withered palm hurriedly grasping is puzzled, and the young man, and then fled escape like the hall in ...
Looking at the Goye action, in the hall, except for a few people, the other can not help but the face of astonishment ...                                    
 
 
Eighth chapter mystery of the elderly
Expression indifferent to leave the hall, some distracted Citis in accordance with the usual habit, slowly climbed on the family of the back of the mountain, sitting on the wall, calmly looking at the opposite shrouded in the fog of the precipitous mountains, there, is the Udagama empire known as the Warcraft Mountains.
"Oh, strength na ... This world, no strength, even a piece of dog excrement is inferior, at least, dog excrement still no one dares to tread! "Gently stirring the shoulders, juvenile that low self-deprecating laughter, with grief and indignation, slowly wandering on the top of the hill."
The fingers were inserted into a black hair, Citis teeth tightly biting the lips, let the faint blood in the corners of the mouth spread, although in the hall he did not show what the wrong mood, can be a sentence of the words, but it is like a knife cut in the heart general, let Citis all over the trembling millet ...
"Today's insult, I do not want to suffer a second time!" "Spread out that has a trail of blood left hand, Citis voice, hoarse but firm."
"Hey, little doll, looks like you need help?" ”
Citis in the heart of the Oath, an old strange laughter, suddenly passed into the ear.
Small face a change, Citis suddenly turned, eagle-like sharp eyes behind a glance, but never found half a figure ...
"Hey, don't look, it's on your finger." ”
Just when Citis thought it was just an illusion, that strange laugh, again without any margin of the outgoing.
Eye Pupil A shrink, Citis eyes, abruptly stopped in the right hand above ... Black and simple ring.
"Are you talking?" Citis, trying to calm down his voice.
"The little doll is still good, but not scared to jump down." "In the ring, there sounded a playful laugh.
"Who Are you?" Why is it in my ring? What do you want? ”
After a little silence, Citis clearly asked the key questions.
"I am who you leave first, anyway won't harm you is, alas, so many years, finally met a soul strength clearance of people, really lucky, hey, but still have to thank the little doll this three years of worship, otherwise, I am afraid to continue to sleep." ”
Worship "Doubtfully blinked, a moment later, Citis that little face suddenly gloomy down, sen cold words, from the teeth, the difficult to jump out:" My body inexplicably disappeared in the fight of the gas, you do the ghost? ”
"Hey, I was forced helpless ah, little doll can not blame AH." ”
"I'm your mother!" ”
Always self-proclaimed calm and sober Citis, now suddenly like a madman's jumping up, small face is full of ferocious, also regardless of this is the mother left her belongings, without thinking of Lima ripped off the finger of the ring, and then struggling against the steep, throw out ...
The ring just away from hand, Citis heart fierce a clear, hurriedly hand to grasp, can leave the ring, has been straight off the cliff ...
Leng looked at that disappeared in the mist of the ring, Citis stunned a good moment, small face slowly calmed down, annoyed Pat forehead: "Stupid, too rash, too reckless!" ”
It is no wonder that Citis has lost control of the ring he has been wearing for three years.
Sitting on the edge of the cliff for a good while, Citis this just reluctantly shook his head, climbed up, turned around, eyes fierce stare, fingers trembling pointing at the things before ...
In front of Citis, at this time is suspended a dark ancient ring, the most let Citis shocked, or the ring above, is floating a transparent old figure ...
"Hey, little doll, don't you have to be so furious?" is to absorb your three years of fighting QI. "The transparent old man, smiling and staring at the stunned Citis," opened the way.
Mouth a twitch, Citis voice, suppressed anger: "Old man, since you hide in the ring, then also should know because you absorb my anger, bring me how many ridiculed scold it?" ”
"Can you grow up in these three years of mocking and scolding?" Do you think that if it were three years ago, you would have the endurance and the mind? "Noncommittal smile, the Old man light Way."
Wrinkly, Citis mood is gradually calmed down, after the rage is over, rejoice with it, since know the spirit of the battle of the disappearance of the mystery, then now, his talent, surely also has returned!
As long as the thought finally has the opportunity to take off the waste the title, the Citis body, at this moment almost is like the rebirth the comfortable rise, in front of that abominable old man, looks, also is not too annoying.
Some things, only when lost, just know it's precious! Regained, will make people more cherish!
Gently stretched a little wrist, Citis a long breath, looking up: "Although I do not know who you are, but I want to ask questions, you still want to attach to the ring to absorb my fighting gas?" In that case, I advise you to find another host, I can not afford you. ”
"Hey, no one else is as tyrannical as you feel." "The old man touched a 锊 beard smiled:" Since I chose to appear, then will not get your permission before, naturally won't absorb your fight of the gas. ”
Citis turned over his eyes, sneer, he has made up his mind, no matter how the old things how sweet words, also won't let him in his side.
"Little doll, want to become strong?" Do you want to be respected by others? Although the mind has been zoned the old man to not touch the party, but in this remark, Citis heart, still can't help jumping.
"Now that I have known the Battle of the spirit of the disappearance of the cause of my talent, to become stronger still need you?" "Slowly took a breath, Citis faint way, he knew in the mind, the world does not have the free lunch, inexplicably accepts a mysterious person's favor, may not be what wise decision."
"Little doll, your talent is very good, but you have to know, you are now 15 years old, and your fight of the gas, but only the third paragraph, I seem to have heard, you will be the next year of the rite of adulthood?" Do you think you can soar to seven of fights in just one year by hard work? And you've been gambling with that maiden for three years, and that girl's talent is not much lower than you. Oh, you want to catch up with her and go beyond, which is so easy. "The old man's wrinkled face is like a chrysanthemum in bloom now."
"If you hadn't absorbed my anger, could I have been so humiliated?" You old bastard! "Be stabbed to the sore spot by the old man, Citis small face again gloomy, the angry teeth of the big scold up."
After a big scold, Citis and his own dispirited down, the matter at this point, how to scold is also unhelpful, vindictive cultivation, the foundation is particularly important, when their four-year-old temper, refining a full six years, only with nine paragraphs of the gas, even now their talent has been restored, can be in a year to repair the inner smelting to seven paragraph of the gas, is basically not much of a possibility ...
Frustrated sigh, Citis eyes glanced at the pretended inscrutable transparent old man, heart move, twitched way: "You have a way?" ”
"Perhaps." The old man's vague and funny smile.
"You help me in a year to reach seven paragraph of the gas, you used to absorb my three years of anger, then wipe off, how?" Asked Citis, tentatively.
Hey, the little doll is a good calculation. ”
"If you don't help me, why should I bring a drag around?" I see, you old or another to find a bad egg to dance ... "Chatilen laughed, chatted for a moment, he also saw that the transparent elderly does not seem to casually absorb other people's fighting gas.
"You are not at all like a 15-year-old teenager, it seems that these three years, you really grow a lot, this is my own bad consequences?" "Looking at the oily Citis, the old one Leng, immediately some laugh and cry shook his head."
Citis Booth threw, faint tunnel: "Want me to continue to worship you, you have to come up with some sincerity?" ”
"What a sharp-nosed little doll, good, good, and who let the old man I still beg you this little fellow." "Helpless place nodded, the old man figure down the ground, look at the Citis body looked at a few times, a wipe Ganji succeed of the strange smile in the face of the rapid emerging, immediately dissipated, hesitated for a while, seems to have very reluctantly openings:" Do you want to become a pharmacist? ”                                    
 
 
The Nineth Chapter Medicine old!
"The pharmacist?" ”
Smell speech, Citis Yizheng, immediately eyebrows big wrinkle: "In the vindictive mainland, as long as the individual, want to become an alchemist, can refine pharmacists, is any person can be on it?" Those harsh conditions ... "voice suddenly a meal, Citis fierce head, Zhang Big Mouth:" I reached? ”
Very appreciative of the Citis of this shock, with a look of anticipation and ecstasy, the old man stroked beard thought for a moment, and looked up and down a bit, just seemed to some embarrassed sigh way: "Although only reluctantly qualified, but who let me owe you a favor ah, alas, just, when it is a debt of humanity ..."
A sidelong glance at the reluctant old man, Citis's mind, always feel that the old man said barely qualified a bit of false, but at this time he also lazy to ask deeply, just in the joy, but also have a bit of doubt: "Even if I reached the conditions, the pharmacy is generally taught by the teacher hands-on personally, you, is also an alchemist?" ”
Looking at the Citis is full of suspicion of small face, the old man hey a smile, the chest slightly up, voice, is also faint revealed a pride: "Yes, I am an alchemist!" ”
unblinkingly, Citis look to the eyes of the old man, suddenly brightened up, smelting pharmacist Ah, that is rare organisms na ...
"Old man, excuse me, how many times have you been a pharmacist?" Citis licked his lips, and the tender voice was a little more polite.
A vindictive continent, though rare, but due to its distinguished status, so there is a clear hierarchy, from low to high, divided into one to nine, the former hall in the hands of the gathering gas scattered owners, Dan Wang Gu River, is a six-product of the Alchemist, in the Udagama Empire of the smelting medicine industry, the first person.
"A few items?" Hey, can't remember ... Hey, little guy, are you going to learn? Shaking head, the old man suddenly a bit not resistant to ask.
"Learn, Learn!" ”
Citis no longer hesitate, small head hurriedly move, smelting pharmacist, even the "cloud LAN of that huge force, also must serve as a guest of the precious level figure na.
"Hey, would you?" If you want, you can be a apprentice. The old man set up his legs on a piece of bluestone, and said with a treacherous smile.
"Do you still want to apprentice?" ”
"Nonsense, you do not want to teach me to give a grant, dream?" "The old man turned over his eyes, and evidently, his temper was somewhat pedantic, and he cared very much about this mentoring relationship.
helplessly twitched, in order to become a noble refining pharmacist, Citis also had to respectfully to the old man to do the ceremony.
Scrupulous look at the Citis courtesy complete, the old man this just satisfied nodded, voice is also a bit more cordial: "My name is medicine old, as for my origin, now or you say, lest you distraction, you just need to know, like that what so-called Dan King of the goods, in fact ... It's actually fart. ”
Mouth a twitch, Citis looked at the old man that casual appearance, just want to export words, the swallow down: "What is this old guy?" The name of Udagama Empire Dan Gou, is a fart ...? If you let it out, I'm afraid I'll be ridiculed by the entire Udagama Empire. ”
Take a breath, pressure down the heart of shock, Citis eyes a turn, saliva small face, Hey hei way: "I do not know how the teacher is going to let me in a year, to reach seven paragraph of the gas?" ”
Although this three years time, your fighting gas has been backwards, but also because of this, it leads to your foundation than ordinary people more solid, vindictive cultivation, the foundation is the most important! In the future, you will be able to realize how much of this three-year setback has brought you. The medicine old face smiles slowly to converge, the way is a.
Citis a little surprised, he really did not know, the strength of backwards can bring him what good.
"When Will you teach me the medicine?" "Turning the eyes of the Citis, the idea hit the most important things above."
"If you want to be an alchemist, you have to have a flaming grudge, so before you learn to practice, you must at least become a bucket and a fire-fighting qigong," he said. ”。
"Fire-property work method?" Hey, teacher, since I am your disciple, then you take this day Order Fire attribute work method to me to cultivate? Citis stretched out his hand and smiled and tried to beg.
"Ghost, your day order is the ground of wild potatoes ah?" You've got a mouth open! "Smell speech, medicine old face a shake, laugh and cry scold."
"The old man, since into your door, you can not still let me go to the clan to find work law?" The best fire properties in our family, I remember, but Huang advanced, is that too shabby? Citis a small face, is very depressed.
"Son, teacher, not an old man!" ”
Be Citis by the name of anger overturned eyelids, medicine old didn't think this just worship finished division, this little guy climbed head up.
"Hum, since into my door, nature will not humble to you, the day order method, I did not!" But I have a more bizarre than the day-order method of work, you do not learn? "A light hum, medicine old muddy old eyes, suddenly plot abundant."
"More bizarre than the day-order method?" ”
Heart a jump, Citis swallow saliva, black eyes, inadvertently, quietly hot: "That is what level of work law?" ”
"Huang Low. "The medicine old Smile Sound, let Citis small face suddenly stiff down."
"Old man, are you fooling me?" ”
A moment later, there was a roar of youthful rage on top of the hill.
Looking at the small face in front of the twisted little guy, the medicine old proudly smiled, can put this calm like a small monster Citis gas into this, he is really quite a sense of achievement.
"What's so weird about kung-fa?" "Staring at the medicine old banter face, Citis suddenly quiet down, frown asked way."
"It can evolve!" "Slightly silent," the medicine old smiled.
Pupil fierce a shrink, Citis eyes blink also not blink stare at the medicine in front of old, after a long while, just shook head: "Impossible!" I've never heard of any work-law, an evolutionary ability! ”
"Psssssssssssst, you this little fellow knows what, the grudge continent is boundless, the strange person is innumerable, in you this has never been out of the Udagama empire the Little one eye, the impossible thing, many nautical miles." "The medicine old disdain of irony."
Citis a lag, immediately defy the way: "Have you heard of other work method, can evolve?" ”
Medicine old smile slightly stiff, after a moment hollow laugh shook his head, way: "is because did not, can show me this method of unique Ah!" ”
"Can you really evolve?" "Look at the medicine old serious face, Citis can't help to ask again."
"Can really evolve!" The medicine-old very sure nodded.
"Have you ever cultivated?" Citis asked again.
"Uh ... No. The medicine old hollow laugh shook his head.
"Did the others cultivate it?" ”
"Uh ... No. ”
On the forehead, the veins agitation, Citis fist tightly hold together, endure to want to blow the impulse of the past, the voice suppressed anger: "No one has practiced, then how do you know it can evolve?" ”
"Work law, is so introduced." The medicine old smiled guiltily smiles.
"Is there really such a work law?" frowning tightly, Citis hesitated, then turned the dark eye beads, way: "Can I see it?" ”
"Hehe ..." strange smile swept a look of Citis, medicine old mouth a crack, but suddenly voice a turn: "Forget, now you see also no use, or when you become a bucket of time, I pass on you again." ”
Out of the palm of some stiff, Citis mouth mercilessly convulsions a long while, just air leakage from the teeth in the seam of forced out two words: "You ruthless!" ”
Carefree laugh a few, medicine old ignore Citis that is full of anger black eyes, smile: "Now task, or in a year, first put your fight to the seventh section of the gas." ”
"Do you have any idea?" Citis forcibly pressed the heart to the mysterious work law curiosity, bite teeth asked.
"The first stage of the Battle of the Qi, mainly the expansion of the forging body, strengthen the vein, in order to lay the foundation for the body in the future, because the body in this age stage, the body vein is the most fragile and has the shape of the time, so, this process of cultivation must be based on gradual, can not take the slightest measure of external force, or later in the body gradually stronger The context will be due to the more and more powerful vindictive impact, and ultimately lead to the end of the pulse of the dead! The medicine old face dignified way.
For this, Citis understand, in his three years of waste, his father because of impatience, several times want to forcibly to his body perfusion grudge, but every time in the emergency brake the car, so, Citis very clear that the stakes.
Medicine old glanced at a small face calm Citis, satisfied nodded, with a smile: "For others, it is true, but you are different, the foundation of your body, as early as three years ago has been solid and reliable, and these years your temper is also firm, never fell a day of cultivation, so, now your foundation, for the teacher can be very polite to say, Very good! ”
"Do you want to use the external force to make my strength?" Like taking Dan pills? The Citis eyes turned round.
"Almost, however, with your current degree of tenacity, can not afford any kind of Dan drug energy impact, even the lowest concentration of gas scattered, that is not!" The medicine old lightly to smile.
"The lowest-level poly-gas dispersion ..." fingers trembling, Citis some want to roll the eye, that in the Udagama empire was copied into the extraordinary price of medicine, to their mysterious teacher mouth, unexpectedly became the lowest level of things, the difference between the two is really let Citis some startled.
"What about your approach?" "Take a deep breath, Citis back to calm, frown whispered."
"Oh, Dan drug potency too fierce, easy to hurt the vein, so we must take a more gentle way!" The medicine old smiled, way: "Tomorrow, you prepare three complete purple yelan grass, the longer the year the better, and, two of the Bone wash flowers, this thing year casual, oh, yes, there is a wooden system of a magic core, these are low-level materials, presumably you can get ... Somebody's coming up, I'll get back to the ring! Also, don't let anyone know that I exist, including the person you are closest to. "Finish, medicine old also disregard mouth more and more big Citis, straight into the black ring, ring slightly a quiver, accurate set in the Citis finger."
"Three complete purple yelan grass?" Two bone-washing flowers? A wood-grade demon core? Old man, are you mistaken? You think I'm the Prince of royalty? These things add up, at least thousands of gold Ah! I have been frugally for so many years, but only 400 gold coins deposit, this just enough to buy a level of magic core Ah! Citis holding the ring, staring at the big scold.
"That's your thing, hey, I configure the Wingoling liquid, other people have money can not buy it, just let you out of a point of material money, then distressed into this appearance ..." the medicine old banter laughter, in Citis's heart rang.
"Damn it, the stuff that the pharmacist is going to use is only for the rich." Citis helplessly with a wry smile, and his monthly allowance at Shaw's house, also not less, enough to have 20 gold coins, the money, put on the outside, can let a civilian family full of a year, can take the money to buy medicine old previously said those materials, but just bucket, this is the gap!
"Alas, can only find someone to borrow ..." depressed sigh a sound, Citis slowly converge the mood, small face back to the past calm, turn head to Mountain Road, where, a purple shadow, just like the Elves general, brisk leap.                                         
 
 
Tenth chapter Borrow money
Toe on the rock lightly, Shang son like a purple butterfly general, graceful posture to draw an attractive arc, brisk leap on the top of the hill, slightly biased head, eyes swept toward the cliff side of the juvenile.
Looking at the teenager, lavender slightly a leng, although only half a day, but she is to feel, now Citis, seems more than before, something more ...
When two pairs of eyes in the mountain wind and drag between the meeting, the child finally is aware of juvenile more than what, that is ... Confidence!
After three years, the young man's brightest halo, seems to have finally returned.
Some intoxicated in the juvenile mouth that looming smile, Shang's beautiful cheeks, the emergence of a lovely little dimple, shallow smile: "Look at the appearance of Citis brother now, does not seem to need to be relieved?" ”
"People have gone through blows, have to grow not?" Citis shrugged his shoulders and smiled.
"She's going to regret it." ”
Smoked the child to sip the small mouth, smiles lightly, the pledge appearance, resembles the judgment.
Citis light a smile, casually cut the clothes, toward the girl.
Came nearer, and looked at the, who was almost as tall as himself, eyes and then sweep to the slightly younger beautiful little face, Citis heart suddenly some trance, when that runny nose, bare butt heel in the back of the small things, now unexpectedly is also out of such a watery and moving ...
Smiled lightly, juvenile eyes warm alcohol, the palm is not polite in the eyes of the girl's consternation pinched the delicate little face, smiled: "Smoked son also grew up ah, but fortunately, did not forget Citis brother in order to give you the fruit of the fall covered with bruises like." ”
By the intimacy of Citis shocked Leng a good long, shiny smart eyes stare at that pair of black eyes without impurities, smoked son in the heart gently smiled.
As a child, he liked to pinch his chubby little face, but since the three years ago, he was like a wall erected in the heart, will all block out, even if he tried to close, will be his lukewarm attitude thorn sadly away ...
"He's really back ... However, he still seems to me as a child's heel, is really a wood ... "pursed the small mouth, immediately smoked son and some blame their greed.
"Smoked son, these three years, can not blame Citis brother, that period of time, I have lived a muddle-through, but fortunately, have you in the side with." "Citis a little embarrassed to take a message, sorry way."
Smoked son sweet a smile, three years suffered some grievances, in the teenager jerky apology sound, immediately vanished.
"Cough, yes, smoked son ... How much money do you have on your hands? Loosen the delicate small face of the hand, Citis suddenly hollow laugh to ask.
In the family, in addition to the father, then only smoked son and his relationship is very good, today to his father lost so big face, he can not be ashamed to find his father to borrow money, so, can only hit the idea of the body.
Money "Blink a twinkle big eyes, smoked son stunned way:" Citis elder brother need money? ”
"Cough ... To buy something, there is a shortage. Citis small face Some red, predecessor present world, this is the first time he looks for the girl to borrow money.
The first time to see the heart of the Citis brother exposed this distress appearance, the lavender son immediately some feel eye-opening, cover the small Mouth jiao smile: "I have more than 1000 gold coins, enough?" If it's not enough ... "at the same time, smoked son behind the back of a sliding, flexor light bombs, a purple gold card abrupt appeared in the Qianqian double fingers, card above, flashing five different colors of the ripple.
Five purple Gold card, in the vindictive mainland, at least need the strength of the spirit, only to qualify for such a representative status of the gold card, of course, some detachment forces, also have such qualifications.
"Enough, enough ..." delighted nodded, Citis can't help but also want to pinch smoked son's pretty face, but fortunately the last abruptly stopped.
"Rest assured, I will give you the money after all." Pat Chest, Patitis.
"Who cares if you still ..." Small mouth micro-skim, Zijin behind the card, is also her quick to close up.
"Come on, it's late, I'll show you around Wootan city tomorrow." Citis to the girl waved, the first to the mountain under the excitement of the jump.
Stand in situ, lavender smile stare at that reply three years ago flying free and easy teenager, a gentle smile, whispered murmured: "My heart, I should hate you, or should thank you?" ”
......
The morning sun from the window will come in, according to the bed of the youth cross-legged, warm ...
"Shout ..."
After sitting for a long time, Citis to breathe, a light white air flow visible to the naked eye, along the mouth and nose, poured into the body, warm the skeleton.
Eyes Chaijan open, in the eyes of white, Citis slowly stretched a stretch, full of fascination with the face and intoxicated: "Is this feeling, three years ah, strong feeling, finally came back again." ”
Slowly climbed out of bed, activities a little muscle, and then changed a shirt, the door came out of the sweet-sounding of the brisk voice: "Citis brother, not up?" ”
"This girl, come so early." "Helpless shook his head, Citis turned in the cupboard to churn for a while, finally hold out a small box, carefully will open, immediately a golden light shot out, let Citis eyes slightly narrowed up ...
"It's all my possessions," he said. Holding up the small box, Citis a wry smile shook his head.
Push the door out, looking at the door of the youth, Citis could not help but gently picked the whistle.
Today's fumigation, changed a decent light green decoration, light color, but also makes the maiden more a bit more pure, a tight-legged trousers will be that slender and slender legs wrapped extremely mellow, curved barb.
Long legs, hips, slightly developed small breasts, now the child, no doubt very much like the Earth on the young girl, full of vigor and seductive youthful breath, of course, have to say, that unique elegant temperament, but Citis has never seen in other girls ...
"Here, you need something." "Look at the Citis out, the lavender smiles handed over a black card, this is the ordinary gold deposit, the maximum value can not exceed 5,000 gold coins."
Casually took the black card, Citis jokingly: "Holds dutifully wear so beautiful want to do?" Do you have an appointment with someone? ”
"Yes, yes, this is Citis brother for the first time in three years to invite me to go out together, but I am very flattered," of course, to dress up a little. "Citis's intimacy make fun of, let the lavender eyes curved into a shallow crescent moon, playful jiao smile."
Shook his head helplessly, the mood is good Citis, also smiled back a few words, two people joke to the family outside, halfway, also met some ethnic clan, in see him and smoked son intimacy, after the appearance, are not from the face dew singular color.
Now the child, whether beautiful or gifted, is the family of the most dazzling young pearl, weekdays in the family, although seemingly genteel and gas, but under the faint smile, but it contains a vague indifference, and she greeted, easy, want to chat, difficult.
Ignoring the looks of these people, Citis led the fumigation, directly out of the family, and then slowed down, leisurely wandering in the streets of people walking around ...
Utan is worthy of the Udagama Empire, one of the large city, the popularity of a very grand, although now is the scorching sun, but on the street, people still surging, and even occasionally see some exotic races.
Perhaps because of the company, out of the family, Citis become lively many, pull the helpless Citis, constantly in the stalls before the disorderly channeling, the girl's brisk smile, let the street under the hot exposure, cool a bit.
After the Citis tired, this only took her to find a nearby medicine shop, spent more than 900 gold coins, bought three 20 years of purple Yelan and two five years of the wash bone flower, these are low-grade materials, as long as the cost of some money, can be bought in the medicine shop, of course, if you want to need more advanced materials, it can only find their own , or go to the city, the auction place and so on.
Looking at the hands of rapidly shrinking property, Citis smiled and shook his head, now, he finally understand the money in the vindictive mainland, how important ...
Medicinal herbs have been handed, the only missing, is a first class of the wood system Demon Nuclear!                                         
 
 
11th Chapter Square City
The magic nucleus, above the vindictive continent, also known as the Magic Crystal, as well as the embryonic form of medicine, and so on, as the name implies, this is a kind of energy in the Body of Warcraft, which is filled with extremely turbulent energy, for this kind of violent energy, even a fight king, dare not risk explosive body, forcibly inhaled.
However, although the magic core is not directly for human absorption, however, it is an essential ingredient in the refining of pharmacists, after the magic of the refining of the secret law, will be some magical herbs and the fury of the attributes, shake the body into countless people covet the most of the various lifting the strength of the elixir, the price immediately soared!
In addition, the magic core can also be added to the weapon, was added to the magic weapon, not only will be more destructive, but also with the increase of the seductive effect of vindictive, deeply vindictive mainland bucket of the pursuit of the class.
Of course, in addition to weapons, magic core can also be added to the armor and other items above, to bring a strong defense to the host, so that people in the face of danger, more than a few life protection.
So many special effects, nature makes the magic core deserved to become a vindictive mainland most popular mainstream materials, not only the bucket, is even those noble pharmacists, also often bent over the world to find a high level of magic nucleus, to refine more advanced Dan Medicine.
Driven by this trend, the magic core on the mainland is almost perennial in short supply situation, the high level of the magic core as long as one appeared in the auction or other place, Lima will be the price of people away.
Magic core of the expensive, naturally created a large number of dedicated to the Killing of Warcraft, but the acquisition of magic, but not an easy thing.
First of all, Warcraft not only strong strength, and unusual cunning, due to the vicious nature and special attack way, Warcraft is often more than the same level of the human strong on a few points, so, want to separate hunting with the same level of Warcraft, no extraordinary strength, it is easy to steal the chicken no eclipse.
Second, not all Warcraft, the body has the magic nucleus of this energy crystallization, this seems to be a random probability, sometimes, when a mercenary corps with half a regiment of casualties killed a monster, perhaps in the end, but empty-handed, this kind of thing, in the vindictive mainland, not uncommon, not unusual ...
Therefore, the magic nucleus in the grudge on the mainland's value, has been a long time on its, extremely sought-after.
......
Took a few turns on the spacious streets with a child, finally fled into the city is located in the south of a medium-sized square city, this medium-sized Square city, in the Utan foot there are several, respectively, the three families in the city control, Citis came to this place in the city, is controlled by their Xiao house ...
Said to be in control, in fact, rather than to maintain the order and safety of the square city, and as a reward, in the market stall traders or businessmen, they have to pay some commission to the family, this is a vindictive mainland has always been the rules, but also rarely see anyone to make trouble.
From the entrance to the door, door, there are two Shaw Home Guard, they clearly also know Citis two people, see their arrival, are one Leng, immediately slightly gong body.
Slightly nod, Citis straight into, standing at the gate, looking inside that flow of people, can't help but smack the smack, no wonder the family to Square city's control more stringent, to this kind of popularity brings profits, I am afraid not small ...
"Three young master, Miss Kaoru, you come to the square city, is want to buy something?" "Just as the two were dazzled by the crowd, the respectful voice came from behind.
Listen to the sound, Citis turned over, seven or eight men dressed in Xiao House unified costumes, is standing behind, and the speaker, is the leader of a 30-year-old man, man chest with a badge, badge, painted six Venus, apparently, he is a six stars.
Look at the sight of Citis doubt, man honest and Frank a smile, Gong channel: "Three young master, my name is Penn, is the chief of the elders personally appointed security captain, special guard Square City safety, hehe, young master last birthday, Payne also came to see ..."
"Oh, it turns out Uncle Penn." ”
Citis winked at the eyes, although the big man did not remember, but just his introductory words, is let Citis small face rose up a smile, since is the father personally appointed, then nature is his direct subordinate, loyalty, should not have any problems.
Xiao House Although not what super power, but the family, but also divided into several factions, if the big fellow is a few other Elders faction, then he also bothered to ignore, casual perfunctory is an accident.
"In the family to stay bored, so come out, Mr Penn you go to busy you, if something, I call you." "Citis immature voice, and no master's arrogance, but polite gentle, let people smell the mood comfortable."
A loud uncle said, let Penn face on the smile immediately concentrated a bit, but also more eager to some, took the head, nod with smile: "That three young master will casually stroll, Square city everywhere there are our people, if something, shout a cry on the line." ”
Polite nodded, Citis took the smoked son, into the crowd, and then disappeared ...
"Parry, take two people followed three young master, warning about those gold fingers in the square, who if dare to hit the idea to three young master and miss, then don't mix in here." "Looking at the disappearance of young and teenage girls, Penn back light drink, face of the honest, is also in an instant to lean."
"Yes, Captain! A fellow sank to nod, hand a wave, with two men mixed with the crowd.
"Oh, the three young men are still so gentle, really let people comfortable ..." Looking at the three people into the flow, Penn smiled, and immediately lamented the sigh: "Such a good boy, unfortunately, alas ..."
Sorry shook his head, Penn is also with his men, Patrol Street went ...
......
Lazy in the casual wandering behind the Citis, no trace of the eyes of a glance at the back of the crowd, a faint smile way: "Citis brother, that Penn is not bad." ”
Citis, with a light, glance at the side of a stall sweeper swept away, his soul perception than ordinary people strong many, so behind the guard, he also know clearly, take back the eyes, Citis slowed down, and side of the girl side and line, smell that such as Qinglian-like elegant girl body incense, eccentric head jokingly way: "Nine paragraph of the gas, But you can sense three of the Secret guard, Hyun-er, very unusual ...
The child learns the appearance of Citis, the lovable shrug shrugs, again come up with the assassin's killer: Smile, silence!
Staring at the girl's silent appearance, Citis lip side of the warm alcohol smile, the palm lightly patted the young girl's head, with only two people to hear the voice, whispered: "Although it is not clear what you are, what is the background, but I only know that you are my Citis sister, no matter how later, remember, standing behind my brother, waves , brother help you block! "Lightly a smile, Citis palm clap again, step speed up, go forward."
The footstep lives, the flush the beautiful nimble big eye, staring at that finish words, is dashing before the teenager, in situ Leng a good long time, finally is back to the God, the mouth of the soft smile gradually expand, and finally the exquisite little face rendering very charm.
The crowd of the Square city, girls based on chuckle, elegant posture, as the secular qinglian, elegant indifferent ...
"Sister?" she said. Lavender is a very greedy girl ... "on the small head, smoked gently whispered a sound, and soon chuckle Light smile, lotus step micro-move, with the front of the leisurely teenager."
......
Follow Citis round, but slowly into the market depths, the market depths of the sale of things, compared to the outside generally to be precious many, so, can come here to buy customers, in Utan also is a bit of strength.
While Citis in hard to find the crystal of the empty file, Lavender is also boring came to a clean stall before, Yingying stopped the body, out of the white delicate Hao wrist, picked up a light green bracelet, bracelet material is ordinary goods, just added some ice silver, let people touch the cold, very suitable for summer wear, although the ordinary material, but also chic elegant ...
Casual play a while, the lavender just want to buy, is to remember that they have all the money lent to the Citis, a little too far, looking at the busy their own things in the juvenile, had to reluctantly shook his head, to the old man after the stall apology smile, put down the bracelet, again lazy forward ... Elegant temperament of her, it is difficult to actively ask who to buy their own things, even if it is Citis ...
Before walked not far, some bored of the smoked son just want to go back to accompany Citis, a clear and clear laughter, suddenly came from the front.
"Gee, isn't this miss Kaoru?" Oh, unexpectedly will meet here, really fate ah. ”
Slender brow gently wrinkle, bandstands and hope, but see a bunch of people are rushing over, in the crowd, Starium-like surrounded by a well-dressed young man.
Youth in the age of 20 or so, the appearance is quite handsome, but the face is somewhat white, a pair of eyes, at this time with a hot, firmly stare at not far away that slim young girl, eyes, mingled with the undisguised love.                                      
 
 
12th chapter, stay away from him.
Looking at the handsome young man with his face full of joy, the slender Liu Mei of the lavender boy wrinkled and wrinkled, ignoring his cries and turning away.
"Miss Kaoru! ”
Look at the smoked son turned, the handsome young man's pale face suddenly urgent, the pace of the moment to speed up a bit, finally horizontal block in front of the incense.
Be stopped by the youth, smoked son had to stop footsteps, a pair of narrow eyes, with a little lazy meaning of the micro squint, faint looking at him, but is Buyanbuyu.
"Miss Kaoru ..." is the young girl that double eyes yin Yin's eye stare, perennial wandering in the beauty of youth, breathing unexpectedly some hurried up, the usual glib, seems to have lost its role at this moment.
"Add the young master, if nothing, then please step aside, I have something." ”
Looking at some red-faced youth, smoked son finally is open, the girl tender soft greasy voice, let the youth across the pale face, suddenly poured a some morbid red tide.
"Hehe, Miss Kaoru, what do you want to buy in the square city?" Just hanging out, why don't you hang out? "Deep Breath in the heart, Galleo face smile, brilliant and gentle, this smile, with his identity and appearance, had let him a few times successful embrace beauty return."
"Add, Master Otto, I have said, I have something!" Could you please step aside? "Lavender small mouth slightly to sip up, the voice is flat without slightest fluctuation."
Be smoked son a rebuffed, add to the corner of the mouth smoked, but face smile, but still remain, stretched out his hand in the bosom to dig out, and finally touch a bracelet, blue gold bracelet, chain material is cast by Kim Lantie, the link in the bracelet, hanging a piece of the ball was grinding into a round bead shape green magic crystal, faint Green Mountain from which, The chain is beautifully rendered beautiful, it seems, this small bracelet, the price will be expensive.
"Hehe, Miss Kaoru something, Galleo again block is a bit of an imposition." "Add Leo carefully hold the bracelet, the attentive smile:" This is just in the Square city bought a wooden ling bracelet deliberately, although it is not a valuable thing, but it also foil a level of wood properties of the Magic Crystal, the response to the gas, there is a good increase in the role of Ms. It's a perfect piece of jewelry, a little token, Miss Kaoru may not refuse, otherwise, Galleo in front of their subordinates, it is really a shame ... "in the end, Galleo also deliberately small humor a handful, and his subordinates around, but also very cooperate with a few voices of laughter."
Looking at the action of Galleo, lavender Show eyebrow again A wrinkle, the heart of this cowhide sugar really some helpless.
Just want to rebuffed, eyes but suddenly stop in the bracelet junction of the Green Magic Crystal, think of the previous Citis hard to find wood system magic crystal appearance, smoked son slender eyelashes, can not help but gently winked, cold little face, seems to be softer some ...
Look at the appearance of lavender seems to be moving, add to the heart of a happy, hurried to the chain of wood hand before a little, with a smile: "Galle miss no need to be polite, the family and Xiao House together as Utan three big family, send a little thing, no one will say anything." ”
"Get the bracelet, take the Magic Crystal to Citis brother, the bracelet ... He lost it while he was not looking. "Heart flashed some playful idea, no longer hesitate, just want to hand, a hand is a quick step to her little hand, a catch."
Hand was caught, smoked son one Leng, the body of the gas flow rapidly, the wrist just want to break free, juvenile gently hum, but let her obediently stop struggling.
The eyes moved slightly, Citis saw that suddenly came to the back of the line, the sight of point, but it is a glimpse of a little ugly face.
"What the hell is this guy, don't you know?" "Mercilessly glared at the smoked son one eye, Citis heart secretly blame a sound, immediately looked up a smile way:" Add row of master, your kindness, smoked son to thank, sorry, things, or take back. ”
Looking at the atmosphere of being stirred yellow, Galleo eye pupil flashed an angry intention, but in front of the beauty, in order to maintain demeanor, he had to simpering way: "Citis master, I just see the lady but not wearing a little jewelry, so want to do dessert, don't you want to let some small ornaments, for the miss more add a bit more beautiful?" ”
helplessly sigh, Citis oblique glanced at a Leo hand of the wood of the chain, but also hand in the bosom to pull out a light green bracelet, not the way: "Very like bracelet?" Here, to you, don't have nothing to pick up other people's things, and you said, nothing to pay, not rape is stolen, you this silly appearance, refers to may be sold by others, still do not know why. ”
Listen to Citis this refers to Mulberry scold unworthy words, add on the face of the cold, but when his eyes sweep to Citis hand bracelet, but is some stunned laugh.
Citis hand bracelet, from the material view, obviously just a not more than five gold coins of the goods, and his chain of wood spirit, but is authentic magic crystal jewelry, in the purchase, a full cost of more than 1000 gold coins, two bracelets, regardless of style, price, as well as the practical extent, are the difference between the sky, no slightest comparison, so, Galleo looked at Citis unexpectedly give the beauty girl so shabby jewelry, it is some can not help saying: "Citis master, although early know you in their own family status is not high, can ... But you don't have to be so shabby, Miss Kaoru? ”
No heed Galleo sneer, Citis to stare at the bracelet suddenly some daze girl Yang whisking, some not resistant to the way: "Whether or not ah?" Don't lose it, anyway, buy two or three pieces of gold. ”
"Joyriding ..." listen to Citis words, not only add Leo laugh, is even its next to a group of subordinates, is also ridiculed laughter up.
However, the mocking laughter did not last long, it is like being suddenly cut off the neck general, Karma is broken in the throat, the people opened his mouth, the appearance of consternation is extremely funny.
Originally some of the adolescent girl was Citis to wake up, hands almost in the subconscious under the control, quickly grabbed the bracelet, after the hand, smoked son this just back to God, his performance seems a bit too urgent ...
White delicate small face on the surface of a touch of crimson, but also very people, lavender, in a little shy, is graceful and elegant will be the bracelet set in the bright white wrist, looked up to the Citis show the elegance of smile: "Thank Citis brother." ”
Face some unnatural look at the Citis in front of the normal girl posture of the fumigation, add some jealousy on the face, dry smile: "Hehe, I did not think that the love of children so different, I was a little miscalculation." ”
Citis glanced at the Galleo in front of him, his eyes in the chest of a Venus swept over, the heart is not a little surprised: "Last saw this guy, he should be nine paragraph of the gas?" Did not expect this year unexpectedly successfully condensed fight cyclone, but only 21 years old to become a star, this talent, reluctantly can only be counted as waiting ...
Seeing this guy had no intention of leaving, Citis left twitched, lazy words, not because the other side of the strength and polite, Xiao House and Galle family relationship is not good, so he also did not need to show what low posture, touched the nose, Citis faint way: "Add the master, your romantic habits, the whole Utan know, But the child is still small, no time and you play puppy love game, So, later trouble you still go to plague another girl. ”
"Stay away from him later." ”
After saying this, Citis also no matter the face ugly Galleo, the advantage of their own age, turned to the unbelieving of the lessons.
Oh ”
The eyes of the child of the light blink, indifferent nodded, Galleo for her, but a few side of the edge of the stranger just, and Citis for her, but no one can replace, since he said away, then away.
This choice of questions, for the fumigation, not difficult.                                      
 
 
13th Chapter Black Iron Sheet
Look at the Citis, smoked son unexpectedly nod should come down, add row of the mouth a twitch, clenched fist crunch, eyes of the Condor's fiercely stare at the face of a plain young.
Galleo behind a group of subordinates, see his own master that ugly face, very clever smart before stepping a step, faint will two people surrounded, scanning the eyes, doped with malicious.
In the depths of the city, there are also many people, see the accident here, can not help but curious to look over, Citis and Galleo in Wootan City is also a small fame, Citis because of the name of his waste firewood, and Galleo, is that toss's merry name, although this reputation is not very pleasant, but also can barely count as two celebrities.
Looking at each other dry people's move, Citis Eyebrow pointed pick, young face, appeared a touch of banter, slightly over, to the Square city, a place, light blew a whistle.
See Citis move, everyone curious turn around, but is to see the guard team, is Captain Penn's led, aggressive rushed over.
Penn with a large group of guards, quick run over, palm a wave, under guard, immediately fierce will Galleo that group of people back up, for a while, the two sides some tense.
"Three young master, but what happened?" "came to Citis behind, Penn first glanced at the opposite Galleo and so on, immediately smiled and asked.
Citis slightly a smile, leaning head looked at the face ugly Galleo, careless way: "Add a master, this square city, but my Shaw home site, you want to do?" ”
Galleo eyes some wary of a look at Penn, and then turned to Chatilen smile: "You will only rely on the family forces?" If you're a man ... "
"You want to tell me that if I were a man, I'd have a fair fight with you, wouldn't you?" Citis suddenly waved his hand, and smiled and interrupted Galleo's words.
Galleo sneer at a sound, provocative way: "Yes, you can dare?" ”
Looking at a face provocative Galleo, Citis seems to be some helpless sigh, palm touched forehead, a moment later, just looked up, slightly shrugged, a face of Innocence and innocence: "Add the master, I want to ask, you how old this year?" ”
Galleo mouth a tear, overcast face don't speak.
"Eldest brother, you are 21 this year, how old am I?" 15 years old! You want me to fight you for a kid who hasn't even held a grown-up ritual? Don't you think it's a bit of a blush to ask? Citis sigh, the small face of the helpless appearance, let the fumigation side some convulsed, chuckle chuckle.
haha ”
Listen to the innocence of the teenager, Square city in the depths of some of the mercenary and businessmen, and immediately laugh a sound, indeed, to Citis at the moment of age, at most can only be counted as a young brat, and Galleo, but already through adulthood, this challenge, it is so that people have to despise some in the heart.
Around the sarcastic gaze, like a basin of cold water, let's add the Austrian back to some sober, Citis show the mature and indifferent, will always let people involuntary will his age omitted, so, by reminding, Galleo this just remember, before the juvenile, only 15 ...
Viciously bite the teeth, Galleo looked at the group is eyeing the Citis behind the Xiao House guard, know that they have no chance to shoot today, had to bitterly shook his head, Yin ce ce tunnel: "Another year, you should hold the rite of adulthood?" Hey, I see you this waste, I am afraid that the adult ritual once, you have to be arranged in the hinterland to go, later, even into the city of the Ukrainian qualifications are not, really pitiful. ”
Citis smiled, noncommittal shrugged.
Eyelids smoked, do not know why, Galleo as long as the face of a young man to see the calm calmly, is filled with anger, you a waste, nothing to me to install a bullshit ah ...
Forced to suppress the anger of the heart, add an ao cold hum, the palm of a wave, with his hands crowded crowd.
"Oh, yes ..." the footsteps suddenly a meal, Galleo seems to think of what, turn overdo sneer way: "Citis small Young master, heard you Xiao House, was the family of the families of the Na Yan forcibly dissolved the marriage?" Hehe, in fact also nothing, with your cultivation talent, also really does not deserve to miss, haha ... "say this, Galleo this just laugh and leave."
Citis eyes some gloomy glanced at the departed Galleo, Palm stretched out, a pull the side of the fumigation, Light tunnel: "A mad Dog, it bit you, you want to bite back?" ”
"But he ... Is it too much to let him go? "The lavender son wrinkles The slender show eyebrow, some is indignant way."
"Oh, there will be opportunities ..." Citis squint eyes smiled, mouth holding the cold, let the next to Penn, heart slightly cold, biting the lion, not terrible, terrible is, this lion, know how to endure ...
"Uncle Penn, please." "Citis turned, to Penn and other people kind of smile, previously that some gloomy atmosphere, instant into the youthful vigor and frankness.
Heart some sigh Citis to grasp the degree of emotion, Penn's smile, a more a point from the heart of awe, and regardless of Citis's cultivation talent, just this mind, future achievements, I am afraid not too low.
"Oh, three young master joke, here is our Shaw home site, where Jungalie family people presumptuous." Penn smiled, looking at the Citis look around, after leaving a sound, extremely consciously take people back.
Looking at the departure of Penn and other people, Citis this just turned around, the palm mercilessly rubbed the long hair, thin nu way: "You stupid NH, a level of magic crystal, let you be tempted?" What the hell is that guy, you don't know? You took his stuff, the guy Lima hit the snake on the stick. ”
Micro-pouted Small mouth adjusted by the tangled hair, smoked son helpless stall threw: "Come to the thing, don't white don't." ”
Citis rolled his eyes, some laugh and cry: "That thing is not something precious, you are guilty of this, you are the Xiao House of Genius girl ah ..."
Smoked son wrinkles The lovely Qiao nasal, yang up Hao wrist bracelet, jokingly authentic: "Originally Citis Brother has been in the attention of the fumigation son." ”
The white smoked son one eye, Citis pulls the Maiden's palm, again to the square city deep some stalls to go ...
Through a number of stalls, Citis footsteps This just under, bending body looked at the booth on that one still stained with some capillary green crystal, relaxed, smiled : " finally found." "
Stretch out the palm in the stall moved over, just want to grab the Magic Crystal Citis, the palms of a stiff, heart suddenly poured into a strange feeling ...
The tongue licked the lip, the Citis palm is still a grabbed the magic crystal, then the eye seems to be unconcerned on the stall sweeping sweep ...
A moment later, Citis's gaze rested on a piece of black iron next to the Magic Crystal.
The black iron is very old, covered with rust spots, but also with a number of unclean yellow mud, it looks like it is from the earth to dig out soon things generally.
"Hey, little phlogistic son, buy that black iron piece, good thing oh ..."
In Citis some for their own induction feel strange, the medicine old voice, suddenly in the heart rang.                                         
 
 
14th Chapter Suction Palm
Listening to the voice in the heart sounded, Citis eyes slightly blinked, no traces point chin.
And did not immediately pick up the piece of black iron, Citis light throw hands stained with bloodshot green magic Crystal, to the stall after the one that looks like some Zeimeishuyan mercenary men laughed: "This is what kind of Warcraft magic Crystal?" ”
"Hey, master good eyesight, this is the first Order of Warcraft Swallow wood Fox Magic Crystal, in the first-order magic crystal, this can be regarded as the best, in order to obtain this magic crystal, our Fangs Corps, can be a full guard for three days, killed five to swallow Wood Fox, just get such a piece ..." See Citis clothes extraordinary, the mercenary man hurried eagerly introduction way. "
"If the young master is interested in words, only need 500 gold coins on the good, hey, in order to kill Swallow Wood Fox, we have a few brothers suffered no light injury ..."
Citis finger rub on the blood on the Magic crystal, really found that bloodshot blood has not completely solidified, slightly nodded, glanced at each other on the chest of two Venus, casual way: "Expensive, the general level of the price of Magic Crystal, only 400 to 450 or so, and Swallow Wood Fox although also Warcraft, but the attack is not too high, your players, Not even the level of the bucket is not reached? ”
The corners of the mouth smoked, mercenary men hollow laugh Two, obviously didn't think before this teenager unexpectedly to market value and Warcraft so understand, now have to smile way: "470, no less, after all, our brother also have to live is not ..."
"Alas ..." in the mercenary men's eyes sigh, Citis bent down body, in the spread of a burst of scratching, just that eccentric iron film in which, Yang Yang hands of a thing: "470, together ..."
The eye in Citis hands of goods on the tricky move, the mercenary men quietly relieved, fortunately are cheap things ...
Into ”
A quick throw out a small bag of gold, Citis apart, pick up things turn and go ...
"Hey, little phlogistic son, good, buy a thing still so careful." "Turn around suddenly, medicine old in the heart jokingly laugh."
"These guys are profiteers, as soon as you see what you are behaving like the act, it took the horse's fare increase, I don't want to be a sucker ..." in the heart insipid back to a sentence, Citis also no longer tube ring in the eccentric old man, accompany the smoked son, leisurely stroll out of the Square city, and then slowly back to the family among ...
and smoked son in the family separated hand, Citis rushed back to his house, and then carefully shut the doors and windows ...
Back, looking at that do not know when to come out of the old medicine, Citis from the bosom of the drug and the purchase of magic Crystal, some urgent tunnel: "Everything has got, how to do?" ”
Medicine old Hey a smile, glance at random sweep the material on the table, suddenly said: "You don't see that black iron piece?" ”
Uh Citis one Leng, immediately and quickly took out the black Iron piece, looked up and down carefully, frowning: "This thing, what do?" ”
The medicine old conveniently took the iron piece, smiled: "Here noodles, seems to have a kind of dou technique, but the person that makes iron piece perhaps also is a pharmacy pharmacist, so, this piece of iron, only the soul perception force person can sense." ”
"Fighting skills?" "Smell speech, Citis eyes a bright, hurriedly ask:" What level? ”
Dou technology in the vindictive mainland, its attention to the degree, no more than Dou Qigong method small, a sophisticated bucket technology, can let a person in the battle, play far beyond their own tyrannical forces.
Dou Technique and work method general, also divide the world Xuan Huang, spread in the mainland of the public class of fighting skills, at most only Huang advanced, some advanced fighting skills, can only go to some colleges or sects, can be obtained.
Of course, the vast extreme of vindictive mainland, there are always some of the fighting skills of predecessors, because of all kinds of reasons, lost, and finally by a lucky man, and now Citis get the black Iron film, perhaps a legacy of a predecessor of the bar ...
Medicine old turned over the iron piece, a moment later just laughed: "Suction palm: The low level low-level!" ”
"The low order?" "Small face, Citis did not think of this casually bought junk, unexpectedly also hidden a Xuan-level bucket skills, to know, their own family, the highest deep fighting skills, but also is the middle level, and that only the patriarch and several elders are eligible to learn."
"Suction palm: Refining to large, can suck the heavy stone, if the enemy, crazy suction, can the human blood, forcibly pulled out!" ”
"Pull the blood out of the body?" "The face is startled, Citis swallow mouth saliva, some amazing way:" This ... Is that awesome? If the blood is left, who will survive? ”
"This thing can only deal with opponents who rank lower or the same, if you are still stronger than you, people will directly borrow close to the body, unlucky, or you ..." drug veteran iron tablets casually dropped over, light tunnels, it seems that he is not high evaluation of the technology.
The medicine is always big, the natural horizon is high, can in Citis eye, this is the advanced Dou skill ah, the present is overjoyed to pick up the black Iron piece, smiled: "Anyway, this suction palm is better than those common fighting skills in the family, later, learn it ..."
"Joyriding, in your three paragraph of the gas, can suck up a branch is very great, still want to suck human blood ..." shook his head, medicine old twitched way.
Turned over the eyes, Citis also too lazy to pay attention to the eccentric old man, himself holding a piece of iron hehe laugh.
"Look at you that appearance, a low level of the lower level of fighting technology will you fan into this, it is really embarrassing ..." reluctantly shook his head, the medicine old grabbed the crystal on the table, to the Citis commanded way: "To get a large basin of water." ”
Look at the old medicine seems to be to start, Citis hurriedly collect black iron piece, fart up to prepare ...
......
The quiet room, medicine old left to take up purple yelan grass, eyes slightly narrowed, a moment later, gently spit a breath, the left palm above, some white flame, suddenly a fierce teng out ...
The Flames have just appeared and the temperature in the room has risen a lot.
Eyes blink also not blink stare at that Regiment white Flame, Citis heart some shock, although he and clear refining the pharmacist's refining process, can this vindictive out, into the essence, even if it is his father, it is impossible to do ah ...
Face indifferent, the medicine old hands white flame slightly thump, will that plant purple yelan grass to devour among them ... The flames were churning, the purple yelan grass was almost instantaneous, and it was burned to a small group of green liquids ...
The right hand grabs a purple yelan grass again, throws directly into the white flame ...
After the three purple Yelan were thrown in, the green liquid became much larger.
Green liquid, in the flames constantly creeping, hot temperature, a moment non-stop burning the impurities in it ...
With the burning of the flames, the green liquid more and more small, a moment later, unexpectedly left only about the size of the thumb ...
Next, the old medicine will be two of the bone wash flowers, into the flames, they will be calcined after the melting into the green liquid ...
Then there is the alchemy of magic crystals ...
Three steps, lasted for one hours, and the old face of medicine, but still energetic, no sense of fatigue.
One hours later, the hard Magic Crystal, has been calcined into a group of light green liquid, the Magic crystal contained in the fury of energy, but also by the drug old with magical drug, wash away ...
In the palm, the white flame fades away and finally disappears completely.
Looking at the medicine in the palm of the hand suspended a drop as the color of the emerald-like liquid, Citis rubbed hands, extraordinary soul perception, so that he clearly sensed that the liquid has so much energy ...
"Teacher, just take it?" Citis winked, some can't wait.
"If you want to die, just take it, and with your veins you'll have to become a real waste." "White Citis one eye, medicine old flexor light bomb, jade liquid fell into the room of that basin of water, suddenly, a basin of clear water, is turned into cyan."
"In the future, it is not difficult to cultivate in this area, with your talent for cultivation, reaching seven paragraphs in a year." The medicine old clap clap, smile way.
Citis, full of joy, hurried to nod.
"Oh, almost forgot, this potion can only last for two months, that is to say, every two months, you have to buy one of these things today." "The medicine old smiles the way.
Small face a stiff, Citis a little cries nodded.
"Grandma, this thing is really only rich people can afford ..."                                    
 
 
15th Chapter Cultivation
The warm sunlight was transmitted through the cracks in the window, the thin, finely broken spot, dotted with neat rooms.
In the room, the teenager naked body, cross-legged sitting in the tub, hands handover, in front of the body posing a singular seal, eyes closed, breathing smooth and powerful.
In the tub, filled with cyan water, a slight shaking between, unexpectedly also reflected a little bit of the different mans, quite magical.
Juvenile's chest slightly slightly, breathing, a sense of rhythm, with the cultivation of the time delay, the green water in the tub gradually scattered the light of the air, the air slightly cyan, slowly climbed, and finally along the juvenile's breathing, into the body.
The air into the body, the young boy's little face, seems to be in the suddenly, emitting out like a jade-like luster.
Seems to be aware of the body more and more filling the air of the fight, young little face, Yang on a shallow comfort smile.
Taste the sweetness, the juvenile did not stop, the eyes are still closed, fingertips of handprint, motionless, Shen Shen Condensate, maintain the best state of cultivation, continue to absorb the greedy green liquid in the gentle energy.
Cyan water, stained with juvenile skin, a trace of the skin pores, slipped into the juvenile body, warm and nourishing the skeleton, washing the vein ...
In the juvenile never endless request under, more and more air from the water basin in the waft out, to the end, unexpectedly obscure the young naked body.
Cultivation, in forgetting to sleep in the bitter repair of waste, slowly through the window into the sun, gradually weakened, hot temperature, is slowly lowered.
......
In the tub, the eyes closed the teenager will be the last wisp of airflow sucked into the body, eyelash slightly blink, a moment later, dark eyes, Chaijan open.
Black pupil, Pak Mong as usual flash, but this time is a little bit Tanqing color.
Slowly will the chest of a turbid gas spit out, the young man with a blinking eyes, then the fierce stand up son, let the cold splash from the body drips, lazy stretched a stretch, feel the body that interval three years of filling the gas, some intoxicated like muttered: "According to this progress, I am afraid there are two more months, Can hit the fifth paragraph of the fight of the gas ...
Since the last time everything was ready, Citis has shrunk in his room for more than half a month, half a week, in addition to eating and drinking and Lazarus, and so on, almost a reclusive days of the Qing.
But although the days of cultivation are a bit dull, it is a trivial matter for the Citis, who has endured three years of supercilious scorn.
Three years of ridicule, let him know clearly, strength in this continent, how much important ...
However, although the days are poor, can cultivate the results achieved, but is filled with hair and joy.
The spirit liquid that the medicine has been refining, its strong, far more than the Citis even medicine old I was surprised, thought that even with the help of the spirit fluid, Citis also need at least January time to reach four of the gas, but did not expect, he was hard to shorten the time half ...
To this, even the medicine is old, also some can not help Citis to show out of the cultivation efficiency is surprised, although this and Citis once walked this road some relations, but this speed, also really too fast?
To know, vindictive cultivation, the foundation is particularly difficult to repair, the first order 10 paragraph of the gas, spend 10 years, or even 20 years of people, and there are few ... Of course, once you become a real fighting man, then the speed of their cultivation will be greatly accelerated, before they become the bucket, a year may only be able to increase the gas of the fight, but after entering the bucket, perhaps in a year, a few stars ...
In this very uncoordinated comparison of practice, the performance of Citis this half month is indeed a bit frightening.
......
Without scruple to climb out from the tub, Citis looked back to look at the color of some of the cyan water, this is because of the energy is absorbed by their own sake, reluctantly shook his head, whispered muttered: "This can support 1.5 months of cultivation?" ”
Rub the water stains on the body, Citis casually on a neat dress, then climb the soft bed, from under the pillow, feel the dark piece of iron.
The rust stain on the iron piece has been Citis careful wash, the whole some illuminating, exudes faint luster, quite somewhat mysterious flavor.
Half a month down, Citis apart from the discipline, is to put the rest of the mind, all put in this piece of iron in the lower level of low-level fighting above.
And half a month, in the medicine of the old guidance, Citis is also gradually mastered a bit of this grasp the know-how, but because the body of the gas is thin, but has never seen any real effect, this is to let Citis some regrets.
......
Double Palm will iron clip in the hands, Citis eyes slowly closed, soul perception, along the arm, familiar with the exploration into the Black Iron film.
As the Citis breathed steadily, the room calmed down again.
It was still a long time, a moment, the bed of the Citis, eyes fierce open, the right palm slightly curved roll, into a claw-shaped, the body that weak bucket of gas, along the control of consciousness, quickly through the palm of a few specific veins and points, the final suction gushing out.
"Bang ..."
The palm of the finger, a green vase on the table, suddenly shook a few, finally slammed the ground, in a crisp sound, into the debris of the Montreal.
"Alas, although the fighting skill is the metaphysical, can fight the gas, but is too weak, does not exert how much power." "Looking at the destruction caused by their own, Citis twitched, helpless quietly said to himself:" according to this effect, want to create can pull a person's suction, I am afraid at least seven of the gas can be done to fight. ”
"Forget it, go to the Family fight technology Hall to see if there is no convenient low-level bucket skills, this suction palm, a short period of time, is no big use, now since can cultivate the qi of the fight, can not still as silly as before the cultivation of it ..." sighed, Citis climbed out of bed, glanced at the hands did not respond to the black ring, and then line from the door, Push the door and out.
Micro narrowed down the eyes, in a slight adaptation of a little hot daylight, Citis this just carefully closed the door, leisurely along the gravel path, leisurely to the backyard.
The gravel path is planted with green willow trees, lush green, let people spirit spirits.
Turning the other way, a little girl was laughing, but it was passed from another path.
Disturbed by the quiet atmosphere, Citis brow slightly wrinkled, eyes along the voice moved, looking at the group of girls smiling.
In a few beautiful girls surrounded by some charming girl, is chuckle light smile, small face revealing that the charm of amorous feelings, let their next to some of the green girls feel inferior.
The maiden was the Chongmei of the day in the test square.
Eyes indifferent to this once with his cousin cousin called a non-stop beautiful girl, Citis immature little face, flashed a touch of sarcasm, gently shook his head, no nostalgia to take back the eyes.
Go to the end of the road, Chongmei that quite tempting laughter suddenly weak down, she saw the left not far from the young man ...
Sunset from the sky, according to the arm pillow on the head, small face indifferent young body, exceptionally charming.
A pair of some erotic take the soul of the eyes, staring at the more and more near the teenager, look at its little face that wipe is mocking or smile of the shallow radian, Chongmei spirit, suddenly some inexplicable trance ...
Three years ago, the boy, the corners of the mouth, is often hung this wipe let people some enchanted radian.                                      
 
 
16th Chapter Shanning
Looking at the slowly walking over the juvenile, Chongmei a few people are to stop the footsteps, the sound of laughter, but also gradually weakened a lot.
Chongmei next to a few handsome girls, wide open eyes looking at this once was considered the family glory of the young, small face of expression, can't say the regret or other.
Cummiton in situ, heart some entanglements, in the bottom of my heart, she also wanted to and this once let her admiration of the juvenile Chang chat, but the reality is to tell her, the gap between the two world, now is growing, and then put the mind on a useless body, is obviously some unwise.
Curved leaf Eyebrow Wrinkles wrinkle, immediately stretch, Chongmei in the heart some helpless of the tunnel: "Say hello, no matter how, he is also considered his cousin." ”
Do not know Chongmei heart of the idea, Citis arms pillow on the back of the head, Italy lazy line came over.
Looking at the Citis, Chongmei pretty small face just want to show a smile, can juvenile move, but let that wipe not fully surfaced smile stiff in the small face, look a little funny.
Arms on the back of the head, Citis nobody, sideways straight from a few girls walked around, did not show the slightest nostalgia.
Little Zhang Rosy small mouth looking at the back of the teenager, Chongmei some stunned, to her appearance, when received this treatment? Heart slightly gush a vague shame anger, can't help shouting: "Citis cousin." ”
Step slightly a meal, Citis did not turn, faint tone, as if the dialogue between strangers: "What?" ”
Insipid and unfamiliar tone, let Chongmei a lag, Na Na shook his head: "No ..."
Citis Eyebrow pointed lightly pick, again too lazy to ignore, shook his head, continue to move forward.
Looking at the end of the path disappeared in the back, Chongmei some of the feet of anger stamped, and soon followed the same road went up.
Turned a curved, Citis looked up at the front of the spacious room, the room plaque above, painted Dou three flamboyant red characters.
Listen to fight technology Hall in the yell, Citis some accidents, here weekdays generally less people come, today how so lively?
Shrugged, Citis just randomly turned the idea, then threw it again, step into the fight technology hall.
A fighting technology hall, bursts of teenage girls cheering cheers, is rolling over.
Dou Technology Hall, divided into two parts, east part of the house is to store the family, and the west part, but is a small training field, at this time, a lot of head, is surrounded in the training field, with a cheerful look at the field of two people.
"See Shanning cousin shot of the gas concentration, I am afraid already have eight paragraph of the gas?" ”
"Hey hei, two months ago, Shanning Cousin has already Jin into eight paragraph of the QI." ”
Although he has eight paragraph of the gas, can be smoked son cousin is nine paragraph of the gas, it seems, Shanning cousin want to win, is really not possible. ”
"Come on, sister Kaoru!" ”
Listen to the crowd out of the amazing drink sound, Citis footsteps This just live, eyes in the training field scanned a lap, finally with the interest of the park in the light purple dress beautiful girl body.
"How does this NH today have the leisure and the person contest?" "The heart muttered a sound, Citis in the lobby to stop the footsteps of the east, casually smoked a black scroll on the next shelf, and then slowly spread out, spread out after the scroll, on the back appeared a few yellow characters.
Huang Intermediate: Gravel Palm!
Leisurely leaning on the bookshelf, Citis while reading this gravel palm's cultivation method, the eye also occasionally glances to the fierce war training field.
The spacious lobby is divided into two worlds, the West is noisy, the east is quiet and peaceful.
Smoked son's opponent, is also a teenager, but his age, should be in about Seventeen-Eight, the appearance is quite handsome, and that day saw Galleo almost.
The youth is called Shanning, is Xiao House Elder's grandson, the cultivation talent is also good, only then 17, has already repaired to eight paragraph fights the gas, in the family, also only has the lavender to be able to crush him.
Citis to this own cousin not much impression, occasionally meet, is also unfamiliar to say hello then each leave, perhaps because of his grandfather and his father that some discordant atmosphere, Citis can always feel, this cousin, seems to himself not too satisfied, and perhaps because of the past few years of their own manifestations of decadence, So, this cousin, in three years, also did not make a special trip to find their own trouble ...
Lightly smiled, Citis off the memory of the brain, continue to study the hands of the gravel palm.
On the training ground, as a light purple butterfly general, elegant and agile to escape the rapid attack of the Shanning, exquisite elegant little face, always maintain a Gukai of insipid.
Little hand some boring to unload open Shanning of a close body attack, lavender eyes casually in the lobby into a circle, a moment later, suddenly fierce Dayton live.
Looking at the east side of the lobby, leaning on the bookshelf of the young, smoked children indifferent little face, revealing a soft smile of elegance.
In the maiden this is like a flash of elegant smile, nearby onlookers of the juvenile, are not help but silly past.
"Sister Kaoru, be careful!" "Just when the child was slightly distracted, the crowd suddenly came out of the teenager's nasty voice."
Feel the fierce attack behind the gas, lavender show eyebrow light pick, but the eyes are again swept to the shelves under the juvenile.
At the same time, Citis also raised his head, looking at the field in the sudden attack of the smoked son, wrinkly, reluctantly shook his head, eyes revealed the vague concern.
Look at the Citis brow of that wipe blame and worry, smoked child playful winked The beautiful big eye, then the body shape suddenly left small horizontal step, only this one step, but is some strange will Shanning attack impartial avoids to go.
Feet in the move, as the delicate jade-like small hands, gush out a faint Jinmang, like a flower to take the leaf general, through the Shanning double palm of the blockade, finally the light fell on the Shanning chest.
Toes in the bluestone floor light point, lavender graceful turn a circle, the strength of the reverse push, faint looking at that urgent retreat 10 more steps, the last foot across the training field of Shanning.
Look at a Palm defeated Shanning, training field around a little static, immediately and fiercely sounded the applause of praise.
"Hehe, the cousin of the family is worthy of the first person of the younger generation, really more and more strong." "Be smoked son knock down, Shanning but still full face genial smile, come forward, smile soft channel."
Fixed looking at the beautiful, such as Qinglian girl, Shanning eye pupil in love, almost difficult to conceal.
Although Fame cousins, but Shanning know, the family, most people do not have a close relatives of blood, and Shang son, and he is not the slightest blood relationship.
Seems to have not felt the Shanning that fiery eyes, the lavender polite but unfamiliar slightly shook his head, softly way: "Shanning cousin humility." "Finish, not Shanning continue to set near, is to the lobby east that immersed in the scroll of juvenile smiles."
As the focal point in the lobby, the act of fumigation is naturally being perceived by all, a pair of eyes, along the line of smoked son, and finally stopped in the shelves of young people.
For the full training field that hot eyes, juvenile as if not heard, still intoxicated with their own world.                                      
 
 
17th Chapter Conflict
"Citis brother." ”
The girl Qiao sang in front of the Citis, the delicate white small hand is negative behind, the body slightly leans forward, the beautiful watery big eye, bends into the beautiful crescent, in which smiles Yingying, the beautiful small face, emerges the shallow small dimple, sharp is lovable.
Eyes removed from the scroll, Citis smiled at a glimpse of the girl in front of her eyes, and immediately swept in the lobby, looking at the fiery eyes of that road, not by some helpless way: "NH, I know your charm is not small, but also do not have to put me out as a shield?" ”
Hehe The little mouth chuckled, and Citis sat down beside him, lazy stretched a stretch, exquisite curve, in the tight-fitting dress under the parcel, immediately seductive highlighting out, conveniently from behind the shelves to take out a scroll, smoked eyes on the Citis body stopped for a while, some lazy smile way: " Citis brother into the fourth paragraph of the fight in the air? ”
Smell speech, buried in the scroll of the Citis eyebrow tip One, 10 paragraph of the gas, are at the beginning stage, that vague and weak vindictive fluctuations, it is difficult to detect, so if not using the gas or test stone detection, it is difficult to identify the exact number of its owner reached a few paragraphs, and now, just a casual look at a few eyes, Smoked son is a mouthful of miju Citis of the details, this is to let him some surprised.
"What exactly is the identity of this NH?" Look at the fighting skills she used to fight Shanning, obviously is the advanced Dou skill, this kind of Kim Guo-do skill, is not Xiao House all ... "the heart flashed several thoughts, Citis head Shen Wan a smile of the girl, slightly shrug, lightly nodded:" The fourth paragraph. ”
See Citis nod, lavender small face on the smile immediately concentrated on a few, light smile: "Want to be and Citis brother this half month of closed door bitter repair about it?" ”
Well "Faint place nodded, Citis did not deny, the gaze shifted back to the scroll, the mouth casually asked:" Today how have leisure and they contest up? ”
"Boring." "Learn to Citis shrugged the fragrant shoulder, the smiles way, the eye turns to the teenager, vaguely has the wiping resentment:" Since last time, the Citis brother may have not looked for the fumigation son for half month, is still afraid of the fumigation son to seek you still money not? ”
Citis Yizheng, some embarrassed, wry smile way: "Next year will have to hold the adult ceremony, I can not hurry to cultivate it?" "Raised his head, looking at the girl slightly wrinkled Qiao nose, had to extend the palm of the hand intimate patted the small head of the baby, soft soft comfort way:" Later certainly take time to accompany with smoked son. ”
Listen to Citis Guarantee, lavender small face this just slightly relaxed down, constantly in Citis ear whispered laughter, that vice-like, so that all the teenagers in the lobby, are not jealous eyes red.
Looking at the bookshelf from afar, two people talking lightly, Shanning mouth slightly twitching, face quite ugly, a pair of fists, tight loose, loose and tight ...
As the eldest grandson of the family, Shanning's sense of superiority has always been strong, for the special Girl, Shanning in the heart, has been very determined to her own daughter-in-law, although this is his wishful thinking ...
Now see his own default daughter-in-law and another person laughing and joking, intimate, it is difficult not to let Shanning heart not jealous, and, most important, and smoked son intimacy chatting, or the family's most useless waste.
Eye pupil anger constantly emerge, a moment later, Shanning slowly spit a sigh of relief, face, again hung on the genial smile, the whole a little messy clothes, in full view, to the shelves next to the two people walk quickly.
In the lobby, the crowd looked at the two people walked to the Shanning, are gloating laughter out of the sound, of course, this laughter is not directed at Shanning, but for the seemingly dazed Citis.
Eyes swept over the scrolls on the shape of the human body, Citis secretly will that gravel palm of the acupoints catalytic and the position of the thread firmly recorded down.
A gentle sigh of relief, Citis downcast brow, suddenly a wrinkle, sensitive soul perception, let him clearly know the lobby of each person's move, including that is coming Shanning.
"This NH, is also a troublemaker." The low ground sighed, Citis slowly to collect the scroll of hand.
"Oh, Citis cousin, to learn to fight skills Mody?" Need a cousin I help you find several high-grade? Some things, perhaps cousin also reach the right. "Smiling face standing in front of Citis, Shanning Harmony laughs."
Citis roll in the hands of the scroll, put it on the bookshelf, slightly shook his head, light tunnel: "Thank you for your concern, I do not need." ”
"Oh, hehe, I almost forgot ... Citis cousin's fighting gas is only three paragraphs, too high, it is really difficult to learn. "The palm rubbed the forehead, Shanning seems to suddenly smile, but its face on the irony of the meaning, but did not hide much deep."
Citis sigh A sigh of relief, this is oneself gather the door to find scold ah ...
The mouth slowly raised the caustic Radian, Citis some helpless tunnel: "I know you say these are nothing but want to arouse the attention of the child, but, I still have to say, you are very childish ..."
A dark irony that was Citis by this relentless face, Shanning face on the smile gradually converge, he can not think of, that weekdays silent Citis, unexpectedly suddenly with his mouth courage, now face gloomy, cold smile: "It seems Citis cousin to my cousin is a bit of a prejudice ah?" Why don't we do the gestures? So I can see how much the cousin has grown over the years? ”
"Do you want me to do it with you?" "Smoked son put down the scroll in the hand, raise small face, beautiful watery eyes, a little bit cold idea."
Canthus a jump, looking for Citis, Shanning heart jealousy more Sheng, mercilessly took his one eye, taunt way: "You know hide behind the woman?" ”
"Why didn't you dare talk to me like that three years ago?" ”
Citis on tiptoe to remove a bundle of scrolls again, blowing the dust above, the mouth of the light tunnel.
Have to say, Citis this piece of indifferent calmly appearance, fall to him to have the bad feeling of the person in the eyes, really really make people feel chest block.
Teeth mercilessly bite together, the sound of crunch, although the heart has been furious, but Shanning is not dare to real Citis shot, no matter how low Citis cultivation talent, he is the patriarch's son.
A deep breath, Shanning cold glanced Citis, slightly bowed, in its ear sen cold whisper: "Citis, you are no longer three years ago, the cultivation of genius, now you, is just a waste," smoked son, not you can match, smart, leave her as soon as possible, otherwise, hey, although weekdays can not on your shot, But after a year of adult rituals, you have to accept the challenge of a clan, if you do not want to become a disabled person, advise you, get out early, and then hide in the poor mountain an enclave place, the stability of the next life! ”
Listen to the words of the threat, Citis corners of the mouth, slightly off the head, with a very strange eyes looked at the Shanning again, and then turned the eye, picked up the hand of the scroll, turned away.
Look at Citis move, Shanning thought he was compromised, but still not to his delight, juvenile that understatement words, but let him suddenly face livid.
"Well, well, a year later ... I'm waiting for you to make me a cripple. ”                                  
 
 
18th Chapter Advanced Fighting skills: Octupole collapse
Ignoring behind the gloomy eyes, Citis holding the scroll in the bucket of Technical Hall administrator registered a bit, this just and smoked son whispers, slow line out of the fight technology Hall.
"Little Bastard, you wait for me, when you are assigned to the family, I have plenty of time to clean up you!" Without the patriarch's shelter, you're shit! "Looking at that gradually away from the back, Shanning hate some teeth itch, gnashing of teeth of the backhand a palm on the bookshelf next to it, immediately left a shallow fingerprint on it."
Row out of fighting technology hall, Citis first with the cheerful smoked son to the back of the mountain after the afternoon, until the sky gradually dark, this just return to their small nest.
Back to the room, close the door, Citis shoulders immediately across down, the scrolls on the table, the end of the cup, a drink and do, some scared wry smile way: "This NH, really too can go." ”
"That little girl, the origin seems a bit not general ah." The old voice suddenly sounded in the room.
Feebly raised his eyes, looking at that like ghosts in the room in general appear in the drug old, Citis twitched, lazy asked: "The teacher know her origin?" ”
"Hey, it seems to know the point ..." the medicine old eyes slightly narrow, hey a smile, look at the Citis cast the curious eyes, but is suddenly lived in the mouth: "You do not ask, now you know, to you do not have any good, so, or do not inquire for good, I can only say that the girl's background some strong." ”
Turned over the eyes, Citis had to hate to the drug old dumped a middle finger.
"What are you going to do with all this junk?" Too much energy? The medicine came to the table, casually turned over the bundle of scrolls, startled way.
"Rubbish thing?" "The mouth of a smoke, Citis feebly moaning way:" I now in addition to that suction palm, what Dou skill will not, before only know immersed in bitter, never learned to fight skills, and the family only these Huang skills can casually study, do not learn these, then I adult ritual with what and others competition? ”
"Psssssssssssst, not just want to cheat from me here ..." the old whites of the Citis one eye, the shrewd medicine old, directly exposed his purpose.
be exposed to the purpose of the heart, Citis also not embarrassed, shrugged, double helplessly looking at the medicine old.
"What's so great about fighting?" After you learned the medicine, advanced fighting skills, directly someone grabbed you to your doorstep. The medicine old lightly to smile, completely disregard Citis that resentment of small face.
"But now I need advanced fighting skills Ah, teacher!" "Citis depressed tunnel.
Look at Citis depressed appearance, medicine eldest brother smiled two, shook his head, this just jokingly smiled: "Forget, who let me stand on your poor disciple?" For you not to be beaten into a disability, I will teach you. ”
Smell speech, Citis spirit a vibration, he is very curious oneself this mysterious teacher can touch what level of fighting skills.
"Your suction palm although is the Xuan step skill, but some is unworthy of, now your strength is not strong, then first teaches you a kind of to attack the dark step skill which is known as the damage, this skill request is not high, five paragraph fights the gas, should be able to exert some power." The medicine old smile way.
"What level is the metaphysical?" "Listen to the Citis, the eyes of a bright, licked his lips, hurriedly asked."
"Advanced Bar, I remember this fight skill was still a person crying begged me to accept, but I am not very interested in this thing, if it is not really entangled fidgety, I will not agree to help him refining Dan Medicine." "The medicine old careless way, that an understatement of appearance, just like is talking on the ground rubbish general."
"The Advanced level?" Crying and begging you to accept it? "The head hangs several black lines, the Citis heart some blows, own family is in the family unique knowledge the highest fight skill, also only then is the metaphysical intermediate, and the medicine old casually one, is the advanced level ... This strong contrast, it is really let Citis some laugh and cry.
"Shut my eyes and sink God, I pass it on to you." "At random commanded a sound, the medicine veteran pointed out, then lightly touches the Citis forehead."
A slight pain in the head, Citis suddenly realized that there is a large amount of information poured into the mind, the sudden message, suddenly let his head some hair rose.
"Octupole collapse: Advanced Dou Technology, near the body attack bucket technology, to attack the tyrannical known, refining to a large, attack implied eight heavy gas, eight overlapping, power comparable to the level of low-level bucket technology!" ”
Head slowly sober, thin taste of the information in the rough information, a long while, Citis gently inhaled a cool, attack can be comparable to the level of low-level fighting skills?
Above the vindictive continent, regardless of the work method and bucket technology, the level and the ground, the gap between, is like the difference between, and now this is only the advanced octupole collapse, unexpectedly known in the attack, can be comparable to on the ground, this how to not let Citis shock.
Swallow a mouthful of saliva, Citis eyes some hair straight, if really learned this fight technology, I am afraid that only by oneself this four paragraph of the gas, can the arrogant Shanning dozen ground to find teeth it ...
"Don't be shocked, although the octupole is not too high to fight the gas, but the strength of the body has a great demand, this is a close to melee fighting skills, see you this thin arm legs, if forced to use out, I am afraid the first break, is your muscles, not opponents. "Medicine old faint words, like a basin of cold water general, will Citis of excitement to eliminate clean."
"How do you increase physical strength?" After a little silence, Citis eagerly inquired.
"Fighting the Qi is the best exercise of the body of energy, with the fighting more and more strong, the body will become stronger, of course, want to faster, it needs some external stimuli." "The medicine old eye is narrow, the old eye seems to have some malicious."
"What foreign stimuli?" "Looking at the smile of the medicine old, Citis suddenly some feel all over hair cool."
Beaten The heavier you get, the better! The medicine old Yin Sound laughs, Citis small face stiff.                                    
 
 
19th Chapter Brutal Training
In the morning, a thin white mist enveloped the mountain peak, a long time, the breeze blew, suddenly brought a burst of physical contact muffled sound.
On the top of a hidden grove of trees, Citis feet such as a stump of the general thrust into the soil, toe tight ground, jaw biting, forehead, cold sweat cross-flow, only wearing a pair of shorts naked body, a road cyan bruising, densely on it.
In the Citis behind, into the state of the medicine of the old, is Panzuo on a boulder, at this time, he is full face awe look at the Citis, Palm gently a flick.
With the wave of the old palm of the medicine, the air slightly fluctuation, a light red vindictive horse practice fierce from the old palm of the shot, and finally like a whip in general, heavily hit the Citis shoulder, immediately left a long green bruising.
A violent shiver in the corners of the mouth, a breath of air between the teeth, Citis just feel his shoulder seems to suddenly numb down, an intermittent burning pain straight into the heart, in this intense pain, Citis is even the toes are some weak, almost can't hold down the body ...
After the severe pain, is the body of the rapid wading in the small bucket of gas, Dou Qi in the stimulation of pain, seems more vigorous than usual, cheerful flow through the shoulders of the thread and points, a trace of warm cool, slowly penetrate into the skeletal muscle, quietly to strengthen ...
"Come Again!" "The pain on the shoulder gradually faded, Citis that young little face, but full of perseverance and stubborn, biting the teeth."
Looking at the teeth stick to the Citis, medicine old that dry face, squeezed out a smile of comfort, slightly nod, palm, red, red grudge again shot out.
"Bang, bang, bang ..." In the small woods, a way some infiltration of people's stuffy and slightly mixed with the sound of pain low hum, a succession of spread ...
The drug old hands extremely has the discretion, each attack, just is achieves Citis now the body can withstand the critical point, like that, will not let the serious injury Citis, but also can bring the real pain to him.
The painful, Citis face that was struck by a grudge against the body was almost twisted.
Above the body, with the wave of the medicine's old palms, more and more bruises ...
Bang "is also a vindictive horse to shoot out, it is like a stake in the general Citis, and finally reached the limit of the can withstand, legs a soft, the strength of the paralysis down."
Intense gasp a long time, Citis wiped the cold sweat on the forehead, looked up, the difficult crack mouth smiles: "Teacher, how?" ”
"Very well, and today took up 84 vindictive lashes, nine times more than 1.5 months ago, has been stronger than many ..." medicine old face smiled and nodded, the old eye, with a touch of imperceptible marvel, this 1.5 months, Citis show toughness, surprised him, like today, Originally he thought 70 times vindictive lash is already the limit of the Citis, but the latter, but the persistence of the 84th time, it is so he had to sigh this little fellow's endurance.
Listen to the old words, Citis heavily relieved, the force-like sitting in the mud to rest for a moment, until the body back to consciousness, this just slowly climbed up the body, from the side of the stone down clothes, wear up.
When dressing, the cool cloth touches the bruise, and naturally it hurts Citis.
Transparent body a twist, medicine aging for the light flash into the black ring, leaving a sentence has been said many times the concern of the word: "hurriedly go back to use to build the spirit of the liquid invasion body, otherwise the residual blood stasis inside, will make you seriously injured!" ”
Nod, Citis, and slow down the hill.
......
Back to the cabin, had already endured the pain of the Citis quickly shut the doors and windows, and then again off the clothes, hands and feet and jumped into the water with the cyan in the tub ...
The cold green water stained with the skin is full of bruises, Citis immediately comfortable deep absorption of a few cold, the feeling of stoned, let him enjoy the eyes slowly closed, lying in the tub, motionless.
Citis softly on the edge of the tub, shortness of breath, gradually smooth, to get the last, low snoring, from its nasal blur passed out, after a painful torture, Citis finally is unable to endure the mental and physical double fatigue, heavy sleep in the past.
During the Citis slumber, the cyan water sloshing slightly, a touch of light gentle energy, along the Citis body slightly open pores, quietly drilling in vivo, washing the way some of the hideous bruising, at the same time, also constantly for that has reached the limit of the flesh, add vitality and continuous strengthening ...
The slumber continues, and the intensification is carried on unconsciously.
In the strengthening and repair of the Citis flesh at the same time, the green water in the tub, unexpectedly is gradually fade, obviously, the water contained in the drug, is about to be Citis profligate.
......
I do not know how long the sleep, Citis only remember when he woke up, the hot daylight, has been the room lit up the extreme.
Lazy stretched a stretch, all over the bones of a crackling sound up, lift the head, feel the whole body up and down that share of energy and enrichment, Citis can't help The Voice: "Good!" ”
From the wooden basin stand up son, Citis suddenly one Leng, he found that the basin was originally cyan water, unexpectedly has completely become the crystal clear water.
"Has the drug been absorbed?" "Touched the nose, Citis reluctantly shook his head, suddenly seem to think of what, some of the happy eyes slowly closed, sensitive to the body of the air of the situation."
A moment later, Citis opened his eyes, two palm micro grip, gently laughter, there is no disguise the meaning of the surprise: "Finally the fifth paragraph of the gas!" ”                                    
 
 
20th Chapter Auction
Half a month to promote the fourth paragraph of the gas, 1.5 months after the promotion of the fifth paragraph, this incomparable cultivation speed, even the former Citis, I am afraid that only can not.
Although each upgrade a section of the gas, the difficulty of promotion will also increase, but at the current speed, Citis to the seventh paragraph in a year to fight the gas, should not be too difficult.
Of course, under this premise, it is necessary to have sufficient base spirit liquid, otherwise, also unequal Citis to the seventh paragraph of the fight of the gas, will be in the medicine of the old beatings training in serious injury and death, after all, if not to build the foundation of the healing effect of the liquid, only with the present Citis of this fragile body bone, in addition to the body because of the excessive coagulation caused by , but there is no second way to go.
So, now Citis most need to do is to buy materials again, and then refining the base spirit fluid, said, seems very simple, but Citis is met a big problem. He doesn't have much money.
Sitting on the bed, Citis little face is full of wry smile, did not think that they will be money forced into this pattern, stretching out fingers, a little calculation ... The last purchase of materials, the remaining money, there are more than 900 gold coins, with this money to buy the last grade of material, obviously not enough.
Holding the chin for a moment, Citis eyes turned, suddenly aloud asked: "Teacher, purple yelan grass or wash bone flowers, can you use the year lower some AH?" ”
"Yes, but then the drug is weak, I gave you the construction of the base spirit fluid, but according to the most suitable with the best." "In the ring, the old voice of the drug came out.
Blink eyes, Citis lightly smiled: "Never mind, this time use the worst material refining it." ”
"The worst?" That's a bad effect, so it might take you half a year to break the air. The old voice of the medicine with some dissatisfaction, presumably at this time he has frowned.
"Not enough money?" To find that little girl, to her background, give you tens of thousands of gold coins flower is just small things, no longer, to find your father, why lower the drug to delay their own cultivation ...
Listen to the advice of old medicine, Citis reluctantly shook his head: "You will be my boring self-esteem in trouble, how can Sampans to find a girl to borrow money, my father also forget, I have been hiding him for two months, and in case he asked for money, he inquired, it will not be the teacher you leaked out. ”
"Teacher, this builds the spirit liquid, can other people configure?" "It seems to think of what, Citis suddenly frown asked."
"Hey, little fellow, on a vindictive continent, the herbs abound, want to configure a different effect of the Dan Medicine, it must from the countless materials, screening out the Magic crystal can be in and you need to refine the wild energy of the medicinal herbs, so that you can successfully refining the Dan medicine you need, if a patchwork, furnace damage Dan is a small matter, In case of a haunt, hehe ... at this point, the medicine old Yin smiled, this just went on: "This is the construction of the spirit of the liquid, I have been a good experiment for several years, just condensed out of the prescription, of course, may also be other people accidentally make this prescription, but this is too small." ”
"Again, in the process of refining, the degree of fusion of three kinds of materials and the amount of flame, the concentration of fire, which requires countless experiments and strong soul perception to grasp, otherwise, why do you think each of the pharmacists need the teacher hands-on teaching?" To be a powerful alchemist, without a mentor, is basically impossible, otherwise, just those experimental prescriptions can take a lifetime. ”
"So, the whole vindictive continent I dare not say, but this Canadian empire, I can pack a ticket, no one should be able to make the same as I build the spirit liquid!" "At this point, the old words of medicine, faint with a pride."
Some shocked by the complexity of the Citis, the subconscious licked his lips, the original look at the old medicine refining, it seems to detect very simple, until now, just know refining Dan Medicine, far more than the surface of this fur seen.
The world of the pharmacist is a vast and unpredictable one, and no wonder will become the noblest profession on the vindictive continent.
After the shock, Citis heart some joy, sip chuckle, light smile: teacher, I do not want to use the worst of the construction of the spirit liquid to cultivate, I was going to take it to auction auction, now not rich, and so on hand, we buy better materials, anyway refining build the spirit liquid, for you, is just a little effort, how? ”
"So ... As you can, the pharmacist auction their own Dan Medicine, it is not a strange thing, and the construction of the spirit of the liquid is only the lowest level of the culture of drugs, it is no harm to sell. "After a little silence, the medicine is always indifferent to the Tao.
Listen to the black old nod agree, Citis Hey a smile, pack good things, is rushed out of the room.
Because this does not need too good medicinal herbs, so Citis just random in the selection of the year the lowest purple Yelan and wash bone flowers, as for the wood properties of magic Crystal, but also after several rounds of investigation, bought a cheapest Qingmu magic crystal.
Buy the necessary materials, Citis found a inn, hiding in which let medicine old shot will build the base spirit liquid refining out.
The construction of the spirit of the liquid, not only the drug than the last to many, and even that color, but also from the crystal clear jade into the mottled green color ...
Will this regiment has Citis half Fist of the construction of the foundation spirit liquid into the previous bought white Jade Vial, Citis this just relieved sigh of relief.
The jade bottle close-fitting, Citis left the inn, legs to the Wootan city's largest auction will go.                                         
 
 
21st Chapter Two Ghuni of pharmaceutical pharmacists
Temille auction house, Wootan City's largest auction place, but also under the Ugama Empire's richest family: the Temille family.
In the Udagama Empire, to be rich, I am afraid the Temille family is the leading.
Temille family history, has been developed in the Udagama Empire for hundreds of years, the relationship is complex, and according to some anecdotal, the rich oil family, it seems that the Udagama Empire and the royal family has silk relations.
In the Empire, the Temille family and the family, because of the family and called the Udagama three giants, the three families, in the Empire of Business, the military and so on the interface, and so on, the power is not small.
So, with the strong background of the Temille family, even if the profits of the auction house are more coveted, no one dares to hit their ideas.
......
Looking at the huge venue at the end of the street, Citis turned into a remote alley and quickly draped his previously purchased black cloak.
The huge robe concealed, not only hid the Citis appearance, is even the teenager some thin body, is also stuffed bloated up, now Citis appearance, I am afraid that is the presence of the lavender son, also very difficult to recognize ...
The Citis of the body was so relieved that he could not blame him for being too cautious, this kind of thing is too appealing to some family forces, after all, if anyone can build this fluid on a large scale, the strength of its young generation will grow fast, which is the best catalyst for a family.
In order not to bring himself some unnecessary trouble, Citis had to choose to sneak ...
Palm touched the bosom of that some cool white jade bottle, Citis slowly out of the alley, and then to the end of the street auction Hall line.
In the doorway of several heavily armed guard eyes, Citis footsteps non-stop straight into.
In a meeting, the feeling of hot, is like being stripped from the body and go general, cool feeling, people have a strange feeling inside and out.
Eyes in the magnificent spacious hall swept, Citis to the side of the room to go, the door of the house, printed with glittering "treasure room" three characters.
Pushing the door and into the room, there are some empty, only a middle-aged man some boring sitting on the table chair, listen to push the door, the middle-aged man raised his head, looking at the body wrapped in black robes of the figure, frowning wrinkle wrinkles, and quickly on the face of a professional smile: "Sir, you are going to Kam Bao Mody?" ”
Well "Under the black robe, a sound of some dry old voice, the passing of a buoyant, unexpectedly is the voice of medicine."
Citis forward two steps, readily from the bosom of the white jade bottle, lightly placed on the table above.
"What is it?" "The eyes doubtfully winked, the middle-aged man carefully picked up the white Jade bottle, nose in the mouth of the bottle to sniff, after a moment, facial expression slightly change, again looking to Citis eyes, more out of a bit of awe:" Monseigneur is the pharmacy? ”
Well The old voice came again.
"Excuse me, this bottle ... What is Dan Medicine? What's the effect? Hearing this, the middle-aged man again asked.
"Build the spirit fluid, you can improve the fight of the gas cultivation speed, but only to be used under the bucket in order to be effective." ”
Oh can enhance the speed of the fight of the QI? "Smell speech, middle-aged some moved, fighting the gas can only be the practice of practice, this almost all became common sense of all, and this stage of the practitioners in the skeleton is very fragile, once the drug is too fierce, it will be the tragic end of the pulse of death."
"My spirit fluid, and no negative effect, the drug is also extremely mild, and will not cause that result, you can rest assured." "Seems to understand the hearts of middle-aged people think, the old voice slowly explained."
Once again, the middle-aged man carefully put the white jade bottle back to the table, respectful way: "Monsieur, can you please wait a moment?" I need to go and ask the Ghuni of our auction house to come and identify the spirit liquid! ”
"Well, hurry up." Waved, Citis also welcome, sat down on the side of the chair, and then closed his eyes to repose.
The middle-aged man nodded hurriedly, then hurried out of the room.
Sitting in the chair, Citis kept silent, and did not open the old dialogue with medicine, here is the site of others, or cautious, who can ensure that there is no peeping or eavesdropping settings.
After a long stay in the room, the middle-aged man returned, only this time, he also brought a slightly white hair of the Tsing Yi elderly.
Eyes on the old man swept, and finally stopped in the old man's chest, there, and did not draw Venus, but painted a some similar medicine stove, on the surface of the medicine stove, two silver ripples, flashing Noble Hao Mans.
"My lord, this is the Ghuni of our auction house, he is a Samsung master!" He is also a second-quality pharmacist! "Middle-aged Christine said.
Listen to the old man behind this identity, Citis cloak under the eyebrow tip subconsciously picked pick, this is the first time he met in addition to the medicine of the pharmacy, the second, the present can't help but looked at each other.
Old man face red, although the body of the Tsing Yi seemingly ordinary, but faint with the flow of light, it is clear that this shirt, should be added to hold what magic crystal protection, ordinary face above, with a touch of arrogance, it is difficult to conceal the arrogant, this is every one of the necessary things.
In Citis looked at the other side at the same time, Ghuni is also in the traces of the former, the pharmacist is not Dou, this thing casually out of one, will be any force scrambling to win, so, Ghuni in the mind, also secretly guessed Citis identity.
The middle-aged man took the jade bottle carefully from the table and handed it to Ghuni.
Took the white Jade bottle, Ghuni light sniff The scent of the scent, the old Eyes micro-squint, eye pupil slightly flashing, the mouth of a slight oblique, a small drop of cyan liquid, slowly from the rolling out, and then suspended in Ghuni palm of the place.
Eyes tightly staring at the cyan liquid, Ghuni double finger a clip, a silver fine needle appeared in the fingers, fine needles, slightly suffused with a grudge fluctuation, quietly into the cyan liquid, and then gently stirred ...
As the fine needle stirred, Ghuni's face gradually changed from calm to dignified, a moment later, the cyan liquid into the jade bottle, the eyes again swept to the Citis, proud face, a point of respect, turned to the middle-aged Shen Channel: "Spirit Liquid has reached two grade Dan Medicine, this adult said before, no leave!" ”
Smell speech, middle-aged big relieved, to Citis eagerly smiled: "Monseigneur, you are going to auction this spirit liquid?" ”
"Well, can you give me the quickest time for the auction?" ”
"Oh, this nature is no problem, Monseigneur, you take this to an auction room, where just still holding the auction, your spirit fluid, will be filmed!" The middle-aged man smiled and handed over a dark iron card.
Well "Hand over the iron card, Citis also do not stop, directly in the eyes of two people, line out of the room."
"Master Ghuni, is he an alchemist?" "Look at the Citis disappeared, the middle-aged man then whispered."
"Well, it is indeed an alchemist, the keen soul-perceptive, that is not wrong ..." Ghuni nodded, and immediately wrinkly, some puzzled to himself: "But he is which side of the smelting pharmacist?" Never heard of Utan when out of a can refining two products Dan Medicine pharmacy ah? ”
"Do you need to investigate his origins?" The middle-aged man whispered.
Ghuni old eyes, a little thought, slightly shook his head: "Not for the time being, the temper of the pharmacist is a bit eccentric, if the investigation caught his attention, I am afraid it will make him to the auction house has a bad impression, casually offend an unknown level of the mystery of the pharmacist, it is not a sensible move." ”
Turned his head, glanced at the middle-aged, Ghuni light tunnel: "How to let him have a good opinion of us, you should know how to do it?" ”
"Oh, understand. ”
"Remember, even if can not be friendly, that also must not offend, otherwise ..." Lightly dropped a few cold words, Ghuni floated away.                                    
 
 
22nd Chapter Wind Roll decision
Led by a waitress, Citis into the ongoing auction.
One into which, the surrounding bright environment is dim down, bursts of noise, the overwhelming direct irrigation in the ear, let the Citis eyebrows big wrinkles.
The auction house is very large, it is not difficult to accommodate thousands of people, at this time, in the central location of the auction light, a beautiful woman dressed in a red dress, with that charming people bone some vaporizing of the prettily sound for everyone in the field to understand the function of the object.
In the woman crisp vaporizing of sweetly, that is actually not very unusual item price, is a fiery speed climbing.
Looking for a remote location, Citis quietly sat down, his eyes swept the scene of the beautiful woman, with his eyesight, nature can see that most of the people, are for her.
Mittel Auction house Chief auctioneer: Ya Imperial concubine, Utan almost no one knows the beauty, the mature and charming amorous feelings, let a lot of men are bowed to her under the pomegranate skirt.
The Citis of meditation, the brow suddenly wrinkled, slightly too far, looking at the distance from their seats a hidden in the dark of the man, at this time, the man is staring at the stage of the eyes of the princess, both hands in the rosy Cherry small mouth slightly up, constantly under the body stirring up ...
"Holy cow! "Low scold a sound, under the cloak of Citis fierce look, this guy is too tough."
Heart swearing, Citis hurriedly moved away some position, some wry smile shook his head, eyes again sweeping to the podium, looking at the red Dress woman plump exquisite charming curve, whispered muttered: "Goblin." ”
The sight of the Citis in the hands of the goods swept sweep, is lost interest, he can not so much money to buy a waste back, even if the auction it is a beautiful woman, eyes from the woman, and then move slowly in the auction.
"Uh ... Father? "Move the eye suddenly of a meal, Citis to sit in the most front row position of a middle-aged man, now can not help a face startled and eccentric:" Is father also to this woman is interested? ”
Strange thoughts only exist moment is abandoned, because Citis found that the father's eyes, did not stop in the princess, a calm face, seems to be waiting for something.
"What did father come here for?" "The heart muttered a sound, Citis eyes again sweep, but is some consternation discovers, with Xiao House two other big family, Galle family, the two patriarch of the OSPAR family are here."
"Here are the things that are about to be auctioned in attracting them!" "Heart end, eyebrow pointed lightly pick, Citis some curious touch nose, what is actually the three big family patriarch to attract?"
......
I have to say, this woman is called the princess is a good player to mobilize the atmosphere, her smiles, will let the price of a burst of the field, and whenever this time, this woman will send to the place of the price of the charming smile, suddenly, was also in the meat of the price of the people, Lima energetic.
The atmosphere in the field, in this charming woman's cover mouth chuckle, always keep the climax.
"Oh, you guys, just received the same new auction, I think, you will be interested." Auction finished the hands of the goods, the princess suddenly smiles, Jade hand a wave, a attendants hastened to end a jade, plate has a white jade small bottle.
"This is the two Dan Medicine. "Sliding carefully picked up the white Jade Vial, the charming voice of the princess, let the auction will be a little quiet, a moment later, noisy sound immediately rang up, in the vindictive mainland, the most popular things, is the refining of a variety of Dan Medicine.
"This name builds the spirit fluid, only to the person under the bucket effective, uses this spirit fluid to invade the body to cultivate, can let the person under the bucket, the cultivation speed is accelerated!" Hehe, if you want to make your offspring become a young genius, don't let go of it. "Full of temptation of the red lip slightly open, spit out the crisp greasy sweetly, let the court all bones some numbness."
"Build the base spirit fluid?" To raise the speed of the fight? Miss Princess, that stage of the people, it seems not withstand the impact of Dan Medicine it? Although the princess is indeed beautiful and enchanting, but there are no lack of calm in the field, after a little silence, is someone ask.
"Oh, this spirit liquid through our auction Ghuni Master personally identified, product order belongs to two goods, will never problem, you can rest assured." Said the princess with a smile.
Listen to by Ghuni Master personally appraisal, the sound of the field immediately small a lot, everybody knows, Ghuni master is two quality, the whole Utan, even the patriarch of the three families to see him, also dare not have the slightest snub.
Citis in the chair, looking at the atmosphere of the heat, the heart can not help but a sigh of relief, it seems that the construction of the spirit of the liquid, should be able to bring a small harvest, eyes not traces of the move to his father, but found his face seems suddenly a little excited up.
Slightly one Leng, seem to think of what, Citis heart some moved.
"Oh, spirit liquid initial price in 8,000 gold coins, please bid!" "The Princess Smiles the way, the eye in the presence of move a circle, finally stopped in the front of the three big family patriarch body, her heart clear, these three, is the main competition."
"8,500! "The words of Ya Imperial Concubine just fall, is someone shout out price."
"9,000! "The sound of the fare increase is closely followed."
......
The price of the field is constantly churning, but only for a moment, it has been to the height of 10,003.
Citis's father, though somewhat agitated, but he did not immediately shout price, slightly closed his eyes, waiting for those little shrimp 哄闹 end.
Scramble again for a moment, the voice is finally weak down, at the same time, and Shan side by side with an old man, but is a faint noise: "20,000! ”
Shout Price a fall, the voice of the venue is quiet down, some popularity with expressionless old man, had to sit back frustrated, they can not strength and Galle family contend.
"Hey, Gaby, isn't your son already in the fight?" Why are you still playing the idea of a base spirit? "A middle-aged man, turning head simpering way."
"Obapa, can't I buy my future grandson?" "Gallebi obviously with this middle-aged man wrong way, direct cold smile.
"That will have to wait for you to have that blessing, maybe your son will be cut off one day ..." The heart Cursed a sound, Obapa also opened his mouth shouted: "23,000! ”
"20,005! ”
......
Less than 10 minutes, the audience in the eyes of consternation, two people unexpectedly like a vicious dog grab food general, the price to 30,001 of the order.
"40,000! The Shan in the closed eyes, suddenly make a noise.
The hall is a static, all eyes suddenly transferred to the Shan body, even that Obapa and Gallebi, is also his sudden high price to shock.
"Hey, Xiao Clan seems to be in the spirit of the base of the fluid is to be." "Gallebi laughs.
Shan glanced at him, faint tunnel: "You want, bid Rob is, I absolutely will not follow." ”
Gallebi Shameless, seems to be thinking Shan this words of true and false, a moment later, he shook his head, this time his aim is that thing, instead of this build spirit fluid, now recklessly spend money, is undoubtedly an unwise decision.
The other side of the Omapa, see Gallebi back, is also shrugged, build the spirit liquid although attractive, but also not his purpose, so, withdraw.
"The Shan patriarch bids 40,000 gold coins, can someone still increase the price?" "Looking at the calm field," said the princess with a smile.
Since no one increases the price, the Shan will be purchased by the patriarch. "See no one answered, the Princess is also good to accept, the hands of the small hammer, on the table lightly a knock, is set the buyer."
Remote, Citis Some laugh and cry, engaged in a half-day, even blackmail to his father head up.
"Oh, below, is the auction will be the bottom of the auction!" "Will the Jade bottle to accept, the elegant concubine Jade hand a wave, the high stage lamplight is dim down, slightly bends, takes out a silver plate, in the silver plate, has a roll of Cyan's simple scrolls."
The scroll was a little green, and it was quite mysterious against the silver platter.
"Advanced Power Method: Wind Roll!" ”                                       
 
 
23rd Chapter Scramble for
A few words of the high level of the advanced work Law, pat the venue, suddenly quiet.
Compared with the previous construction of the spirit liquid, Dou Qi-gong method caused by the sensation, no doubt more shocking.
Although Dan Medicine is precious, but can only be used for a while, and Dou Qigong method, but can be used for a lifetime, or even, can be passed on to future generations, from a certain point of view, higher-order bucket Qigong method, than Dan Medicine, but also to make people crazy!
After all, as long as there is a higher-order work law, even without the support of the panacea, it will sooner or later become a strong one side, and if there is no work law, only the elixir, it is the Dan medicine as beans to eat, it is difficult to become a real strong.
After a moment of shock, some people have come back to God, a pair of hot eyes, staring at the stage of the Blue scrolls, even the charming and moving of the princess, seems to have been forgotten at this moment.
Sitting in the rear of the Citis gently spit out a sigh of relief, the advanced work method? Wonder...... This level of work, than they Xiao House the most top of the wrath of the Lions, but also higher level, no wonder today Utan the three families of the patriarch all came here, the original is to play this thing attention.
"The Advanced Level ..." the eyes leisurely in the blue scroll over, Citis subconsciously licked lip, as long as who owns this scroll, then he has become a strong passport, decades later, Utan, will also appear a and three big family equal force.
"It's just a matter of the advanced work method, what's so strange about it?" "In Citis some sigh of time, the old voice of medicine, but is not suitable for the heart rang up."
"Just ..." turned over the eyes, Citis with this vision has been high to the sky to the old man is unable to communicate, had to leave twitched, keep silent.
"Little Man, Peace of mind, and so you become the bucket of the day, I let you see what is called higher-order work Method!" The old medicine is silent after the words.
Sipping chuckle, Citis muttered: "Hope." ”
......
"Gentlemen, this volume of the Xuan-order method is a hunter lucky to get in the mountains, should be left by the predecessors, the origin of orthodoxy, and will not bring any trouble, we can feel at ease to buy." "Princess Jade Hand gently picked up the blue scroll, smiling way."
"Miss Princess, hurry up and quote the price!" "There are people out there who can't wait to yell.
The beautiful cheek maintains the charming smile, the elegant concubine smiles the way: "The wind is decided, the auction reserve price , 200,000 gold coins!" "
This sky-high price, the venue immediately quiet a lot, obviously, many people simply do not have the strength to eat this thing.
Remote, Citis can not help shaking his head, this woman is really hidden, too ruthless, 200,000 gold coins, it is a full Xiao house two years of profits ah.
The front row of the Shaw War Three, in this price, the dough is shaking, but they are helpless, this thing, a willing to fight, a willing to get, you do not buy, some people buy.
Under the sky-high price of 200,000, the scene was a bit chilly.
Faced with some awkward situation of the ice, the princess did not have any strange look, the smile is still charming, she is very clear that the appeal of the Xuan-order method, some people, I am afraid even if it is ruined, but also want to put this thing in the bag.
As she expected, the silence did not last long, a somewhat bald middle-aged man first trembling shouted out the price: "210,000!" ”
Citis eyes along the voice glanced, he knew this bald middle-aged, this is Utan arms tycoon, almost monopolized the Utan arms sales, although the power than the three families, but in the Wootan city, also is a figure.
"230,000! "In the middle aged shouting price, a yellow-clothed old man followed."
Yellow clothes Elder is Wootan City Big Medicine merchant, under the hand has several medicinal herbs shop, the wealth is also rich.
Eyes mercilessly stare old man, bald middle-aged again shouted: 240,000! ”
In the venue, 00 of the rise and fall of the sound, after all, 200,000 of the high price, enough to deter too many people.
"300,000! "At the back of the two people have been forcible, the first row of Gallebi, finally the cold noise."
Gallebi the price of an export, two people is soft down, reluctantly shook his head, the back of the shrink.
"330,000! "In Utan, the Galle family can compete with the Xiao House and the Obama family, and now the bid is the Obama clan patriarch, Obapa."
A cold glanced at the Obapa, adding Billens: 350,000! ”
The Canthus smokes, Obapa crack mouth way: 370,000! ”
"380,000! ”
"400,000! ”
In the face of the constant increase in Obapa, Gallebi not hesitate to go up to Lima, as if a pair of potential in the appearance,
When the price stayed at 430,000, Obapa had to stop the competition, 430,000, enough to put the Obama family in the economic crisis.
"450,000! "See Obapa Retreat, Gallebi haven't had time to rejoice, Shan faint voice, but also let him face gloomy."
Cold eyes mercilessly Shan a glance, add to the heart is full of anger, three families, Xiao House and the Obama family have the upper level of the middle of the fight Qigong method, and only he added family, only the lower level of the work method, so, Gallebi this, really intend to am.
In Obapa's gloating eyes, added the way of the gnashing of teeth : 460,000! "
"500,000! "The face indifferent Shan, reported to let full of uproar of sky-high prices."
On the platform, looking for the fiery two people, the princess that beautiful smile, it is tempting a bit.
"550,000! "The eyes are slightly suffused with the red silk, after a moment of silence, add row after end of the cold drink."
"You have won." "To the surprise of all people, Shan heard Gallebi's offer, but is a slight smile, directed at Gallebi joking Way."
Face some stunned, a moment later, Gallebi face sank down, back to his sober, at this time just know that he was played ...
"Xiao War, you ruthless!" Remember me! "Hate to stare at Shan one eye, add column to look at some startled elegant concubine, anger is big Sheng, but he is not the street bully, gloomy face, as far as possible suppressed anger:" Miss ya, the end of it? ”
Not because of the glare of Gallebi and what color expression, the Princess insipid smile, drooping eyes, with a touch of ridicule and banter, jade hand of the small hammer, in addition to Liebi tightly gaze, knocked down.
"Wind roll, by the Gallebi Patriarch Pat buy success !"
Looking at the end of the scene, Citis unbearable chuckle smiled, slowly stood up son, line out of the auction.
"Alas, take the money to get the hand, began to work hard, a year later, but also to give father a surprise." When he went out, Citis murmured with a low smile.                                         
 
 
24th Chapter Everything to be Continued
Out of an auction, Citis again back to the treasure room, in that middle-aged awe of the eyes, quietly turn from praise waiting.
After a long while, a few hurried footsteps sound alien came, two figures, push the door and into.
"Oh, this is the master of the construction of the spirit liquid?" Should Sir come to Utan for the first time? "Shanfeng hit, vaporizing jiao tired of light laughter, suddenly in Citis ears sounded, let his apex slightly trembling.
Heart Scold a goblin, Citis will face into the cloak, the eyes slightly moved to stand beside the red skirt woman.
Close to the contact, Citis once again appreciate this woman's mature charming, Qiao Laugh Yan Hee Qiao face above, a pair of water yin Yin Long long beauty mou, it seems that the moment in the temptation to release the men, the eyes are not traces of the move over the slender and elegant jade neck, but is almost by the deep White gully to suck in, water snake-like narrow waist, swaying between , Temptation Tiancheng, people would like to be forced to press on the ground to flog the desire.
The skin is slightly hot, but fortunately, with a cloak of cover, the princess is also see not clear, the moment forced to hold the heart of the 旖, Citis slightly nodded, and at the same time, the old voice of medicine, but also dry out of the outgoing: "The auction was successful?" Give me the money, I have something! ”
Seemed to be somewhat surprised at the age of the master under the black robe, Princess Jade hand covered with red lip softly smiled, chest of a pair of plump row up the heart-stirring radian, chuckle will, ya Imperial concubine This just smiles way: "Please old gentleman again wait, some formalities, still in processing." ”
Slightly nodded, Citis no longer openings, will look away from this woman, and then keep silent.
Looking at the body wrapped in the black cloak of the cape in front of the figure, Princess Dai eyebrow gently wrinkled, it seems that their proud appearance in front of the mysterious people did not achieve what effect, the present helpless to skim the rosy mouth, the eyes obscure from the mysterious person swept over, want from some small to distinguish the identity of the latter.
Scanning over, the princess heart some disappointment, eyes and side of the Ghuni master touched a bit, the bell teeth lightly biting red lip, soft voice asked: "The old gentleman, the princess rarely see not wearing a badge of the Alchemist, do not know the old man last name?" ”
How Female doll, come to this place, still have to report identity not? Under the black robe, the medicine was old and faint.
"Oh, the princess is just curious, the old gentleman if do not want to say, ya concubine nature dare not ask." The Princess giggled.
Eyes through the edge of the cloak, looking at the side of the pair of white feet in the tight red dress, Citis some helpless, this princess can become Mittel auction house chief auctioneer, Nature will not be fuel-efficient lights, all said beauty trouble, Wootan City peep her beautiful people do not know what a few, but today, but never heard who really achieved the purpose, Although there are many Temille auction for the background, but no one dare to think that this woman is only a beautiful vase.
With such a shrewd woman together, Citis is almost a little on thin ice, he dreaded this fine as hair of the woman will find something, but fortunately, there is the old drug resistance, this does not know the story of the old fox, can not be next to the slightest temptation of the Goblin.
In the cold reply of the old medicine, the Princess has not been able to set out the slightest useful words to get to the end, the woman had to give up the idea, smiles took out a personal crystal card, card painted with Temille family emblem: "Old gentleman, this is Temille auction VIP card, As long as Mr. Card to any one of the Temille family's auction houses will receive VIP treatment, at the same time, the auction will pay the tax rate from 5% to 2%. ”
Smell speech, Citis picked the brow, compared with the front of a chase nonsense, he prefers this substantive things, now slightly pondered, is to hand over the crystal card.
Looking at the long white palm out of the black robe, the Princess MoU glanced across a touch of surprise, clearly sound old dry, but have a pair of like a youthful clean palm, this person, what is the identity?
At this time, a maid ran from outside, a green card respectfully handed to the princess.
"The old man, build the Spirit liquid auction out the price of 40,000 gold coins, deducted 2% of the tax, the rest, all here." The princess smiled and forwarded the green Card.
Take the green card, Citis Heart finally relieved, oneself after the cultivation of capital, can all here ah, this money, enough to let oneself peace of mind to fight the level bar ...
Since the money has been hand, Citis also do not want to stay, to the princess casually waved, the old voice light tunnel: "I can go?" ”
"Oh, of course, the old gentleman if still need to auction what Dan Medicine, can have to care about Temille auction." The princess smiled at me.
Well "At random, Citis stood up, the head did not return to the line of the lives of the room."
Looking at the Citis disappeared figure, the smile slowly converge on the face of the princess, Dai Eyebrow Light, walked to the table, some lazy leaning on the chair, Curve Barb.
"Uncle Ghuni, is he really an alchemist?" "A little silence for a while," asked The princess softly.
"Well, and the alchemy will only be stronger than me, at least, the two-product of the construction of the spirit liquid, I can not make it out." Ghuni to the Royal Concubine Gong Gong Sound, sigh way.
"Not even with a prescription?" "The eyes are slightly narrowed, the rosy lips of the princess are slightly upturned, like a casual way."
Listen to the words of the princess, Ghuni face a surprised, hurried way: "The prescription is the lifeblood of each pharmacist, Miss can not go to hit his idea, feel free to annoy an unknown grade of the Alchemist, even the Temille family, also difficult to withstand the anger, decades ago, At that time the famous Udagama Empire of the family is because want to move Dan King Ancient river prescription idea, finally Leng was someone else please move four fights King Strong, will family destroyed a clean, this matter to the end, is even Udagama Imperial Royal family, also dare not to interfere ! "
"Even now our family is far more powerful than the house of checkers, however, do not easily offend some of the mystery of the pharmacist as well, you know, the Alchemist is a poisonous honeycomb, as long as you poke, he can find countless friends, but also have a lot of strong, very happy to let an alchemist owe them a favor. ”
Looking at some of the Ghuni, the princess reluctantly rubbed the smooth forehead, wry smile way: "Uncle Ghuni, what do you say, I have to hit his idea, you really when ya concubine these years of experience white." ”
"I'm not reminding you." "Listen to the words of the princess, Ghuni is also a sigh of relief, he is really afraid of this NH to do something stupid."
Skim a small mouth, the Princess Jade hand holding the fragrant cheek, gently sighed, refining pharmacists, is really a group of scary people, but why they do not have this talent?                                         
 
 
25th Chapter Money by me Out
Sneaking into his room, Citis quickly close the door, and then quickly into the corner of the room, and finally from the bosom of a large pile of herbs and a few magic crystal, carefully placed into the cupboard, deep smelling the smell of the medicinal herbs, hey, smiled a sigh of relief.
In order to be able to devote himself to the cultivation, this Citis a full purchase of eight months of the amount of medicinal herbs, look at this appearance, his remaining days this year, is intended to spend in the penance.
Intimate patted the cabinet, Citis corner of the mouth, lazy line to the bed, a soft down, big Half-day rush, can really let him some tired.
"Phlogistic son, in?" "Some confusion, the knock suddenly came in."
Opened his eyes, Citis quickly jumped out of bed, and then opened the door, looking at the door outside the Shan, took the head, smiled and asked: "Father, what?" ”
"Nothing can come to you?" You have been hiding from me for two months. "The huge palm rubbing Citis's head, Shan laughing."
Looking at Shan that warm alcohol smile, Citis heart some moved, smoked a little sour nose, but is not know what to say.
"Are you still blaming yourself for that?" Oh, she does not see my son, is her loss, what a good sad, big man, why do this little daughter gesture, I know, my son, Shaw War is not waste! "Shan the heroic way."
"Hehe, father, three years later, the phlogistic son will go to cloud Lan Zong personally." smiled, Citis softly.
Shan smile slightly convergent, eyes fixed on Citis, some hesitation way: "Father is nothing, you ... Are you sure you want to go? Father does not say you do not compare with the "cloud LAN, but the strength of the Pope ...
Citis smiled, nodded, thin lips into a somewhat stubborn line: "Father, some things, can not hide, is a man, have to bear." ”
"Oh, this temper, but and I like, two brothers know you can think so, I am afraid also very happy." "For Citis persistent, Shan gratified smile, sigh a cry, immediately heavy place nodded:" Good, father is waiting for my son to earn my face time! I want to Lansu that old bastard that day with the dowry begging me to take back the original paper on the card! ”
Citis nodded, laugh.
"Here, to you, as a father to your sponsorship!" From the bosom pulls out a Citis extremely familiar white Jade bottle, Shan will pass it over.
Looking at this turn a few laps, and then back to their hands on the construction of the spirit liquid, Citis heart some distress, but his face, but is to maintain a puzzled expression: "Father, this is?" ”
"Build the spirit liquid, can speed up the fight the gas cultivation speed, today pats buys." Shan cracked his mouth with a smile.
"A lot of money, huh?" "Took the white Jade bottle, Citis Heart has the warm current drips over."
"40,000 gold coins, but as long as it is useful to you, it is also worth the value of the matter." Shan don't care to smile.
"You spend 40,000 gold coins to buy me this build spirit liquid, elder elders them, I am afraid again to this excuse to trouble." Citis wry smile way.
"Psssssssssssst, I'm the long one, and they're the only ones who can do it." "Shan," said the cold hum.
"Father, thank you, a year later in the adult ceremony, I will let their mouths all shut." Citis sipped chuckle, smiled lightly.
"Well, I wait for my son to change again the moment!" "Although do not know where Citis confidence, but Shan to his son this confident appearance is extremely happy, now laughing."
"Well, does not hinder you to rest, has the matter to look for the father, the own, has what to be embarrassed." "Put a hand, Shan turned is striding toward the front yard line."
"Damn, still have to deal with those old undead, not just spent 40,000 gold coins, one is anxious to eat your coffin is the same." Faint, Shan murmur scold sound, fluttering in the dark.
Looking at the Shan disappeared in the dark, Citis touched the nose, smiled and whispered: "Rest assured, Father, I will use the reality, let those guys shut up, three years ago, I can let them look up, three years later, I can still!" ”
Queue in the doorway after a long while, Citis close the white jade bottle in the hand, oblique glanced at the corner, jokingly way: "NH, listen to people talk, very funny?" ”
"Citis elder brother, feeling very keen ..." Corner, purple skirt girl, tiny little head, small, beautiful little face above, Smile Yin Yin.
Looking at a girl with a playful face, Citis shook his head helplessly.
"Where did Citis brother go this afternoon?" The lotus step moves lightly, the lavender son walks up to come forward, Smile asks.
"Casually went out to stroll." ”
"Is it?" Eyes looked up and down in the eyes of the eyes, smoked son suddenly step forward, slightly curved body, qiao nasal wrinkle: "There is a woman's fragrance." ”
"Cough, don't be noisy, there is no woman taste." "The young face is a little red, but in the dark, the girl is not too clear."
Hehe "Seems to like the dilemma of Citis, smoked a silver bell-like smile, a moment later, stopped the laughter, a little Silence, softly Way:" Uncle Shaw's words, I heard, I believe Citis brother, ah ... If you really want to go to cloud haze in the future, you can help.
Smell words, Citis winked, eyes tightly staring at the girl beautiful little face.
In Citis this not convergence of eyes, lavender elegant little face slowly floating on a blush of blushed red, whispered blame way: "Citis brother, you see what?"
"Hey, the lavender also blush, is very rare." A moment later, Citis suddenly smiled.
Smoked son white Citis one eye, the heart muttered a way: "You will so stare at others to see." ”
"Well, well, a little faith in Citis brother, Cloud Haze, although strong, but I am still young, plenty of time, that cloud rhyme can coddle cashier orchid sweet kind of woman, presumably not better where to go." Citis smiled and rubbed the girl's black hair, laughing.
"Well, it's late, go back to rest." ”
Looking at the waving of the Citis, smoked son reluctantly shook his head, had to nod, and then in his eyes, slowly marched the dark.
Turned a corridor, the room suddenly came Shan and several elders of the quarrel, and the purpose of the quarrel, exactly is that 40,000 gold coins to go.
Footsteps of a meal, Liu Mei micro-wrinkle, sigh a sigh of relief, slender Jade refers to a clip, a purple Gold card appears in the fingers.
Fingertips on the purple Gold card on top of a flick, gold into a touch of gold into the bickering room.
Casual glanced suddenly quiet down the room, Lavender Light tunnel: "The money that builds the spirit liquid, when I out of it, there are 100,000 gold coins in the card, several elders do not have to embarrass Uncle Shaw." ”
Room, a silence, a moment later, just spread three elders wry smile should be sound.                                      
 
 
26th chapter on Penance
"Octupole! ”
Between the mountains, the trees, the cold drink, suddenly sounded.
A swift shadow leaps through the woods, and the thorns between the trees do not bring him any hindrance.
Under the flitting, the shadow of a strong half centimeter in front of a big tree stopped before the body, two feet, a fault, half oblique body, elbow fierce in the back of the big tree.
Bang "A muffled, sawdust splash, Spider-like crack, along the elbow, spreads spread."
"Crunch ..." was an elbow blown out of the half of the empty tree, the creaking of the shaking of the sound, a moment later, finally powerless to the ground.
As the tree fell, the vigorous shadow of a spirit monkey beat back into shape, and then fell lightly on a blue boulder.
Looking at the results of his own, Citis handsome little face, full of joy smile, three months, this is his first successful use of octupole collapse of this advanced level of fighting technology, and this so-called can be comparable to the Octupole collapse also did not disappoint Citis expectations, is only the sixth paragraph of the gas, play out the destructive power, It's more than eight fights!
......
The first step of the bucket of gas to the back, the slower the upgrade speed, since the last purchase of complete drugs, Citis has been behind closed doors painstakingly repaired three months, in the last few days of the third month, Citis this just in an accidental, from five paragraph of the gas, jumped to the sixth paragraph ...
Three months have raised the air of a fight, although this speed than the previous two months seems to be a lot slower, but Citis is very satisfied, think that year, he was a full cultivation of six months, only from five paragraph of the gas, to reach the sixth paragraph, now this speed, has been very scary.
......
Issued a octupole collapse, Citis is like being suddenly squeezed dry water sponge general, Acid hemp pain, constantly erode the nerves, the veins on the arm, cramp-like slightly beat, it is a sign of excessive force.
Licked the mouth, Citis difficult to slightly overdo, looking at his right hand elbow, where, has been a red.
"Hiss ..." the mouth of a crack, Citis suck a mouthful of breath, wry smile muttered way: "No wonder to undergo so harsh beaten training, otherwise, this hit use out, break is not a tree, but my arm, this octupole collapse, is in the flesh than whose body is more hard." ”
The whole body is weak lying on the cold Boulder, Citis slightly shortness of breath, is slowly steadily down, but the body of the acid hemp feeling, let him no longer want to move a finger.
To Citis at this time the sixth paragraph of the gas, can only use a octupole collapse, and after use, he will completely off, until the physical response.
Citis Yang Head, micro-squint eyes, lazy looking at the blue sky floating clouds, the wind blows, blowing a wisp of black hair flapping on the forehead.
Deep body, absorbed for several months of the construction of the fluid, but also at this moment from all corners of the body, quietly penetrated, without traces of the repair of tired muscles and cells, so that they can with the fastest speed, to the master to bring strength.
"Teacher, how long will it take me to enter the seventh paragraph?" "Micro-close eyes, Citis suddenly export whispered."
As long as Jin entered the seventh paragraph, then he has to enter the Grudge court to find work law qualifications, although now he has not seen the Shaw family of those fighting Qigong method, but they must have this qualification, because it is related to their father's face.
A gust of wind, the medicine of the old transparent body, appeared at the side of the boulder.
Staring at the young man with a smile in his eyes, the medicine old first looked the ground to break the tree, slightly nods, slightly pondered, smiled: "Your cultivation speed somewhat is not my anticipation, originally I thought even if has the spirit fluid the help, you also need one year to enter the seventh paragraph ... Perhaps because the previous repressed too intense, now bounce up, you are more crazy, according to this progress, within two months, must be able to enter the seventh paragraph of the gas. ”
Smelling words, Citis lips raised a faint radian, he would like to know, those who in the past three years to their mockery of the people, when they see their own display of strength, what will be the expression? My own day in the hall to the words of the LAN Yan, it is also not in the said to them?
"I Citis three years ago to create a miracle, three years later, I still can!" "Eyes slightly flashing, Citis think half a year ago, that in the hall all kinds of disdain mocking eyes, juvenile that some lonely figure, stubborn and persistent!"
"The LAN Yan, I am step by step toward you to climb over, you meditate wait, three years later, we, Cloud Haze Pope See!" ”
Corner of the mouth suddenly provoked a wipe quite unruly, the teenager jumped up the body, looking up at the endless Sky roar roar.
Looking at the roar of the young, medicine, the old slight smile, not blocked, people, need pressure will mature, now Citis, talent enough, need, is a kind of pressure! The appearance of the Lan Yan, for he erected the best pressure.
"Take her as your test stone bar, the road of the strong, you still have a long distance!" ”
"Go, go home and cultivate!" ”
Roar a few voice, Citis small face smile is happy a few, jump under Boulder, to the medicine old one wave, Lang smiled at the foot of the mountain.                                      
 
 
27th Chapter Impact Seventh Paragraph
Time like water, always inadvertently, quietly slipped through the fingers.
The hot summer has been replaced by the cool autumn, green and lush branches, is also beginning to doping on the point of yellow.
Still is the neat hut, the sunlight sprinkles, the spot four cloth.
In the room of the wooden basin, juvenile eyes closed, the hands of the seal, breathing, as in heaven.
Half a year of hard repair, so that the young handsome face on the innocent more than a touch of perseverance, tightly-squeezed lips, a bit stubborn, the body as white as a woman's skin, in a few months of beatings training, has been slightly yellow, seemingly not how strong small body, but it contains a leopard like the general fierce explosive.
No matter from what point of view, juvenile, seems to be a terrible speed, carry out a metamorphosis, when this transformation is complete, will let anyone feel shocked!
In the youth that extremely fluent breathing, a trace of silk mixed with a little bit of cyan airflow, slowly from the trough of the infiltration from the tub, and finally along with the breathing of the teenager, poured into its body.
......
"Today will be able to break through the seventh paragraph of the gas!" ”
is in the cultivation, Citis heart suddenly out of a confidence full of ideas come, the idea came some no reason, but is like the general, the appearance in his heart.
In the first one months, Citis has hit the seventh paragraph several times, but without exception, it ended in failure.
Perhaps because of today's practice for the impending overflow of the basin to add the last drop of water for the sake of it, that let Citis look forward to the idea of a long time, it is so abrupt appeared.
The sudden thought let Citis handprint trembling, almost a grasp from the state of cultivation quit, but fortunately Citis fixed force is good, forcibly suppressed the heart of the touch of excitement, breath-holding attentively, efforts to his mind, appease and down.
Breathing slowly smooth, Citis began to absorb the energy of the outside world, in preparation for the impact of the seventh paragraph needs.
In the tub, the cyan water is slightly undulator, the splendor flashes, a silk gentle energy air flow, sends out from the water liquid, scrambling to drill into the Citis body.
Light Cyan Air more and more, just a moment, not only the body of the Citis completely cover up, even the huge wooden basin, is just looming, far from looking, quite singular.
In Citis such an endless request, the color of the water in the basin of cyan, also began to be visible to the naked eye of the speed of light.
Because of the influx of energy, Citis's small face slightly flushed, and faint Tanqing light through the hair.
The impact of the seventh paragraph of the Citis, no doubt has become a large magnet, not only in the surrounding space in the fight of the gas in its rapid sucking, even the Tanqing liquid in the tub, is also beginning to appear a small water swirl.
First-order nine-paragraph bucket of gas, one to three paragraphs for the lower level, four to six paragraphs for intermediate, seven to nine paragraphs for advanced.
The seventh paragraph of the gas, can be said to be the first stage of the gas watershed, as long as set foot in the seventh paragraph, then is entered the advanced level of the first step, at this time, its body stored in the fight of the gas, will be the sixth paragraph of the gas several times, so, the seventh paragraph of the gas, generally also considered to be the first key to the bucket, its importance, Self - evident.
With the rapid flow of cyan gas gush, in the tub, cyan liquid color more and more pale, finally, at a certain moment, the cyan liquid, once again into a basin of clear water crystal clear.
Without the energetic support of the Citis, the pale cyan on the face is slowly fading down, now he can only from the whole body of the air, to absorb the thin bucket of gas to maintain the impact of the use.
Absorption of the air in the fight although also can support Citis to complete the impact, however, this takes time, not only longer, and then even if the breakthrough, the body of the fight, but also need to warm up the January, in order to return to filling the point.
Now the Citis, the most missing, is time!
In the spirit of liquid medicine disappears suddenly, Citis finger black ring light flash, a drop of emerald color of the need to build the base spirit liquid, once again projected into the wood basin, immediately, transparent water, but also into the color of dark cyan.
With a drop of fresh spirit liquid support, Citis spirit spirits, in the heart of the old thanks to the medicine after a sound, his hands to maintain the printing knot at the same time, the mind control breathing, crazy absorption of the intense energy.
The endless request in the last half an hour, finally began gradually slowed down, and at this time, the deep cyan water, has become a little bit of light.
When the last ray of gentle energy is drilled into the body by breathing, Citis body, a little quiet, immediately fierce a burst of intense trembling, alvine small contraction, Citis eyes suddenly open, the eyes of the dark, pale two-color light rapidly brushed, mouth slightly Zhang Big, a bit cloudy gas, was spit out ...
Turbid gas a body, Citis small face, immediately the spirit of a few.
Open Eyes Leng A long while, Citis this just twisted the neck, issued a crisp bone sound, the palm slightly shook, a feeling of full strength, let Citis mouth provoked a touch of joy.
"Finally the seventh paragraph ..."
Slightly close the eyes, Shen Shen Induction of the body that filled with the gas, Citis low smile murmured.                                         
 
 
The 28th chapter strengthens " the suction palm "
Lying in the tub, the body in the cold spirit liquid, Citis some indulge in the body of the feeling of full strength, according to the usual breakthrough mode, generally in the seventh paragraph will have a period of time after the warm period, and the Citis with the construction of the spirit of liquid, but is directly skipped this period, reached the filling stage.
Sitting in the tub for a while, after a happy mood gradually calmed down, Citis this just slowly stand up, naked body stained with Tanqing of water, in the reflection of the sun, show off the splendor.
Lazy extension of a stretch, the body of the skeleton, as if reborn general, sounded a crisp bang roaster sound.
Random twist turned, Citis right hand to the bed above a recruit, suction jet, immediately put clothes into the palm.
"Yes, there is plenty of fighting gas, with the current created by the suction, should be able to tweezers to move a person's weight?" "Wear clothes, Citis brows," murmured Unfortunately, this ' suction palm ', does not seem to have much damage, the so-called forcible extraction of blood in the opponent's body, can only deal with the lower level than their own people, on the same level or senior opponents, but some beyond the reach of ...
Think of here, Citis some regrets sigh a sigh of relief, this can be regarded as his first fight skill ah.
SIP chuckle, Citis just want to step out of the tub, heart abrupt move.
Eye pupil slightly exudes inexplicable light, Citis right palm slowly curl, eyes tightly stare at his palm, a moment later, the palm is half a foot distance, aimed at a vase.
Licking the lips, Citis in the body of the fight in the air did not go through any particular vein, so stiff from the palm of the heart of the eruption out of ...
Vindictive outside, at least need to master level, can reluctantly do so, Citis this move, in addition to create a moderate breeze, there is no other half effect.
The breeze from the palm of the heart gush out, the vase blew violently shook a few, almost is to fall down the table ...
Grudge not out, Citis not only not disappointed, but a face happy, some excited to rub the hand, quickly back a few meters, right palm again aimed at the vase.
"Suck the palm !" A light drink, the powerful suction immediately to the vase pulled rapidly to Citis.
The vase is about to arrive in front of the Citis three feet, Citis hand in the heart of suddenly a suction, in the body of the air all from the palm of the vent, suddenly, a strong wind pressure, mercilessly blowing in the rapid flying vase above.
Bang ”
Two strands in the direction of the opposite force, met in midair, and as the meeting center of the vase, but it is a bang, into a small fragment, bursts of fire.
Looking at the effect of the palm of their own, Citis small face, full of surprises, suction and thrust against the touch, the damage caused by far more than he expected.
Although the body's full of fighting gas has been depleted in the previously manufactured thrust, but Citis is extremely excited, the reverse thrust, he just use the lowest level of the operation of the way to play out, this way not only the largest consumption, but also achieved a small effect is poor, And if he can have a similar suction palm such a special use of suction thrust bucket technology, then the two-phase cooperation, he is sure that the results achieved will be extremely fierce!
"Little guy, nice ... I can think of this to strengthen the "suction palm." The finger on the ring light flicker, the medicine old waft out, looking at the room fragments, slightly nod, praise channel.
Citis hey a smile, eyeball son in medicine old body grunt, a face to please the meaning.
"If there is a fighting skill that is dedicated to pushing back, then refine to the point of perfection, then you this low level of suction palm, on the attack, I am afraid to be able to be comparable to the middle or advanced fighting skills ..." seems to have not seen Citis's face, medicine old selfish said. "
"Teacher, you also know this kind of similar auxiliary bucket skill rare, I can get this to take the palm, still rely on luck, now you let me go to where to find a can with the suction palm of the auxiliary fighting skill AH? Citis the head, seems to be some helpless tunnel.
"Don't make your innocent appearance, you just want to again from me." "White Citis one eye, medicine old twitched way."
"You have not thought of this idea before, but these two kinds of fighting skills are similar to the auxiliary bucket technology, it is difficult to find, so, few people really gather together." ”
"Not even teachers?" "Smell speech, Citis small face immediately pulled down, depressed unceasingly, did not specifically play the thrust of the bucket technology, relying on their own vindictive presses, no doubt is a kind of action."
Look at Citis dejected appearance, the medicine old funny shake shake head, the finger rubs forehead, ponder way: "Before someone asked me to refine medicine, I seem to have received this kind of fighting skills, if not the hands of just have a spare Dan medicine, I will not deal with that person, this matter too long, but today is you remind me, I'm afraid I really want to forget. ”
"Well ... Got it. The finger moved away from his forehead, and then in Citis's ecstatic gaze, it was lighter on his forehead.
By the point of the forehead, Citis head slightly a rise, a lot of information into which, after a long while, just gradually clear over.
"Blow fire Palm: Low level, can create strong gale pressure!" ”
Simple description and the name of the old fashioned, so that the low-level four words is extremely shabby.
"The founder of this thing is a blacksmith, a lifetime of iron, because the needs of the fire, the result inexplicably created the fighting technology ..." Looking at the small face some stiff Citis, the medicine old jokingly smile.
Turned over the eyes, Citis some admire the blacksmith's ability to create bucket skills is not so easy to iron embryo.
Blowing the palm of the fire is not difficult to learn, under the guidance of the old medicine, Citis spent two hours, is the initial grasp of its know-how.
Standing in the room, Citis eager to look at the room's only vase, deep breath, palm a roll, suction wild: "Suction palm!" ”
Along the strong suction, the vase directly to the Shanti fly away.
Eyes tightly staring at the vase, Citis right hand hurriedly withdraw to take the palm, and then the body of the air, along the thread of the fire palm running.
"Blow the palm of the fire!" ”
In the vase is about to hit the head of the time, the wind pressure, fierce from the Citis palm of the heart, suddenly, the room, dust diffuse.
Bang ”
is also a crisp sound of the muffled sound, the vase, unexpectedly directly by two strands of power, blown into the sky.
"Good ..."
Covered with white powder out of the dust zone, looking at the effect achieved, Citis eyes glow, as long as they can convert the two kinds of bucket technology, it is absolutely enough to let any people who are not prepared to eat big losses.
Pat on the body of white crumbs, Citis heart know, in the last three months, they have a training task.
After March, it was their rite of passage ...
"Hey, maybe a lot of people are looking forward to my embarrassing, right?" "In the midst of a messy house, the young man sneered softly.                                         
 
 
Chapter 29th Important Days
In the March, the blink of an eye is a rush to the past, and the distance from Citis's adult ritual is only January.
In the Tidy hut, the Citis eyes Leng to look at the blue water in the tub, this is the final construction of the spirit liquid, fighting the gas to the back of a few paragraphs, the more difficult to cultivate, since the last breakthrough to the seventh paragraph, Citis body of the fighting gas has been quiet nearly two months, two months, no matter how he cultivate, the sense of breakthrough, has never been seen.
A fool generally stare at the wood basin for a long time, Citis this just reluctantly shook his head, muttered: "Do not know to rely on this last drop to build the spirit liquid, can break through to the eighth paragraph of the gas?" ”
Slowly stood straight some acid hemp body, Citis unexpectedly did not continue to cultivate the gas, but from the wardrobe out a set of decent black clothes ...
In the first January of the rite of passage, everyone was required to participate in a forecast the function of prediction is naturally to remove those who fail to fight, and the people who fight in the seventh paragraph, after the completion of the rite of passage, will be able to gain entry into the Grudge court for the purpose of seeking work law, and those under the seventh shall be deprived of this right, As soon as the rite of passage is over, it will be assigned to the family's various industries, and it is difficult to become an internal family again if it is not outstanding or catching up with other good people at the speed of cultivation ...
Just changed clothes, at the door, but there is a gentle knock on the door.
"Citis brother, in?" ”
Listen to the voice of the girl crisp, Citis eyebrow pick pick, buckle good clothes, hands grabbed the wooden basin, hid to the hidden corner, this just leisurely line to the door, will one pull out.
The door was opened, the warm sunshine immediately threw into the, according to the young man in black shirt, look particularly spiritual.
Outside the door, young girl slim, refreshing light green clothing decoration will be the shape of the body perfect foil, clothes cover the small chest, although some green, but still proud of the release of the Temptation of youth, unbearable yingying a grip of the small waist, random bundle of a purple unofficially engaged, breeze blowing, purple band fluttering ...
Looking at the door of this charming girl, Citis Leng for a good moment, just slowly back to God, up and down looked at the smoke, Tut's amazement: "Early in the morning, I thought it was where the goddess came, and look, the original is my home smoked son ah." ”
Listen to Citis this slightly some kind of joking praise and laughter, the eyes of the big eye blink, but reserved to sip a small mouth slightly smile, however, the pair of quietly curved into a beautiful crescent Liu Mei, but is the way out of the girl's heart joy.
Eyes with a bit of joy, lavender Son is also breeze exquisite chin, looking at the open door and out of the juvenile.
Nearly a year of penance, let Citis off a bit childish, comely small face, a few inexplicable lingering charm, long time physical training, also makes Citis body strong and strong, a black shirt set in body, the whole person looks, but also is a handsome teenager.
Out of the room, the backhand close the door, looking at his eyes stare at their own blink does not blink of the fumigation, Citis some startled looked at himself, puzzled asked: "Nothing wrong?" ”
Qiao Mei small face slightly a red, chuckle quickly removed the eye, the Smile way: "Go, Citis brother, today is the forecast day Oh, are you ready?" ”
Eyes micro-squint, Citis shrugged, mouth provoked a touch of quite unruly, flat the palm slowly grip, light smile: "The name of the waste, from today onwards, give to those who give me!" ”
Looking at the Citis of confidence, the small head of lavender, gently smiled: "I believe Citis brother!" ”
"Of course you do, I'm afraid. Citis white Her one eye, twitched helpless tunnel.
Looking at a somewhat depressing Citis, smoked son smile, slightly nodded, lovely Booth threw, laughed: "The third paragraph to the seventh paragraph of the gas, only a year less than the time, Citis brother's cultivation talent, even if it is smoked son, is too far to go ..."
"Let's go, NH!" ”
Citis touched the nose, palm intimate patted smoked son's head, and then a wave, to the family behind the training ground walk.
Looking at the juvenile and before the lonely sadly different back, smoked son gratified a smile, whispered a way: "Citis brother, smoked son already said, you will find their own dignity and glory ..."
......
Huge bluestone training ground, a full hundred meters young girls stand among them, bursts of noise, soaring up.
In the training field, a huge test of the black stone, the test tablet, but only some of the strength of the family to be equipped with, the value of a large, black stone side, is still a year ago the indifferent tester.
The podium on the left of the training ground sits with some of the insiders in the family, in the central area, the Patriarch Shan and the three elders.
field, those who are about to await the trial of teenage girls, is disturbed standing, some ordinary performance, the face did not have much tension, and some gifts general or low, it is a face wandering and disturbed.
Shan calm face looked at the face of different people, heart gently sighed, inflammation son, you can get this pass?
"Patriarch, the time is coming, Citis not yet?" Shan, the two elders frown.
Shan Oblique glanced at him, faint tunnel: "Time has not arrived, anxious what?" How can two elders even have this power? ”
Was Shan choke a mouthful, two elder facial expression slightly some ugly, yin measured cold hum way: even if you give him to buy to build the spirit liquid, that also cannot let him in a year to reach the seventh paragraph of the gas! Don't expect miracles to happen. ”
Smell speech, Shan face an anger, he is also now agitated, this guy is which pot does not open to mention which pot, when he intends to go back, the field is a slight riot up.
The sight turns, the distance square at the end of the path above, two shadow, is slowly coming, calmly pace, it seems not because of today's important day and shortness.
Micro-squint eyes looking at the distant black shirt on the face of the faint smile, Shan do not know why, light sigh of relief ...                                        
 
 
The 30th chapter insults the people, the person is constant disgrace
Looking at the Citis and the children, the boys in the field, the face of no one is not a show of some jealousy, in this Shaw home, can and smoked son so close to the only one, I am afraid it is only this famous waste wood ...
The edge of the square, surrounded by a large group of peer-Shanning, staring at the eyes of Citis, angry meaning.
"Little bastard, look at you after today, there is still a face and smoked son together." "Low scold a sound, Shanning gloat coldly to smile."
Ignoring the path of jealousy and anger, Citis led the line to the end of the procession, and whispered to each other.
Looking at Citis's relaxed appearance, the upper echelons of the family were amazed, didn't the guy know that today's test would change his future path?
"Hey, I'm afraid I'm going to broken broken falls." Two elders sneer at low irony way.
Originally thought to say this words, next to the Shan will be furious, but two elders wait a long while, but did not detect the slightest movement, now can not help but some stunned look at the Shan side.
"Two elders, all things or wait until the final conclusion, otherwise, in the end, will only fan their own face ..." Shan a deep look at the scene of the turn from praise eyes of the juvenile, light tunnel.
Mouth a smoke, two elders cold hum way: Hope, I also expect him to bring me a little surprise. ”
"Well, time is up, don't dawdle." The great elders interrupted the two men.
Shan nodded slightly, stood up, and looked round the quiet training ground, "You are all fresh blood of the family, you should know how important today's quiz is to you, test rules, the seventh paragraph of the gas and its judgment is qualified, on the contrary, it is unqualified, however, in accordance with the previous additional provisions, After the completion of the test, fighting gas under seven paragraphs, have the right to seven or more of the peer to send a challenge, if the challenge of victory, it can also enter the qualifying zone!
"Now that everyone is clear, then, quiz begins!" ”
With the sinking of the Shan, the young girls on the training ground suddenly became nervous.
Beside the black stone tablet, the indifferent tester steps forward, takes out the list from the bosom, the cold voice, lets the person who is called the name is all hair millet.
Sitting cross-legged on the clean bluestone floor, Citis calmly looking at those who because of the fight of the gas failed and sadly cries peers, indifferent to the twitched, heart did not have any compassion, these like to ridicule than their own lower level of people, not worthy of sympathy.
When they were looking for pleasure in their lower-ranking people, they might not have imagined that they would have this day sooner or later.
A disgrace to a person is a disgrace.
Sitting by the side of Citis, lavender small face elegant, cloud cirrus comfortable appearance, like spotless a Yeqinglian, Qian hand playing with a wisp of black hair, but the eye occasionally sweep to next to the juvenile, and Citis the same, she did not to those gloomy teenage girls expressed too much attention.
"Chongmei! ”
The tester's cold voice, let Citis eyebrow pointed lightly picked, the slightly drooping eyelid is also lazy to lift up.
Side has been watching the Citis of the son, look at him this appearance, can't help but wrinkles the nose.
"Oh, at the outset she was to me this Citis brother sticky very tightly ah ..." micro-squint looked at the calm forward of the red dress girl, Citis lightly smiled lightly.
The lavender blinked the big eye, Citis the corner of the mouth that faint irony, smiled: "I am very curious after today, she will use what attitude to Citis brother?" ”
Citis slightly shrugged, softly way: "Some things, was destroyed, is destroyed, no matter how to make up, that also has the glaring crack, this family, can let me identify with the person, not many, a few people just ..."
"Is the Kaoru?" "The rosy mouth set off a playful radian," asked the lavender smile.
Citis smile warm alcohol, stretching out the palm, double fingers holding a wisp of black hair, slowly sliding down, smiling way: Of course! ”
The big, watery eyes bend into a beautiful crescent, and the eyes of the child are slightly blurred, and the picture of the soul is almost deep, with some warmth, slowly appearing ...
As a child in the middle of the night to touch his room of the little boy, with that clumsy to let people can not help but some want to laugh the way warm raised his seemingly weak body, although knowing that the road did not have much effect, but the little boy has persisted for two years time ...
Exquisite little face on the emergence of a lovely little dimple, lavender slightly biased head, the heart Softly smiled: "This family, can let the person who really agree with the smoked son, also not many, only you alone ..."
In the distance, looking at the Citis of the intimacy of the Act, Shanning Shameless, the jealousy of the flame, let him want to rush to the poor face mercilessly trample on a few feet.
"Fighting force: eight sections!" ”
Above the black stone, the strong light burst forth, the upright gigantic typeface, suspended on the stone surface.
"Chongmei: Fighting Force , eight paragraphs, advanced!" " looked at the black stone tablet, the indifferent tester nodded slightly, sinking sound announced."
Listening to the tester's voice, Chongmei breathed a sigh of relief, followed by pride on his little face, and a year, from the seventh to the eighth, the progress, in the family is enough to row forward five, so outstanding achievements, no wonder the girl will be greatly satisfied.
After the voice of the tester came out, it caused a commotion in the training field, a way of envious eyes, direct to Chongmei.
"A year to raise a battle of the gas, reluctantly ..." Touched the nose, Citis lightly evaluation way.
Well "The smoked son is playing with the hair, the gaze is just random sweep sweep that by the public like princess generally be around in the middle of Chongmei."
After Chongmei this climax, the back of the more than 10, also only one person to reach the seven paragraph of the gas, the other, are eliminated.
"萧熏! ”
The tester's indifferent voice, under the name, had a slight touch of emotion.
The whole audience eyes, with the sound and move, suddenly transferred to that spotless beautiful girl body.
"Citis brother, don't be surprised later ..." stand upright, lavender leaned toward the Citis playful smile.
Pick the eyebrow, Citis looking at the girl beautiful attractive figure, murmured: "Is Jin into the bucket?" ”                                       
 
 
31st Chapter One of the stars
Looking at that slowly line of green girl, some quiet training field, a pair of hot eyes, firmly staring at the maiden, not blink.
Above the high platform, all the upper echelons of the family ceased to talk in whispers, and the eyes converged on the brightest pearl of the Xiao House.
Shan and three elders, face in the dignified, but also have a touch of curiosity, they also want to know, a year of cultivation, the family of the first generation of young people, at this time, and go to what extent?
......
In the presence of all eyes under the gaze, the girl steps not to slow the line to the black stone, the small hand stretched out, the cuffs slide, exposing a piece of snow-white slender hao wrist.
The jade hand lightly touches the cold black stone tablet, the lavender child's eyes slowly closes, the body fights the force, the rapid surging.
With the power of the bucket input, the black stone in the quiet moment, the strong awn of the first place ...
Bucket : one star!
Looking at the black stele above the glittering four characters, training field, a little quiet, and soon large tracts of the sound of the pour of the breath as if the exhaust version of the ring, all the expression, all solidified at the moment.
"Miss Kaoru, a man of stars!" ”
Some shook in the gold Guangcan four characters, the tester can't help exclaim shook his head, loudly shouted.
"Gee ... 15-Year-old Bucket ... It's a worthy one.
Listen to the public voice of the tester, the high stage of the Shan light breath, words to the last, but suddenly blurred up.
Three elders nod slightly, is also full face shock, although this distance of Citis 12 years old achievement still have some disparity, but, this kind of cultivation speed, also really call is a freak.
Training field, that was surrounded by the Chongmei, is also the black stone on the gold guangcan of the four characters stabbed a little dizzy, gaze down, looking at the elegant girl standing in the stone, heart not by the rise Xu some decadent, 15 years old to become a star, such dazzling aura, she simply could not be beyond.
The crowd finally, Citis marveled at the smack, did not expect this NH not only really in a year into the bucket, but also in the level above the bucket, to upgrade the level of a star, this kind of cultivation speed, can almost and use of the construction of the spirit of his liquid in the same breath.
The girl under the stone, it seems not like to be so concerned about, but the wrinkles wrinkle show eyebrow, and then turned back to the crowd finally, to the face of the Citis playful upturned little mouth.
"Don't be complacent, with your talent, there is nothing surprising about this, if you do not enter the bucket level in a year, then I would be very surprised." "Shrugged, Citis jokingly.
Smell speech, lavender small face immediately collapsed down, some resentment of white his one eye.
Took the lavender son again on the ground, Citis Chin holding the cheek, bored to look at that continue to test the people.
Want in 15 years old will fight the gas to practice to seventh paragraph, generally all need good talent, only then may succeed, but the good talent person cannot be everywhere, even with the power of Xiao House, this meet the requirements of the people, but only accounted for 10 of two or three.
With more and more people unqualified, the atmosphere of the training ground slowly some dull up, those who did not pass the people, are the face, but, whenever there are other newcomers unqualified, these faces, but it will be vague to skim over a touch of schadenfreude ...
Panzuo on the floor, Citis already lazy to watch those tests, hundreds of people in the test, but also only one or two and Chongmei the same as the eight-paragraph, and as for nine, but not one person appeared.
The number of people who were not called on the field was getting less and more, and finally, only a few people, including Citis, were left.
Not far before the last teenager is up to test, but after a long while, but also by unqualified and sadly returned.
For the last more than 10 places, in fact, everyone is aware that the more than 10 of the family is the most bottom of the existence, if not for the sake of fairness, I am afraid will be directly to the 10-odd places brush off is not necessarily.
"Citis! ”
Under the black stone, the tester's eyes were a little complicated and shouted out the last place.
"Citis brother, it's your time ..." The delicate little hand is lightly covered with Citis's palm, the girl whispered softly.
Slightly looked up, Citis open the eyes, eyes in the training field around a circle, that a way schadenfreude of eyes, let him can not help softly sneer.
Slowly stand up son, Citis twisted Skull, will be the sight of the Shan, slightly a smile.
Looking at his son's smiling eyes, Shan gratified nodded, one hand to the cup, gently leaning on the back of the chair.
Take a deep breath, Citis striding toward the black stone, the forehead suddenly teng up that share of the flying, let some want to make a sound ridicule of the people embarrassed to live in the mouth.
Under the complex gaze of the full field, Citis came under the black stone.
Looking at the young man in front of the black shirt, the tester sighed in his heart, that year, Citis to create a miracle, is his first witness, and three years, a step by step of the fall of genius, but also he witnessed, after today, if there is no miracle, this should be the last time a teenager in the family test ...
In the full of the eyes of the tightly watched, Citis chest slowly undulating, palm flat probe out, light against the cold black stone.
All eyes, at the moment, all blinking and not blinking on the stone, they also know very well, this test, perhaps will be the whole Utan for the amazing genius of the last Test.
The stone tablet is a little calmer, and after a while, the glare!
Above the stone, the huge golden lettering, so that all the hearts of all the people in the room stopped beating.
"The power of fighting ... Seven paragraphs! ”                                      
 
 
32nd Chapter Challenges
Full of silence, dead silence!
All the people in the field, shocked to look at the stone tablet above the five characters, face on the expression, extremely wonderful, a moment later, shortness of breath, like a windmill, in the training field rang up.
Snip ”
Top of the platform, Shan hands of the cup, directly by a slap pinched into a powder, tea mixed with powder, dripping down the palm tick down.
"Paragraph seven ... Phlogistic son, you ... Really did it! "Eyes looking at the black stone under the youth, Shan eyes, slightly moist, his heart know, in order to be able to come to this step, the juvenile paid much effort."
Sitting in the Shan side of the three elders, is also full face unbelievable, this year before or three paragraph of the gas, now become the seventh paragraph? This speed ... Scary Guy!
"Goo, hehe ... The spirit liquid that the patriarch purchased ... Still, really strong ah, hehe. "The two elders swallowed a mouthful of spittle that had not been completely dispersed before, and the mixture of sarcasm and dullness, extremely wonderful, hollow laugh, smiled guiltily."
Shan forehead of excitement, and not the slightest disguise, oblique glanced at the two elders, lightly smiled: "Two elders, you think the Second product class of the construction of the spirit liquid, can have this kind of miraculous?" ”
Two elders a lag, awkward shook his head, he is not a fool, build the spirit liquid can improve the cultivation speed, can want to rely on this thing in a year to promote four paragraph of the gas, basically not the slightest possible!
......
Beside the black stone, the tester Leng looked at the big characters on the stone tablet, the face of that share of indifference, also early has been shaken replaced.
"Citis: Fighting the gas, seventh paragraph, Advanced!" ”
A deep breath, it seems to be the heart of the shock with the general, the tester that efforts to maintain calm voice, but still have some difficult to conceal the trembling.
Listening to the release of the tester, it was a silent training ground, even more silent.
Grunt "I do not know who is crazy to swallow the saliva of the voice, abrupt in the training field rang."
Standing in the middle of the crowd, Chongmei small hands covered with rosy lips, small face, full of shock.
One year, to raise the whole four paragraph of the gas, the pace of cultivation ... It's appalling!
This speed, even three years ago at the peak of the Citis, it is impossible!
However, this kind of heart-tightening reality is truly in the eyes of all people.
Eyes with complex emotions, staring at the boy standing under the black stone, Chongmei Heart suddenly came out of a let her full of paste idea: His amazing cultivation talent, seems to come back!
The edge of the training field, is ready to see the Citis joke Shanning is also sluggish stare at the tablet on the big characters, and murmured: "This ... How can it be? ”
......
Looking up at the golden characters on the stone tablet, Citis lightly spit a sigh of relief, around those suddenly become complex eyes, let him recall three years ago that the young man.
Now the talent of cultivation has returned, and with it comes the maturing mind and tenacity of perseverance.
A deep look at this several decisions of their own fate of the stone tablets, Citis gently smiled, clouds and the plain appearance of the light and three years ago that in the test, looked complacent teenager.
A breath of Light, Citis in full sight of gaze, slowly line to the crowd finally, and smoked son that smiles eye contact, then next to her side, cross-legged sat down.
With Citis's retreat, the field remains a long time silent.
"Cough ..." on top of the platform, the face of Shan stood up and coughed and pulled the eyes of the field.
"The test has been completed, below, to hold the next bar, unqualified person, have the right to send a challenge to qualified companions, remember, only one chance!" "Shilang laughs.
Smell speech, training ground slightly some riots up, those poor line of qualified people, immediately will fiery eyes to the group of qualified companions.
And facing the opposite of the road full of provocative eyes, those excellent people are dismissive of Yang head, six paragraphs and seven paragraphs, is the level of two situations, if there is no special accident, a six-paragraph of the gas, it is difficult to face the head-on defeat of seven paragraph of the enemy.
For this, those who strength in six paragraph of the gas is also very clear, but this is their last chance, such as on the formation and not, have to try desperately.
For a time, the atmosphere in the field is a little strange, a fiery line of sight, from those qualified companions swept, all are secretly selected the best to deal with opponents.
Panzuo in the ground, Citis suddenly pick eyebrow, his stunned discovery, those people's eyes, unexpectedly is half fall on their body.
"Do I look like a soft persimmon?" With a slight consternation, Citis's heart was a little funny.
"Citis brother jumped four a year even though it is very shocking, but also because of this shock, causing a lot of people deep in the heart of a kind of unwilling to believe the illusion, so, they are very natural, will Citis brother as the best challenge." "Side, smoked son softly smiles."
Helplessly shrugged, Citis patted the clothes on the dust, light smile: "Because do not want to believe, so choose to deceive yourself mody ..."
Smoked son a shallow smile, nod slightly.
At this time, calm a moment of the field, finally someone could not help standing out.
The young man of strong stature, in the view of the public, fast walk to Citis before, slightly bend body, loudly way: Citis cousin, please! ”
Although the young face seems respectful, but eyes in sight to Citis, always flashed a doubt, face with faint disdain, it seems, he did not from Citis before the name of the waste wood back to God.                                         
 
 
The 33rd chapter confirms
Looking at the first challenge of the Zhuang-Shuo juvenile, the other unqualified people immediately some regrets sigh, look at that appearance, seems to be very envious of this one to eat crabs.
Citis Micro squint eyes, looked up and down in front of the juvenile, although the clan of the family he and recognize not all, but this young man, he is have some impression.
If the memory is good, the juvenile named Shink, is a big elder faction of the people, usually with Shanning buttocks behind, like a small henchman appearance, before in their own time, and not less to their good face.
In the mind slowly memories of some of the past, Citis mouth suddenly raised a touch of some dangerous radian.
Turn round to touch the eye to ponder of the smoked son, Citis a smile, in the crowd's gaze, nodded, and whispered: "Well, I accept ."
See Citis promised so simply, Shink Canthus is pumping, a touch of inexplicable unease in the heart quietly rise, the throat rolling a bit, Shink suddenly some regret their recklessness.
However, although there is regret, but now is offing, can not back.
"Illusion, a year to raise four pieces of the gas, no one can do it, it must be this guy with what means to deceive everyone!" I'm sure I can beat him! "In the heart of a little inspiration, Shink this just strong smile:" Then let me see Citis cousin's strength! ”
Citis smiled, stood up, in full view of the line to the training ground, and then to Shink made a please gesture.
Look at the calm Citis, Shink heart of the unrest is more powerful, smiled guiltily smile, move some stiff pace, slowly marching field.
Looking at the two people in the field, the training ground everyone is a quick sight moved over.
On top of the podium, Shan took the Buppa behind him, wiped the water stains on his hands, stared tightly on the field, eyes, with a vague tension.
To be honest, not only did those teenagers feel some disbelief in the achievements of Citis, is even Shan himself, the bottom of my heart is also a bit unreal sense of trance, this can not blame him do not believe Citis, after all, within a year to upgrade the entire four paragraph of the gas, this speed, can almost use a demon to describe, this speed, Even the Citis, three years ago, never did.
And that is because the achievements are too rich, so all hearts are a little hard to believe.
However, whether it is a letter or not, as long as Citis and people, its real strength, will be exposed, and then, people can see the real level of Citis!
Shan side, three elders breathing is also gradually short, withered palm, in the chair put on, pinch out a deep impression, a pair of muddy eyes, complex stare at the field.
Bluestone training field, all eyes, are firmly staring at the two in the field, Citis previously displayed the horror of the results, is really false, a hands-on, it is known!
"It's definitely fake!" "At the edge of the square, Shanning licked his dry lips and whispered mercilessly."
"Should ... It's a fake, isn't it? "In the crowd, Sumeibe teeth biting the rosy lips, the hearts of some vacant way, she also hard to believe that the quiet three years of juvenile, will suddenly achieve such a terrible result."
In a complex eye gaze, the Citis and Shink in the field have completed the ritual before the game.
Double Palm micro Vertical, the light of the fight of the gas lingering on it, Shink deep breath, feet on the ground a tread, body straight to the Citis impact.
There is no dazzling feeling in the low-level battles, and everything is the simplest touch.
"Reflect Palm!" ”
Body quickly bullying into the Citis side, Shink right palm above, fighting the gas slightly condensed, the right palm a wave, mercilessly to Citis chest oblique cut away.
Reflect Palm, Huang intermediate fighting skills, five paragraph of the gas above the people, only qualified to learn!
Oncoming a gust of wind blowing Citis forehead hair, exposing its next pair of black as ink double pupil, eyelid blink blink, Citis the eyes of slight squint stare at that more and more near palm.
In the palm is about to reach the shoulder, Citis this is not urgent and slow to the left a step, a year of physical exercise, so that his reaction nerve extremely outstanding.
Not much of a step, just dodged the attack of Shink, body slightly side, Citis palm like a flower picking leaves general, through the Shink arm, casually printed on the shoulder.
"Gravel palm!" ”
Gravel Palm, Huang low-level fighting skills, just three paragraph of the gas can learn!
Bang A muffled sound, was Citis hit Shink ruddy face immediately pale. A muffled hum, footsteps staggered back, finally is a foothold instability, soft down, fell a sprawling.
The silence of the whole court, the defeat of Shink, proved some facts well.
A palm beat opponents, Citis some silly shook his head, such opponents, it is not challenging, do not mention the use of cards, their own real strength, have never spent half.
Of course, and Citis their own boredom is different, at this time of the field, everyone, are slowly closed their eyes, since Citis can so easily defeated a six-paragraph qi of the people, then his strength, surely in seven paragraph above.
So, then, the horrible results of previous Citis ... It's true!
A year to improve the four-section of the gas, this achievement, is a miracle miracle!
On the platform, Shan heavy vomit a sigh of relief, the heart, also finally put down that piece hangs of Boulder.
“...... Really, the seventh paragraph ...
Looking at the defeated Shink, Chongmei small hand slowly cover the red lip, shocked to murmur.                                         
 
 
34th Chapter Roll Over
Looking at the negative hand in the field of the black shirt juvenile, the scene is slightly quiet.
On the platform, Shan mouth of the smile slowly expand, to the end, finally is unbearable to laugh up.
Listening to the Shan laughter, three elders looked at each other, I sigh a sigh of relief, but no more speak counter proposing, the potential of the juvenile show, let their hearts have a small sense of frustration, four paragraphs a year, this speed, enough to let anyone feel aghast, their descendants, I'm afraid there's no chance of catching up.
The mood of big Yue stood up, Shan clapped, smiles announced: "Shink nephew challenge failure, also hope in the future to cultivate!" ”
field, the pale Shink listened to the verdict, suddenly sadly a few minutes, eyes complex looking at not far from the black shirt teenager, this year ago was ridiculed as a waste of people, a year later, unexpectedly has once again in the family of all the heads above, this is almost an earthshaking polar change, Let Shink suddenly think of that day Hall in the youth of the all imply: "30 years East, 30 years of Hexi, MO bullying Juvenile poor!" ”
Face dew wry smile shook his head, Shink difficult to climb up, to Citis slightly gong body, voice, before that share disdain finally disappear clean: Citis cousin, you win, congratulations you restore! ”
Slightly nodded, Citis gaze in the presence of slowly scanning, all contact with the dark eyes of the people, are some timid dodge.
Eyes at random in that has been staring at their Chongmei body swept, Citis head opposite the group of unqualified people smiled lightly: "There are those who want to challenge?" ”
Looking at the Citis, the group was still in the consternation of the teenagers, mouth hurriedly closed, one for the shape of reflection, but is no one dares to go up to do the second eat crabs.
Looking at these young juvenile's silly appearance, Citis slightly shrugged, turned directly to the back line.
Looking at the Citis sitting next to me, lavender smiled at me, eyes scanned the field, the slender fingers will be a wisp of black hair into a spinning roll, small mouth set off a faint radian, softly way: "Citis brother, three years ago, they are so see you ..."
"Three years ago I would be excited by their awe, now ... I don't feel anything. Citis touched the nose, insipid smile.
"That is Citis brother mature." "The smoked child is playful to blink to blink the big eyes."
"Where you mature, sometimes I think, under the body of the girl, is not hidden a thousand old monster!" "By a little girl seriously mature, Citis not by some feel funny, palm intimate rubbing the head of smoked son, jokingly way."
Smell speech, smoked son charming white Citis one eye, exquisite small face, some blame, no matter how open-minded, regardless of girl, also don't want to be said as an old monster.
The maiden Coquetry Most is moving, the child this inadvertently exposes the maiden Jiao, not only lets the distance that group of teenagers stare straight eyes, is even some maiden, also is not by the facial envy.
"This little bastard, too arrogant ..." is also smoked by the Jiao appearance of the eyes some raised, look at the intimate appearance of Citis, Shanning heart jealousy flames, a few want to cover up the reason, in this family, he boasted only have their own ability to match on the smoked son, but no matter how he pleases, but always difficult to bo her smile, And the opposite view Citis a once waste, but always let his favorite girl happy smile, this strong contrast, let Shanning teeth crunch.
"Little bastard, you arrogant, and so on the day of the adult ritual, I want to in front of the face of the incense, will you hit the floor!" Fist tightly pinched together, Shanning Senran stare at a distance sit cross-legged Citis.
Although Shanning is also very shocking Citis this year's cultivation speed, but the past that habitual overlooking mentality, for a time, it is always difficult to Citis waste name head discarded, and as a family of young people only time and smoked son, Citis the rapid progress, has let Shanning faint awareness of a sense of crisis.
Before he grew up and gave him a heavy blow, it would be better to strike him down again!
Heart turning gloomy idea, Shanning mouth slowly provoke a touch of grinning, although Citis now is seven paragraph of the gas, but he is to his eight paragraph of the gas quite confident, after all, after seven paragraphs, each section of the upgrade, it will be a huge gap!
Whispered and smoked son chuckle talk, Citis Canthus casually to the edge of the training field, just see that Shanning mouth of a touch of grinning, slightly a leng, immediately faint smile, even their own anger are hidden people, can have many climate?
......
After Shink challenged Citis failure, no one dared continue to challenge, the group of unqualified people, also had to find another target, and after several rounds of competition, but only two, relying on skilled fighting skills and some luck, their opponents defeated, successfully stepped into the qualified region.
Looking at the gradually calmed training ground, the smiling face of Shan up, loudly announced the end of the quiz, and one months after the adult ceremony to pay attention to something.
Slowly stood up, Citis to the high platform that Shan smiled, and Shan, but also not stingy to his today's big publicity son pricked up his thumb.
Pat the clothes on the dust, a burst of Shanfeng but is blowing.
Brows Wrinkle wrinkles, Citis looked up and stood in front of the Chongmei, lightly smiled: "Something?" ”
Looking at the Citis handsome little face of that wipe concealed indifference, Chongmei heart a lag, the face of a reluctant smile, softly way: "Citis cousin, congratulations." ”
Thank "Slightly nodded, Citis eyes to the side of the smoked son to glance."
"Citis cousin, tomorrow Dou Technology Hall, by my father teaches Huang Advanced Dou skill, you go together?" "Chongmei smile Way, on the cheek charming and pure contradictory set, really let the person move."
Smell words, Citis eyebrow tip quietly picked pick.
When Citis is trying to excuse rebuffed, a pair of slender white delicate hao wrist is out from the side, and then hold his arm.
Slightly a Leng, Citis turn overdo, is to see a face full of elegant smile.
"Really sorry, Bing elder sister, smoked son has invited Citis brother to accompany me to stroll Utan tomorrow, may not accompany Bing elder sister to fight Technology Hall." "In the eyes of a pair of sluggish, the lavender intimate arm with Citis, delicate small face, slightly with some apology."                                      
 
 
35th Chapter Guilt
Listen to this words, Chongmei Yizheng, immediately some embarrassment, if the family of other girls so speak, she can also rely on their beauty and talent in the discourse of some of the upper hand, but if the opponent to be smoked son words, she had to be filled with frustration.
Looking at a glance Citis that indifferent face, Chongmei heart a self-deprecating smile, had to smiled guiltily leave.
Training field of the crowd, staring at the Citis of the smoked son intimacy, all can not help heart some jealousy, as the family's most dazzling pearl, they have ever seen aromatherapy son so treat a man?
Looking at Chongmei that embarrassed to leave the back, Citis stunned, feel the delicate feeling on the arm, over the head, looking at a smile of the lavender, not by some funny joke way: "NH, what are you doing?" ”
Smoked son still holding Citis arm, the eyes in the surrounding those because she this intimate behavior and sluggish flow swept through the crowd, immediately seems to be innocent tunnel: "Citis brother don't want to reject her?" ”
Smell the words, Citis turned his eyes, a refusal from the mouth of two people, but there is a very different meaning, back to the previous Chongmei face of the embarrassment, he reluctantly shook his head, oblique glanced at a Qiao Smile Yan Xi, the heart muttered: "This NH should be intentional?"
"Smoked son just don't like her that face speed, hehe, together to fight technology hall learning, such an invitation, before can never have." "Smoked son pulled Citis slowly to walk outside, also ignore around those eyes, uphold softly way, voice, have a touch of sneer, she to Chongmei this difference attitude, really some not cold.
Slightly shrugged, Citis is also some empathy nodded, a wry smile, three years ago, he and Chongmei relationship is not bad, can be from the name of his own waste from the first, he really see the reality of this woman.
Looking at the intimate line of the training field Citis and smoked son, a distant Shanning face hard, clenched fists, the sound of crunch, heart jealousy, and even make his eyes some redness.
"Little Bastard, one months later, I want you to look for your teeth!" Shanning bite teeth, hunting channel, and then with full rage, angrily left the training ground.
The high platform is preparing to go back to the Shan, is also the scene shook a shock, eyes tightly staring at the two intimate body, a little surprised, eyes swept a vague concern: "Inflammation son this child, not ... You're not going to like the bacon, are you? You know, her identity ... It's not a great thing to have, even with a horrible talent for cultivation, to be able to get the identity of the forces behind her. ”
Silence for a moment, Shan a sigh, shook his head, slowly away.
......
By the girl arm, walking, elbows will always touch some warm soft things, that a wonderful touch, let someone in the heart of some shameless generation of people.
Once again turned a path, Citis suddenly small face blush red let go of the arm, chin help micro drum, coquetry stare at him.
Lost the soft, sweet touch, Citis heart an empty, some disappointed sigh a sigh of relief, a pair of eyes almost is not controlled to next to the girl body moved, that to cover under the light green clothes, slightly quite upturned small chest, although green, but has begun to take shape, do not have a green fruit temptation.
Feel Citis that inadvertently slightly fiery eyes, lavender elegant little face, suddenly be crimson replaced, small hand conditioned on the lift many, shame Chen Way: "Citis brother, you ..."
"Cough ... Cough ... "be smoked son of the sound awakened, Citis acuteness of the dry cough two, the skin some redness, smiled guiltily smile, Heart secretly wail:" is really a evil animal ah, unexpectedly to own younger sister to have a feeling? ”
Although the essence of Citis and no blood relationship, but after all, two people have lived together for more than 10 years, that kind of emotion, not compared to the number of siblings, and now Citis unexpectedly eat his name on the sister's tofu, no wonder he will feel some guilt ...
By this sudden episode disrupted two human atmosphere, for a time , atmosphere is silent and charming.
Lavender small face crimson head, the past of that share elegant, has been in the girl's forbidden to be touched in the shy disappeared clean, eyes occasionally flashing, but see Citis that sideways face.
In this strange atmosphere, a not too long path, but just like the march of the general, always can not go to the end.
Of course, Long March, also has the end, when walked to the fork in the path, Citis in smiled guiltily a say hello, and then want to flee.
"Citis brother." ”
Looking at that embarrassed and channeling Citis, the lavender son slightly stunned, immediately Cindy managed laugh, Softly call way.
Uh "The Footstep lives, Citis looks back to that Qiao sang the living under the Willow Maiden, originally is uneasy the heart, is jumps a jump."
Young Girl a light green, in the verdant willow foil, is elegant moving, breeze blowing, blow girls down waist hair, small waist above a purple unofficially engaged, pull around the graceful posture.
"Tomorrow ... With Kaoru? ”
Under the willow, the girl's exquisite little face is slightly suffused with crimson, the bell teeth lightly bite the seductive red lip, a pair of beautiful eyes eyes, is with yingying anticipation and a kind of inexplicable charm, looking at not far from the Citis.                                         
 
 
The 36th Chapter Funny Breakthrough
It is difficult to imagine, the nature of the elegant calm of the fumigation, there will be so light language shy of moving Jiao, that strands of pure seductive appearance, let Citis real feel a different kind of charm.
In the heart of a small goblin, Citis vague should be a sound, and then in the eyes of the laughter, and the very disappointing choice to flee.
Looking at the embarrassed to leave the Citis, smoked son to cover his mouth softly smile, looked up and down, and then look at the side of the path of the small water tan.
Inside, young girl slim, eyed, the eye flow between, implicit charm and a touch of inexplicable lingering charm.
"It's really nice ..." he said. "Gently hit a spin, lavender little rosy mouth, slightly provoke a smile of pride."
Not far away, several just came to the family juvenile footsteps suddenly solidified, mouth slowly Zhang big, eyes filled with stunning, innocently looking at the Willow under the beautiful maiden.
......
Embarrassed fled back to his room, Citis this just breathless relieved, wiping a sweat on the forehead, wry smile way: "This NH, if grow up later, I am afraid than that auction's princess also want Goblin ..."
Sat down at the table, Citis poured a mouthful of tea, the mind, always floating in the previous smoked son that pair of moving Jiao, with the eyes of the eye gently, Citis only feel the heart some hot up.
Mercilessly shook the head, Citis heart once again dark scold himself after the beast, this gradually stop those who let people 旖 read.
Dumped some acid hemp arm, Ceatic to the corner of the room, will be filled with a base of the big wood basin carried out, and then quickly remove clothing, turn over to jump in.
Cold water to soak the skin, a share of cool feeling, washing the bones in the sense of exhaustion.
The palm in the basin randomly zoned, Citis lazy on the edge of the wood edge, a slight shortness of breath slowly smooth.
Think of today in the training field caused by the shock, Citis lightly smiled, strength, is indeed the world's most important things.
The fingers rubbed the forehead, a harsh of beautiful cheeks, but suddenly there is no marginal flash into the mind, that is ... A.
Eyes slightly narrowed, Citis softly murmured: "Still have two years?" You have to wait for me, I will come to you ...
Whisper softly, if not in the tone of the cold, I'm afraid anyone will think is a pair of sweet love lovers.
Think of that day in the Hall of Na Lan Yan A sentence condescending words and strong posture, Citis Fist, is slowly clenched, that kind of disgrace, almost hard to erase ...
"Oh, cultivation can not be stagnant ah, the woman ... Although arrogant, but since can be "cloud LAN Zongzong Master received as disciple, the cultivation of talent is general. "Chuckle a sound, Citis lip angle is thrown cold smile."
A deep breath, as long as the thought of that woman, Citis heart is filled with a strange diligence, the current vibration of the spirit, put up the lazy posture, in the tub in the posture of cultivation, ten fingers knot, and then the unrest of the mind, slowly closed his eyes to cultivate.
......
From the day after the test, Citis can clearly feel that the surrounding people in sight to their eyes, has automatically been less than the past disdain and ridicule, replaced by a kind of awe.
For this only three years ago to enjoy the awe of the eyes, Citis is only stride, did not show what once the proud posture of glory.
After the test finished the next day, Citis nature is contractual accompany with smoked son peace of mind to play a day, for this in the family in addition to father, the most close to the people, Citis very hard to refuse also don't want to reject her any request.
And after a relaxing day, Citis's life, is back to the previous calm and orderly.
Early in the morning after the mountain to practice fighting skills, and then go home to fight the gas, and occasionally accompany smoked son, and father talk, a few time period, was Citis arranged orderly.
During the occasional encounter in the family Chongmei, listen to her sweet greasy Citis cousin's name, Citis is a touch of laughter, casual coping, for too realistic woman, he has always been to maintain a respectful attitude.
Today she is able to respond to her own gift to add to her gift, and tomorrow she also can because of her talent to leave and become cold as a stranger, this kind of alternative betrayal, eat once, is enough.
......
January time, in such a calm and leisurely days, slowly spent, another seven days, is the Xiao House to hold the big day of adult ceremonies ...
There are seven days before the ceremony of the adult, but Citis want to break through to the eighth paragraph of the desire, but still is not the slightest reflection, this is to let him some regrets.
After two days of hard work, there is still no harvest, Citis regret, relaxed the tightening of the cultivation of time, however, he thought that the breakthrough is hopeless, let him surprise unexpected situation, but is inexplicable.
In the adult ceremony of the first two days of a night, sleeping in the Citis, suddenly like sleepwalking jump up, even the clothes are not off, so stiff jumped into the drug is about to disappear completely in the tub.
After midnight toss, Citis just opened his eyes, and then ... He foolishly discovered that the barrier that had plagued himself for the past two or March years had been torn between his own confusion ...
For this come inexplicably and some funny breakthrough, after the Citis, in surprise, had to laugh and cry: "Rely on!" ”                                      
 
 
37th Chapter Shanyu
A family wants to stay alive, the most important thing is to maintain vitality, and the source of vitality, is the family of young people, they are the blood of the family, only the constant influx of fresh blood, as the family of this large machinery, can always keep running.
Therefore, the rite of adulthood is a big day that every family attaches great importance to, and Xiao House is also not listed outside.
As one of the three Utan families, Xiao House's rite of passage attracted the attention of all the forces in the city, and some of the friendly forces were directly invited to participate in the ceremony.
......
With the lavender sitting in the shade of the tree, cool breeze, warm cool comfortable.
Citis squint eyes looking at the distant field of the huge table, the platform is cast by the giant wood, this is to hold the adult ritual and deliberately built venues.
Citis eyes in the open on the stage swept sweep, and immediately transferred to the bottom of the wooden table those from the forces of the crowd, helpless softly way: "People are really many ..."
Looking at the Citis that some depressed little face, know that he likes the stillness of the lavender immediately some schadenfreude chuckle out.
Laughter has just exported, the child is aware of Citis that vicious line of sight, now quickly shut small mouth, eyes in his body swept, eye MoU imperceptible in a light gold ray, some unexpected Jiao smiled: "Citis brother to eight paragraph of the gas?" ”
Smell speech, Citis oblique glanced at her one eye, with this NH together, seems to conceal anything, heart depressed sigh, feebly nodded.
"Gee ... Less than a month, broke through the eighth paragraph, this speed ... It's horrible. "See Citis nod, Revolve is with the calm of the son, also not by the face dew Surprise."
White her one eye, Citis glances at the corner of the eye suddenly a meal, in the direction of the giant wooden table, a woman dressed in a red dress, just smiled Yan hee and people talk, red dress package under the plump exquisite body, looming, extremely sultry, at this time, in her side, has surrounded a lot of people, peremptory became the most lively circle.
This smile a frown is full of mature charm of the red skirt woman, it is Citis has seen the Temille auction house of the chief auctioneer Princess.
Look at the casual in that pair like a snake in the waist of the general sweep sweep, Citis Heart secretly sighed: "Really a Acura!" ”
In Citis's eyes stay in the princess body, side is suddenly came the girl low hum.
"Cough ..." eyes blink, Citis not traces of the back of the line of sight, the small face indifferent to the fumigation to smile: "did not expect Temille auction house also someone to participate in our family's adult ritual." ”
Glanced at pretending to do nothing Citis, Lavender light Tunnel: "Xiao House and Utan Temille auction field relationship is good, she will come, what is so strange?" Moreover, this woman's means of communication, but Utan recognized the tough, some of the master son of the handsome, in her body hit not know how much money, but in the end, but is a bubble did not see, Citis brother if have this idea, can have to be careful, fumigation can not borrow money let you do these things. ”
Smell words, Citis smiled guiltily smiled, wry smile way: "I even have this idea, that also have to others can see I this little fart child, she can I seven or eight years old." ”
"Some women, not good this?" "Lavender's rosy mouth is a pick, like a smile smile way."
A dry cough, Citis had to retreat, eyes again dare to move to that circle.
"Gee, how did she come back?" "See Citis retreat, smoked son also gave up the crusade, a little quiet, suddenly startled Yi Road."
Who Leng Leng, Citis along the eyes of smoked son, brow, but slowly wrinkled up.
At the sight of the two men, a beautiful woman dressed in a set of seemingly college costumes leaned against a big tree, beautiful waist with a sword, the figure is quite high, most eye-catching, or the long slender legs, this pair of sexy long legs, even the enchanting and moving of the princess did not have.
"Shanyu?" Staring at the tall woman, Citis frowned: "She did not go to the Canaan Institute to study?" Why are you back? ”
Smoked son lovely shrug shrug, suddenly light slant overdo, jokingly way: "Citis elder brother, you this time, seem to have trouble." ”
A cleft in the corners of the mouth, Citis rub some hair pain forehead, whispered scold: "This unruly woman, annoy the dead, rely on, but accidentally broke into the mountain after her bath hot spring, and then inadvertently touched her thigh, the result was this crazy woman after six months." ”
"Hehe, the girl's body, how to let people casually touch." "Smell speech, smoked son cover mouth jiao smile, suddenly think of oneself as a child also was this fellow whole body to touch all over, exquisite small face, not by a layer of light seductive blush."
Citis twitched, Cold smile: "This woman or Shanning sister, are not good things, that bastard to me so hostile, there is a big reason for her." ”
In the distance, Shanyu seems to be aware, turned his head, looking at the tree under the Citis, slightly a leng, immediately frown wrinkles, the United States eyes brushed a touch of disdain and disgust.
Hesitated for a moment, Shanyu move those attractive sexy long legs, toward the Citis this line.
Look at her walk, Citis Brow is also a wrinkle, forehead is also some disgust and intolerance.
"Ah, Citis, I did not think you can still have to turn over the time, it is amazing." "Walk near, looking at the Citis face of that share even do not bother to do, Kang Yulen smile."
"It's none of your business. ”
Citis obviously to Shanyu extremely not cold, ordinary indifferent, is also completely abandoned at this time, opening is a vulgar language.
"Your mouth, or so tricky, it seems that the three years of down, still can not wear your spirit." Shanyu overlooking the Citis, disdain of the road, peremptory a condescending tone of the lesson.
"Again this kind of tone ..." with a sigh of disgust, Citis the head, and looked at the woman who had not seen this year, then the eyes slowly shifted to the sexy round long legs, touched the nose, faint way: "Your legs, or so long, is not know since then, there are no other men touched?" ”
Smell speech, sneer at the Shanyu, suddenly full face livid.                                      
 
 
38th Chapter This little guy, it's not easy.
Be Citis A word poke to this some Shamen of sore spot, Shanyu immediately qiao face livid, Jade hand a probe, had been directly held in the waist of the sword handle above.
Mouth holding a faint sneer at the face of Shanyu, Citis leaned back slightly, lazy lazy tunnel: "Want to do?" ”
"What can you do?" The Shanyuyu hand clasped the hilt, tried to suppress the impulse of the sword, sneer at the way: "Even if you now talent return, what can?" Three years ago, I was able to throw you Shanyu, three years later, I can. ”
Citis Eyebrow tip lightly picked, eyes in Shanyu that was the pale purple school uniforms cover the fullness of the chest swept over, there, painted three Venus, which represents the strength of the Shanyu now, three stars, it seems that the year of the college, this unruly woman is also a lot of progress.
"Where does your dog's eyes look?" "Look at the sight of Citis, Ling Yuben on the livid face, but also cold a bit."
"You're dressed like this, don't you show it to a man?" Citis touched the nose, seemingly careless words, but always will Shanyu angry.
"Little bastard! "Bite a silver teeth, unbearable Shanyu finally is" choke "a long sword pulled out waist, suddenly pointed to Citis:" Believe it or not I cut your tongue! " ”
Looking at the light in front of the Iron steel sword, Citis eyes do not blink, softly way: "You try?" "At the same time, Citis right palm slightly curved roll, strong suction, gradually formed in the palm, with three kinds of Xuan-dou technology, he really desperately fight, and not too afraid of three stars."
Looking at the two opposite, the side of the fumigation some helpless shook his head, the eyes swept a distance, smiled aloud to remind: "Uncle Shaw they came." ”
Listen to the reminder, Shanyu Liu Mei Micro-wrinkle, overdo, is sure to see some changes in the face of Shan is in a hurry to come.
"Well, good luck to you." ”
A cold hum, Shanyu take back the sword, move sexy round long legs turn and walk, in the passing of the time, the footsteps suddenly live, way: "Smoked son cousin, your appearance and cultivation talent is perfect, can get away from some people, otherwise be contaminated with what bad habit, regret all too late." ”
For Shanyu this hint sound, smoked son light a smile, smile way: "Thank Shang elder sister's reminder, but smoked son think Citis brother very well." ”
Listen to the implication of the meaning of the words, Shing face micro-change, the eyes in the indifferent smile of the smoked son swept sweep, if there is a profound meaning: "When you come out of the family, only to know how big outside the world, than that guy more outstanding man also do not know what a few, in case when encounter let you have a crush on the man, that ..."
"Shang elder sister, you worry about, the thing that does not happen you say." "Lavender's rosy mouth slightly sipped, faint speech interrupted Shanyu words."
was interrupted by the Shanyu, slightly embarrassed, in a hard glance at Citis, this only some unhappy to leave.
Looking at the Shanyu, Citis slowly vomit a sigh of relief, small face, once again back to the plain, whispered sigh: "really a nasty woman." ”
Smell speech, smoked son smile, cover mouth lightly smile: "In fact I am very curious why she always and Citis elder brother to pass, although that year you accidentally broke into her bathing place, but this also won't cause she always and you do right?" ”
"How do I know. "Citis Innocent Booth threw, and immediately will look to the Shan a few people come up.
"Inflammation son, all right?" Just Shanyu that NH? "Trot came, looking at the safe and sound of Citis, Shan relieved, frowning."
Slightly shrugged, Citis smiled: "All right, that woman suddenly made a mad." ”
"You try to avoid her a little bit, this girl is also a unruly temper, she now has the strength of three stars, in case of moving hands, you can eat a big loss, and she is the big Elder's close granddaughter, really want to fight, even I am not good to punish her." "Shan helpless tunnel.
Citis touched the nose, noncommittal smile.
"Come, phlogistic son, and you introduce, this is the Temille auction house's chief auctioneer, Miss Princess, the last of the build spirit liquid, is from her hand auction proceeds." "Shan body a flash, let stand behind the enchanting red skirt woman, Smiling introduction way."
Citis will look at the release of the mature temptation of the beautiful woman, small face in line with this age stage of the shy smile: "Ya princess good." ”
Seductive eye on Citis body turned, the beautiful cheek because of his name and more out of a smile, red lip micro-kai, Smile yingying Way: Heard Citis young master a year broke through four paragraph of the gas? Oh, this matter now can be in the Wootan city incoming get uproar ah, is not know is true false? ”
Citis took the head, some "shy" way: "All is the father bought the foundation Spirit liquid of credit." ”
Listen to Citis this disguised as the recognition of words, Rao is the calm of the princess, the heart can not help but a light inhalation of a cool, the eyes of the United States skim a touch of surprise and dignified, one year four paragraph of the gas, this cultivation progress, can be really some horror, as for the two product of the construction of the spirit liquid, is the princess was automatically omitted and go, things passed her hand, She is naturally aware of the role of the spirit liquid, said it can improve some of the speed of cultivation, it is true, but if you want to rely on it a year jumping four paragraphs, it is absolutely impossible.
See two people have preliminary understanding, Shan looked at the sky, and then patted the shoulder of Citis, gentle smile: "Well, the adult ceremony is about to start, I have to prepare some things, you will not give father I embarrassed oh." ”
Citis smiled and nodded.
Followed Shan, the princess in turn in the blink of an eye, deeply stared at the juvenile before, a few years of auction experience, will her eyes raised extremely sinister, in its careful observation, the princess suddenly heart some awe-inspiring discovery, before the teenager although a face shy, but that pair of dark eyes, but always a Gukai, Plain as a curved bottomless lake.
"Small age, can easily control their emotions, this little guy, some not simple na ..." Turn around, the princess in the heart of some dignified tunnel.                                        
 
 
39th Chapter Ceremony Retest
The ritual of the adult ceremony, the complexity of its procedures, almost some people head pain.
Sitting in the stage, Citis looked at the stage that was posed like a puppet general juvenile, can not help rubbing his forehead, to the side of the lavender wry smile way: "This adult ritual, it is asking for bitter to eat." ”
Looking at the appearance of Citis helpless, aromatherapy eyes micro-curved, smiles way: "No way, this is always passed down the rules, even if it is Uncle Shaw, they have no way to change." ”
Citis sigh, helpless place nodded, just want to boring lethargy, eyebrow suddenly a pick, slightly squint eyes, slowly transferred to the left side of the table.
In the distance between two people, Shanning is full of envy stare at with the Citis, see the latter look over, immediately provocative Yang Yang Fist.
Idiot ”
Gently spit out two words, Citis eyes left a little, looking at the Shanning side of the Shanyu, the line of sight in the top of the sexy thigh unbridled a few eyes, finally wait for the woman's cheeks become livid, this just sneer back eyes.
One side, look at Citis so, smoked children funny, but also some helpless, as long as a contact to Shanyu, Citis seems to be off the plain, unbridled appearance, each time to the latter angry.
Leaning on the warm and cool wooden chair, Citis lightly sniffed the fresh body fragrance of the girl next to her, and some leisurely closed his eyes.
On the stage of the adult ceremony, in the half, and finally is the turn of the Citis.
Listening to the shouting on the stage, the high platform of the VIP seats, immediately removed a pair of mixed with curiosity and questioning eyes, today they participate in Shaw's adult ceremony, there is a big reason, is because want to determine the recent Utan in the uproar of the teenager is like hearsay.
Listening to the shout, Citis slowly open his eyes, surrounded by a way mixed with color look, as if to see the monkey's eyes let him in the heart helplessly shook his head.
A breath of light, Citis small face to maintain the Gukai of insipid, and then in full sight of gaze, step by step on the podium.
Adult ceremony of the host is two elder Shang, although the two elders have never given Citis what good face, but since that day after the test, he obviously also converge a lot of, at least, the previous share of undisguised disdain, no longer appear in the face of the old.
Eyes some complex looking at the front of this is almost salted fish, Shang heart sighed, the face slightly shook, from behind the stage to take a few ritual required materials, and then to the Ceatic.
Look at the two elders, think of the previous ritual cumbersome, Citis can not help but feel headache, a wry smile, resigned to close the eyes.
......
Under the gaze of the whole audience, Citis like an idiot standing in place for a full half-hour, those tedious ceremonies, this just slowly ending.
Heart relieved, Citis opened his eyes, looking at the whole body of the various spices, depressed to turn the eyes.
After finishing these tedious things, two elders also wiped a sweat, turned and walked to the black stone test tablet before, loudly way: "Ritual retest!" ”
The ritual retest, which is once again a quiz fight, the January test, which was just a prediction, was designed to pick out the best seeds of the tribe, and these excellent seed people had the qualifications to hold the rite of passage on this high stage, and those under the seven were only able to hold some brief ceremonies, rather shabby.
Ritual retest also than the prediction of strict and fine many, this retest, is the strength of the two-star bucket division of the two elders personally monitoring test, this shows that they pay attention to the adult ritual.
Listen to two elders shouted, originally still some boring stage, immediately energetic up, a pair of eyes, directly to the high platform.
Above the VIP seats, those from the various forces of the eyes, but also tightly staring at the stage of the black shirts, they came to the purpose, is to confirm the once let Utan for the amazing genius of the young, whether once again back to the past talent?
Ignoring the fiery eyes around them, Citis's little face calmly stepped forward, before the black stone tablet.
Squinting at the young man in front of her eyes, two elders withered palm touch the black stone, a bit of the gas into the air, and then the face of the erect side, but when the eyes flashed Citis body, still can't help but skim over a touch of doubt: "This little guy, really to the seventh paragraph?" ”
It seems that the Citis caused by the shock to give the two elders quite a blow, even if he knew the test tablet is extremely difficult to make mistakes, but he still some stubborn unwilling to believe, so he volunteered to personally monitor the Citis test!
Did not care about his eyes in the doubt, Citis palm slowly touch the stone tablet ...
Looking at the high platform touch the stone, Citis, Shanyu Liu Mei unbearable to a slight wrinkle, leaning head to Shanning whispered: "That guy really to the seventh paragraph?" ”
Since Shanyu recently went back to the family by taking leave of the college, she did not see that day's predictions.
Asked by her sister, Shanning some bitter spots, stuffy channel: "Well, I do not know what that guy ate, a year, really jumped four paragraph of the gas." ”
Was once again confirmed the truth of this rumor, Shanyu red lip tight, some angry stamped the long legs of sexy, angry stare in the field of black shirt youth, pretty cheeks raised a stubborn: "Did not see it, I can not believe that the waste firewood to roll over!" ”
A deep breath, Kang Yulen smiled at the field: "Last time must be what this guy did, this time by two elders personally monitoring, I see you like ..."
The sneer of the murmur has not spoken, Shanyu pretty cheeks, is suddenly stiff, the remaining words, is also solidified in the throat place.
High above the wooden table, the huge black stone light at first, the golden characters, flamboyant appeared on the stone surface.
"Fight the gas: eight!" ”                                       
 
 
40th Chapter Shock
Silence, Silence!
All eyes, in a slightly Leng Leng, are frozen in the glittering golden black stone.
VIP seats, constantly have a teacup off the crisp sound, those from the Utan representatives of all parties, at the moment, are stunned, full face unbelievable.
The purpose of their coming here is just to make sure that the Citis is really the same as the rumor that, within a year even jumped four paragraph of the QI.
But now the situation in the field, not only let them confirm the truth of the rumor, but also greatly beyond their expectations.
Four fights a year? Now it seems that it should become a five-year battle. The speed of this cultivation, the hearts of all, only two words can be described: Horror!
"Xiao House this time ..." in the VIP seats, the crowd can not help but a sip of the coolness, the heart murmured, a year in the five-paragraph jump of the qi of the people, could imagine the future will be what kind of light.
"According to the progress of the cultivation, perhaps ... Perhaps several decades later, Hangai appeared a super strong at the king's level. The crowd at the VIP table looked at one eye, and the mind was all a little aghast.
King of Udagama, as long as the empire of any one small family out of a fight King level of the strong, that family, regardless of its own limitations, its status will also be the ascent of Lima, when, even if the Udagama Empire of the three families, also dare not to take the posture of repression, after all, the king of the strongest, in this vast great empire, Only a handful of only a few two or three, and each one, have the sea, to an enemy million of the energy, no one has a rational empire, will easily choose to offend a king of the mighty!
More than 300 years ago, at that time, the Udagama Empire was only the king of the Strong, because the neighboring country to wage war, causing its loved ones were the pool of fish, furious, single-handedly slaughtered each other an elite million cavalry regiment, the massacre, Blood, illustrious fierce name, so that the country shook.
Since then, a vindictive empire on the mainland, few people have chosen to offend a king of the mighty! This shows that the king of the Battle of the strong, in this piece of mainland, how fierce.
Therefore, all the people in see Citis show the talent, all is Xiao House feel extremely envious.
The center of the high platform, Shan is also the black stone on the gold characters thorn eyes some sour, after a long, this just slowly spit out a sigh of relief, will be relieved to look at the field of the black shirt teenager, lightly smiled: "This life done the most right thing, I am afraid is not let inflammation son and my father created estrangement ah ..."
As Citis's father, Shan very understanding of his temper, he still can remember clearly, when he was a child, his soon born son, how indifferent to himself, the cold eyes, as if it is looking at the stranger, not his own father.
But fortunately, the same cold in the Shan from the heart of care and love, slowly melting ...
Think of the little boy and their own cold War, Shan mouth is overflow faint gentle smile.
"Xiao Patriarch, Citis small young master's cultivation talent, really let people shock, you Xiao House, this time I am afraid really want to out a great strong." "In the Shan side, a pair of beautiful eyes eyes tightly staring at the field of the black shirt teenager, rosy micro-kai, smiling way."
Shan laughed twice, the face of pride and excitement almost difficult to cover, to the royal concubine polite arch of the hand, seems to be casual sigh: "Miss ya Princess Award, this little guy's cultivation talent is always a surprise, you know, the first three years he went through what kind of blow, who do not know, that kind of misfortune, will not happen again, if again ... ... Alas
Ya Princess seductive Beautiful mou curved, charming softly smiled, Citis talent is long or short-lived, she does not know now, her only know, is now Citis, have to let her value potential, this, it is enough.
Charming eyes slightly flow, the hearts of the princess is already made up the idea, in the future, and Xiao House, a lot of contacts, try to be nice!
......
Under the podium, Shanyu a small mouth, pretty cheek some stiff, eyes shook staring at the black stone in the field, for a long time, the fullness of the chest a large fluctuation for a moment, she lowered her head, to the same face shocked Shanning thin Nu way: "You said he was the seventh paragraph?" What's the upgrade? ”
Shanning Zhang's mouth, some innocently murmured: "Last month he was indeed the seventh paragraph ... This month, he seems to have broken through again? ”
How is it possible to raise the January time from seven to eight? Even if the guy responds to his past talent, it's impossible to get any progress! "Shanyu Vertical Liu Road, five paragraphs a year of fighting Qi?" Damn little bastard, this speed is almost as comparable to that monster woman in Canaan College.
"How do I know ..." Shanning Leng's wry smile way, the eye glances toward the distant fragrance son, but is sees she is looking closely at the stage teenager, to his eye, but is does not have the slightest reaction.
"Fucking bastards! ”
The girl is so ignored, Shanning the jealousy of the flame, is no omen of the surging out, raised his head to stare at the field of Citis, gnashing of teeth of the appearance of the slightly immature little face, set off a bit fierce.                                      
 
 
41st chapter of the gas dispersion
"Two elders, finished the test?" ”
Citis looking at the golden characters on the stone tablet, slowly pumping back the palm, glanced at the spirit of some trance two elders, faint to ask the way.
"Oh, uh, it's over ..." was awakened by Citis's voice, and the two elders nodded in dismay, and from that drifting and lax gaze he was clearly still in shock.
"Alas, five paragraphs a year of fighting the gas?" The speed of this cultivation ... Terror. "After a long time, slowly back to sober, two elders looking at the complex of the juvenile, the heart inexplicably sigh a sigh of relief, the old eyes of the questioning, and finally in the face of reality, disappear clean."
On top of the Black Stone, the golden light gradually dissipates, and after a moment, it returns to the deep and cool black.
The golden light dissipated, the whole court is still a silence, obviously, the people also sank in the previous shock.
"Cough ..." the high stage, the two elders cough, finally pulled back the audience's eyes.
"The ritual retest has been completed, according to the rules of the past, Citis will accept a challenge, the right to challenge under the bucket, who will come?" "Two elder eyes in Xiao House those young generation body sweep, softly drink."
If the test of adult rituals is to test the strength of the fighting gas, the challenge, then, is to test the skills of the people to fight the cultivation and mastery of the degree, after all, once with the human life and death at war, Dou technology is also a measure of the success of the important reasons, the importance of each family to this degree, nor under the fight of the gas of cultivation.
Listen to two elders drink sound, the stage slightly riot, Xiao House young generation, are all are looking at each other, timid dare not speak, just black stone on that gold, can have their hearts only surviving the lucky dozen Guangcan Rotten Eight paragraph of the gas is fragmented.
Now they are no longer qualified to Citis.
Citis quietly standing in the center of the court, the eyes casually on the field of those of their peers swept, and every time he looked at the place, those teenagers, are hurried back a step.
"Hum, a group of cowards!" "Looking at the shrinking people around, Shanning disdain scold a sound, raised his head, provocative stare at the field of the black shirt teenager, step by step, just want to stage, a jade hand is pulled back.
Wrinkly, Shanning looked at his sister with displeasure: "How?" ”
"He is now an eight-paragraph-a-fight, and you may not be beaten up." "Shanyu sighed.
Shanning corners of the mouth, but also hesitated for a moment, the eyes of the eye is not controlled by a glance to the distance of the fumigation, but is to see the girl is gentle gaze at the field of Citis, that the delicate and touching appearance, never in front of him exposed ...
Teeth mercilessly bite, Shanning throw off the hand of Shanyu, slightly some childish little face, full of cold meaning and jealousy: "I entered eight paragraph of the gas has more than a year, can not deal with a just Jin into the rookie Mody?" ”
Looking at a face stubborn and jealousy of the Shanning, Shanyu is also some helpless, hesitated for a moment, suddenly touch a round green Dan Medicine, some do not care for a while, and then quickly stuffed into the hands of Shanning, whispered: "This is two taste dan medicine" Increase gas scattered ', can let you have a short time to have a bucket of strength, however, after eating, you one months, you have to spend the bed, if not to the last resort, it is best not to use. ”
Smell speech, Shanning immediately surprised to grasp in the hands, Xi way: "There is this thing, must give that guy a good lesson!" ”
Shanyu wrinkled Liu Mei, light way: "You don't give me a mess, casually give him some pain to eat good, if he made into a serious injury, Grandpa can not protect you, now he, can no longer be the old waste." ”
"Well, yes, I know ..." no matter nodded, Shanning twitched a smile, will look to the aromatherapy son, the heart of the way: "I will let you know that the guy is just a embroidered pillow." ”
Sneer at a sound, Shanning free Shanyu palm, climbed the platform, loudly shouted: I come! ”
Listen to someone answered, the whole audience's eyes immediately gathered in the Shanning body, this kind of attention to the feeling, let his face on the complacent, but also a point.
Looking at the Shanning, two elders wrinkly, will look to the VIP seats, is sure to see the big elders that some ugly face, helplessly sigh a breath, heart scold a way: "Couldn't see fool!" Do you still think the present Citis is a former waste? ”
Shanning did not notice the ugly face of the two elders, striding forward, proud smile: "Citis, let me try your combat strength is how strong it." ”
Lazy raised his eyes, looking at the Shanning in front of the Citis is not even talk all lazy should.
"Shanning, Challenge Citis, Citis, can you accept?" "Behold, Shanning has come to the centre of the field,
The two elders had to speak out helplessly.
"You will not accept it?" Kaoru can be watching, you will not let her down ... "touch the sleeve of the Dan Medicine, Shanning Heart self-confidence highly inflated, looked at the stage that is like a qinglian-like elegant maiden, cold smile.
"Idiot ..." heart spit two words, Citis touched the nose, in the eyes of the gaze slightly nod, faint way: "Accept." ”
See Citis nod, two elders again helpless a sigh, waved a wave, in the back, with only two people's voice Low: "Give me Remember, point!" ”
Shanning twitched.
Citis is also noncommittal shrugged.
As the two elders retreat, above the podium, the atmosphere immediately tense!                                      
 
 
The 42nd chapter you lose
Looking at the two teenagers on the high platform, the presence of all eyes, are very interesting moved over, they also very want to know, the interval three years later, again to create a miracle of the teenager, whether in the fight skills of cultivation above, also have such a frightening progress?
The VIP mat, Shan frowned on the challenge of the Shanning, face slightly some ugly, although the Citis of the gas to his surprise, but for fighting skills, he is never see the latter when to fight technology Hall to find specialized family bucket technician.
You know, the bucket technology is different from the first step of the fight of the gas cultivation, Huang low-level fighting skills, can also rely on their own groping and cultivation, there are some Huang intermediate and advanced fighting skills, but must find a family of the bucket technician specialized teaching only line, however, these years, Shan has not heard the family of a few of the bucket technician said Citis once to find them to learn fighting skills, Instead, Shanning is a regular.
According to Shan's understanding, this year, the strength in the Battle of eight Shanning, has at least mastered three kinds of yellow-grade intermediate, as well as a yellow-level advanced bucket technology, these kinds of fighting skills, enough to let him in the same ranks of the strong hard to find opponents, this competition, Citis seems to be in the wind.
"Oh, Shing long, you say, Citis Young master can win?" At the Shan side, the eyes stared closely at the field of the Princess chuckled and asked.
Shan slowly under the heart of some because of the anger of Shanning, lightly smile: "Inflammation son not too proficient in fighting skills, and recently stepped into eight paragraph of the gas situation, to set foot in this level for a full year long of Shanning, the odds is not too big." ”
"Oh, is it?" "The seductive eye slightly circulates, the elegant imperial concubine blinks the slender eyelashes, the United States MoU slightly with some lazy looked at the field to be free of the dark shirt teenager, the rosy mouth suddenly a lift, smile yingying beautiful cheek has a mature charming:" I do not know why, I Citis young Master is confident, I think he will win. " ”
Shan One Leng, it seems some surprised her where to have so big confidence, smiled and shook his head: "Then borrow Miss Princess Gillan." ”
......
Looking at the Citis standing at will, Shanning sneer at a sound, two fists slowly clenched, a touch of the gas, in the body quickly flow, bring a wave of the power of the strong feeling.
A little quiet, Shanning feet of a fierce tread on the ground, body shape straight to the close of the Citis, Rush, Shanning two palms slightly curved, ten fingers on some sharp nails suffused with some cold mans.
In the distance Citis only half meters, Shanning body suddenly live, right claw stroke a tricky curve, straight take Citis throat: "Huang middle fight skill: crack claw hit!" ”
Face calmly looking at the hand claw, Citis not impatient to lift up the palm, a little curl of the palm, fierce open, tyrannical thrust, burst out ...
In this no omen of huge thrust, Shanning face a change, the body is like a heavy hammer hit general, two feet after more than 10 steps, just some embarrassed to stop the body.
On the platform, looking at this scene, Shan face slightly surprised, side of the princess, it is smile, elegant end of the white tea before the cup, red lip micro-kai, gently sip a small mouth.
"This little guy, it's really hidden ..." The lip horn raises the charming smile, the princess's heart murmured.
"You ..... What kind of fight do you have? "Touched some chest tightness chest, Shanning face slightly changed, color Shanne stubble Hewen way."
Citis faint glanced at him, and immediately lowered his eyes to look at his palm, this "blow fire palm" although the name is harsh, can be made out of this force of force, but it really let Citis satisfaction.
Looking at the Citis of his own, Shanning a slight shake, teeth a bite, mingled with anger, again to the Citis rush.
Horizontally out of the palm did not gather, Citis micro-squint eyes, looking at the more and more near the Shanning, the corners of the mouth slowly pull up a cold arc.
Spread out the right hand, suddenly a grip, a ferocious suction, from the palm of the heart to shoot out: "The Xuan-step bucket skills: suction palm!" ”
See Citis shook hands again, Shanning both feet subconsciously grasp the ground, but not wait until the thrust of the arrival, a suction, it is the pull of a fierce before a toss.
The body in mid-air row an arc, straight to the mouth with a touch of inexplicable smile Citis.
Although be pulled up by suction body shape, but when Shanning look at the distance oneself more and more near Citis, but is unbearable smile, senran a laugh, fighting the gas quickly in the fist cohesion.
"Iron Mountain Fist!" "A burst of drink, Shanning fist clenched, a sharp burst of wind and gas, in mid-air low, and immediately to the Citis shoulder fell, see this posture, if hit, I am afraid Citis arm, must be hit, it seems, this guy from the beginning without the intention to leave.
Iron Mountain Boxing, Huang advanced bucket technology, powerful, the need to fight the gas more than seven paragraphs before the qualification practice.
Micro-squint to feel the sharp gas, Citis slowly spit out a breath, the body of the qi of the operation of the line, abrupt change: "Hyun-step bucket technology: Blow fire Palm!" ”
With the heart of the drink fell, crazy thrust, once again from the Citis palm of the heart jet out.
Bang "The air slightly microwave swing, an invisible thrust, mercilessly hit in the Shanning body, two strands of reverse force of the attack, immediately let its face a pale."
Cindy Managed ”
Two strands of reverse force, finally or thrust accounted for on the point, in a stalemate, Shanning directly by the thrust of the ground, and finally on the floor of more than 10 meters, just slowly stop the body, and at the same time, a blood, is also a miserable gush out.
Looking at the distant ground soft paralysis of the Shanning, and then glanced at a slightly quiet scene, Citis Palms slowly moved down, a faint breath: "You lost ..."                                         
 
 
43rd Chapter The Citis of the tyrannical
Looking at the Shanning in the field, after a little silence, the rapid riots, previously not completely dissipated the shock, but also from the heart slowly churning.
Xiao House's young generation, are stunned to look at the vomiting of blood and soft to the Shanning, as peers, they naturally very clear Shanning of the fighting force, in the Xiao House young generation, in addition to the ability to pressure one of the other, can be said to have opponents, but now, but only in the two with Citis, they were beaten to the beat, This sudden change, simply let everyone a little unprepared.
Under the stage, looking at the swift defeat of the Shanning, Shanyu a pretty cheek, is also full of unbelievable, slightly open rosy small mouth, declaring its inner shock.
After a long time, slowly back to God, Shanyu slender white neck of the rosy color, softly murmured: "This little bastard, how to become so strong?" Does he still have free time to practise fighting skills when he is fighting? ”
......
"Oh, Citis small young master not only fighting the gas of the tyrannical, and even fighting skills, but also mastered so well, presumably Xiao Patriarch cost a lot of heart?" "On the VIP mat, although the early psychological preparation, can ya Imperial concubine is still Citis by means of the earthquake, a little silence, the seductive beauty of the eyes flashing point of the light, to the side of the Shan smiling way."
Want to learn advanced fighting skills, there must be someone to teach some skills, the know-how, it seems, the princess is to Shan as to Citis opens person.
Smell words, Shan, wry smile shook his head, don't say he did not teach Santido skills, is he want to teach, also can not teach Citis formerly used out of the kind of singular bucket technology, to his family in the knowledge of fighting skills, seems to have heard of this fighting skills.
Since never seen, then there is only one reason: Citis use of the fighting skills, is not Xiao house all!
"Not Xiao House, where did you learn it?" "There are some doubts, Shan will look at the family's top direction moved, but see they are looking at some strange vision projection."
Looking at their eyes, Shan one Leng, immediately startled, originally they also thought is oneself give phlogistic son open special treatment not?
Helplessly twitched, Shan also too lazy to explain, again will look to the black shirt teenager in the field, the heart murmured: "This little fellow, there are quite a lot of secrets." ”
......
field, looking at the Shanning, from shock from the reply to the two elders reluctantly shook his head, eyes complex look at Citis.
Juvenile turn from praise, slightly handsome young face, only a calm, and no victory after the proud and crazy.
Sigh a sigh of relief, the two elders hold up the dry palm, just want to shout out a contest, its face, but is suddenly a change.
In the distance, soft fell in the ground of the Shanning, suddenly like a creeping cheetah general bouncing up the body, the original light of the fight of the gas, suddenly in the moment, the foot of the plank in the top of a hard tread, body burst out, foot, sawdust.
Eyes some Senran stare at that more and more near Citis, Shanning mouth of blood, will that face rendering a bit ferocious: "Little bastard, go to die!" ”
"Shanning, stop it!" ”
Sudden change let two elders a Leng, immediately a burst of drink, but at this time by anger and jealousy filled with the mind of the Shanning is deaf, while under the "increase the gas dispersed" of the drug, gnashing of teeth against the Citis attack.
The sudden change in the field, is also frightened up the full of commotion, VIP seats on the Shan and other people, is the face of fierce change, they can clearly feel, at the moment Shanning, already have the strength of the bucket!
"He took the" aerated powder "! "The well-informed princess is looking at the strength of sudden rise of the Shanning, the face slightly changed, sinking channel."
Bastard "Smell speech, Shan face is more gloomy, a punch in front of the table, spider web-like cracks immediately rolling out, turned his head, and looked at the face of the same changes in the big elders: old things, my son will have something, your grandson, loss of life is not enough! ”
Now the Citis has the potential, far from a Shanning can compare, if really in a contest, because Shanning violated by irreparable serious injury, that even if Shanning backstage is Big elder, family can not easily let him off.
Be Shan like evil Wolf General stare, big elders dry skin is also slightly jitter, mouth slightly some bitterness, if Citis or former Citis, that serious injury also seriously injured, but now ... Even if the family is to give up his elders, it is impossible to this future will be the king of the little guy to give up!
In the field, the two elders of the drink did not play a role in close proximity, let Shanning quickly jumped to the Citis side, double boxing in the gas of the rapid condensation, hunting shouted: "Iron Mountain Boxing!" ”
The strength of the crazy rise, let this iron Mountain boxing, unexpectedly brought a strong pressure of pressure.
Wind blowing Citis forehead hair, revealing a pair of cold black eyes.
In the face of the Shanning, Citis unexpectedly did not back off, the right fist clenched, the body slightly curved, as if a ready to send the wrath of the lion general, quiet moment, the bodies like an arrow, stormed out.
Looking at unexpectedly choose and at this time of Shanning head-on Citis, two elders not from the air stamped stomp: "Idiot!" ”
"Octupole! ”
Heart sounded a dull low drink, Citis Fist, in the two elders that some frightened eyes, mercilessly and Shanning to touch together.
Bang "Two fists, in mid-air meet, a little quiet, Shanning ferocious face suddenly pale, blood constantly overflow from the corners of the mouth."
Pale face, arm a fierce shake, the sleeves seem to be at the moment issued a crackling sound, fist forward to send, Shanning body, like a wind in a leaf in general, in countless ways horrified eyes, directly smashed off the platform.
Looking at this scene, the two elders on the stage, eye pupil suddenly shrink, can not help long suck a mouthful of breath, not far from the black shirt juvenile figure, seems to be at this moment, become mysterious up.                                         
 
 
The 44th chapter accompanies you to try
Looking at that smashed into the crowd is unknown Shanning, full of silence again.
A moment later, both looked like monsters in general eyes, to the high stage of the black shirt teenager, although many people do not know what happened in the past, but Shanning suddenly the strength of the explosion, but is the fact that everyone saw it, however, to everyone's surprise, in the strength of the boom, Shanning was defeated than before more tragic and simply , one punch, serious injury!
On the VIP mat, looking at the changes in the field, a white slender jade hand slowly cover the seductive red lip, plump chest slightly undulating, rowed a soul-stirring radian.
"Strong horizontal fighting skills ... What level is this? The Hyun-terrace? How can it be? "Take a sip of the coolness," said the heart of the princess shocked, she can be very clear, the level of the fighting skills are rare and difficult to repair.
In the shock of a long time, the princess's mind is finally slowly back to sober, once again recalled the former Citis used by the tyrannical fighting skills, Dai eyebrow slightly A wrinkle, the heart thought fly to turn: if I remember not bad, Xiao House the most advanced bucket technique, should be a kind of with the Xuan order method "Nu Lion Crazy Gang" Match of the low level of low-level bucket skill: "Shi Shan fissure" , huh? ”
"Can be previously used in the bucket technology Shaw, is obviously not" Shi Shan fissure "..." The slender eyelashes slightly winked, the Princess of the Cup with the jade hand suddenly a tight, heart whispered: "Is not ... This skill is not Shan to him? ”
Lazy squint of the beauty of the eyes swept a wipe naked, the princess is not traces of the micro-overdo, but is just sweeping see the Shan face on the veiled shock.
"Sure enough, it's not Shan ..." the plump breast gently down, the princess Slender Jade Onion refers to in the cup after tangled together, recalls the Citis to those skill degree of dou skill, the heart not by the fierce one move: "This little guy behind ..." There should be a mystery teacher, right? Otherwise, the Xuan-level of the fighting skills, is not light on him a teenager blind groping can be such a consummate. ”
"Can teach the skill of the Xuan, the mysterious person's strength, I am afraid at least is a fighting spirit strong!" Maybe, even more! "Beautiful cheek on a touch of dignified, elegant princess put down the cup, the United States MoU with Xu some inexplicable meaning, slowly looked at the field of the handsome boy:" This small thing ... Seems to be more and more mysterious, it is really unbearable to some curious. ”
......
"Alas ... Inflammation son this little fellow, really more and more let a person see not thoroughly. "In the heart of the princess turned the idea of the Shan, side of the heart is also unbearable sigh, xiao inflammation used by the bucket technology, even if it is he, also can not help in the heart to drink a color, so crisp bucket technology, light from the angle of attack, is simply comparable to the family in the black-step fighting skills:" Shi Shan fissure "!
Slowly shook his head, Shan breathed a sigh of relief, eye pupil in the naked flashing: "Inflammation son behind, I am afraid someone is teaching him." ”
"Who taught it?" "Touched the face, Shan suddenly involuntarily will gaze to distant stage under the fumigation, at this time, girl beautiful cheeks, is holding a faint smile looked at the field of the youth."
"Could it be her?" "The heart puzzled to turn around, think of the Citis, the intimacy, Shan heart this just slightly relieved."
......
On the high stage, Citis slowly spit out a turbid gas, like a rock-like hard arms quietly back to normal, the slightly puffed up sleeves, is also soft down.
Twisted his head, Citis looked at the stage of the Shanning in a hurry to embrace the coma Shanyu, the face indifferent, the heart has not therefore has the slightest compassion, if is not own two kind of the metaphysical battle technique to protect the body, perhaps just Shanning that fist, can smash own right hand to break, since others do not own mercy, There's no reason for me to be such an idiot.
Slowly take back the fist, Citis on the side of the stunned two elders faint way: "The contest is over?" ”
Swallow a mouthful of saliva, reply sober two elders hurriedly nod, just want to shout out the result of a contest, a sound of anger, but is interrupted.
"Wait!" cried the man. "Under the Shanyu, looking at that covered with blood, naively of the Shanning, Shell angry bite red lip, hate to shout."
Two elders wrinkly, Shen shouted: "Shanyu, what do you want to do?" ”
Shanyu carefully will coma Shanning to the back of a tribe, vigorous jump onstage, hate stare at Citis, Nu way: "Shanning How to say you are cousin, how do you do so vicious?" ”
Looking like a pair of crawl look like a Shanyu, Citis laughed a sound, eccentric head cold smile: "But a no significance of the challenge, but he was illegal take Dan Medicine, previously his attack posture, you think he was lenient to me?" If I do not fight back, now lie down, is me, and then, you will because of me, and so 怒叱 him? He Shanning is a person, I Citis is not a person? What else can you do besides unruly Shanyu? ”
Be Citis This series like the reprimand of firecrackers, Shanyu heart a lag, rosy pretty cheeks white and red, with her pride, when a person younger than himself in public such lessons, deep breath, pressure gushing anger, cold way: "I do not care how you quibble, I only know you hurt my brother, now I challenge you, If you have the skills, then the next! ”
"Shanyu, go down, here you do!" The rules of a contest are under the bucket, you do not have the authority! Aside, the two elders shouted angrily.
Shanyu stubborn bite lip, hate stare at Citis, Cold way: "You dare not accept?" ”
"This idiot woman. ”
The heart of the gnashing of teeth, the previous fight with Shanning, Citis has consumed a lot of the gas, now let him and strength for the bucket of Samsung Shanyu battle, obviously very unfavorable.
"You wouldn't dare to take a woman's challenge, would you?" "Looking at the eyes some cold Citis, Shanyu is heart big Chang, cold smile."
Touched the nose, Citis mouth slightly twitching, dark eye pupil, suddenly glitter barb.
Citis ready to spell the life of this long leg woman fight, the maiden like a silver bell-like laughter, but quietly floated on the high platform.
"Shang elder sister, Citis brother now already exhausted, you challenge him at this time, but some indulge, Shang elder sister if really want to challenge, why do you have to try with the fumigation son, feasible?" ”                                      
 
 
45th Chapter Curtain
In the eyes of the young girl, the jump on the high platform, Waltz fell in the Citis side, eyes slowly flow, beautiful cheeks, smile.
Looking at oneself jumped up of the Citis, a Leng, immediately helplessly turned over the supercilious look: "You run up to do?" ”
Smoked son to sip a small mouth shallow smile, did not answer, turn the eyes to because of her appearance and face slightly change of Shanyu, Smile Way: Shang elder sister, you older than Citis elder brother some, and also entered the college to practice, this kind of challenge, is some to be inconsiderate, if Shang elder sister really want to find personal vent, or let the breath son accompany you. ”
Smell speech, Shing face slightly shen, wrinkled Liu Mei, mercilessly Citis, cold smile: "You will only hide behind the woman?" ”
Citis Eyebrow Tip Micro-pick, in the eyes of glitter Flash, now he, there is a kind of put the woman on the ground raped the impulse.
"Well!" said the man. "When the three men were entangled, not far from the two elders, a gloomy voice thundered, the three people were shocked to shut the mouth."
Gloomy old face, two elders angrily came, to the Shanyu Nu shouted: "Now on the stage, you do not have the right to challenge, immediately go back, if the destruction of the ceremony held, directly closed one months closed!" ”
After a rage against Shanyu, two elders this just relieved a sigh of relief, turn over, helplessly looking at the micro-hung head, the finger is playing with a wisp of hair of the incense son, wry smile way: "Miss Kaoru, you also go down, your challenge, are not the rules." ”
Smoked son don't shrug shrug, slightly point delicate chin, turn to step down, still to Citis quietly disguised as a grimace, let the latter laugh and cry.
By two elders a pass Nu scold, Shing face slightly some grievances, teeth bite red lip, a moment later, just hate the stamp of foot, turned away, leaving a sneer: "Little bastard, you wait for me!" ”
Looking at the funny scene that finally ended, two elders finally relieved, side head looked at that is an innocent face of the party, a wry smile, immediately plate up the old head, to the stage coldly drink: "Shanning a contest to take Dan Medicine, starting today, shut three months of confinement!" After saying that, also regardless of the stage under the slight riot, again shouted: "The challenge is complete, Citis wins!" ”
For this dispensable outcome, Citis is not noncommittal, after hearing announced the completion of adult ceremony, directly under the podium.
In the audience's attention back to their position, looking at the people around those awe-eyed, Citis touched the nose, a faint smile in the heart.
......
At the end of the Citis ceremony, there was also a growing number of people on the field, but in the shadow of the shock that he had created, the achievements of other tribes were somewhat dim.
Finally, the appearance of smoked son, but caused a big shock, 15-year-old Dou, this kind of performance, but only than the Citis on a little bit, but although the results are very impressive, but the presence of a lot of people have heard Xiao House the most brilliant pearl of the name, so, although for this kind of achievements are amazed, But it is much smaller than the shock of Citis.
The adult ceremony from the early morning to the afternoon, is finally in the full of Marvel sound, slowly ending, in the end of the time, a pair of eyes, still some could not help but with Xu some shock to the small face indifferent black shirt teenager.
Looking at the end of the adult ceremony, Citis Heart is also a sigh of relief, around those eyes, it is really let him a little unbearable, shook his head, get up and go.
"Citis Brother's performance today, is really surprising ah." "There was a Shanfeng, and the laughter of lavender and brisk, like a silver bell."
Touched the nose, Citis smiled.
"I originally thought Citis brother will not fight skills, but did not think, but so hidden." "Sliding negative behind, lavender small head, if there is a deep meaning smile way."
"Hey, which has the fragrance is not hidden, the last time in the fight technology Hall you used the bucket skills, is not a common thing ah." Citis corner of the mouth, the way to the fumigation.
Smell speech, smoked son yizheng, autumn eyes bent into a beautiful crescent, smiles way: "Citis brother eyesight really good, if you are interested in those fighting skills, can teach you ah ..."
Shrugged, Citis shook his head, way: "Forget, can chew, this superficial truth, I still understand." ”
"That ... What about the fight Qigong method? "Citis refused to let a slight some accidents, black smart eyes playful turn, suddenly smile."
Step slightly a meal, Citis narrow eyes, vague way: "After 5th, not to go into the Grudge court to find work Law mody ..."
"The family's work law, the top is the point is Uncle Shaw's cultivation of the intermediate level of anger lions, and that Gong FA, now Citis brother, but no authority to cultivate oh." "锊 small hand before the forehead of a wisp of hair, micro-sip small mouth, seems to be in the discretion of words, a moment later, she just softly way:" Smoked son can give Citis elder brother to get advanced method Oh, you ... Either? ”
"This girl ... Really a little rich woman, the advanced ... That thing, at least hundreds of thousands of better. "Heart sighed, Citis suddenly some wry smile, if they are not lucky to encounter medicine old, I am afraid and the distance between the child, it is really difficult to close, even if their talent is not bad, but the mysterious background of fumigation, but absolutely extremely large."
Fingers without traces of the touch of the ancient ring, Citis slightly peace of hand, this is the real cost of their own ah ...
In the eyes of the Citis, the light chuckle smiled, slightly shook his head, gently voice with a touch of stubborn and persistent: "No, your brother can rely on their own to become the strong." ”
Smoked son footsteps live, blinking smart eyes stare at Citis that no stagnant figure, a moment later, suddenly smiled: "It seems ... Behind Citis brother, there seems to be really a mysterious person, um ... Do you need to check? ”
Fiber refers to some distressed play the smooth forehead, after a long while, smoked son helpless shook his head: "Forget, Citis Brother most hate others to probe his bottom, that mysterious people since taught him so many things, presumably should not harm him." ”
Sigh a sigh of relief, smoked yang son up small face, the eyes of eyes, the light of the Golden Flame gently beat: "I hope that the person does not mean it, otherwise ..." If you hide in Citis brother's body, I will also find you out ...                                    
 
 
46th Chapter Citis of Rage
After the adult ceremony, Citis's life, finally can be appropriate to relax some rhythm, weekdays are full of the cultivation schedule, but also more than half of the idle.
The last purchase of medicinal herbs refining out of the construction of the liquid has been depleted, but Citis is not ready to buy, now he has set foot in the eighth paragraph of the gas, at this time, the construction of the effect of the liquid, is very small.
In the effect of the construction of the spirit liquid after weakening, the drug old also did not use other Dan medicine to help Citis enhance the strength, but let him in this time to try to relax some mood, the road of cultivation, Yichi is the right way, the cultivation of life, sometimes instead will mistakenly into the wrong path.
In such a relaxed and comfortable days, accustomed to the former compact life of the Citis is a little bit itchy bones, helpless, had to accompany every day with the smoked son wandering around, occasionally also to the back mountain to cultivate a bucket of skills.
Now Citis, no doubt has become the focus of the family again, no matter where they go, the awe of the eyes, always follow, a respectful salutation, also let Citis heart some 嘘唏 the gap between before and after.
......
Boom ”
Green and Lush in the back of the small forest, like a monkey like the vigorous stature of the rapid flash, extremely agile to avoid all the obstacles in the forest, and finally in a muffled sound, a contain just arrayed gas fist, mercilessly smashed in a full two or three cm thick trunk, immediately, cracks rolling out, bang a sound, middle and broken.
Agile to avoid falling down the tree trunk, Santinia to bluestone above the right palm against the trunk of the clothes a wave, a suction will be pulled into the palm of the heart.
Wiping the sweat on his forehead, Citis a sigh of relief, slowly will wear clothes on.
In a soso sound in a while dressed, Citis eyebrows suddenly a wrinkle, micro squint eyes, look to the woods, low low sneer at a sound.
Take off a few pieces of dead leaves, Citis mouth with a sneer, lazy to the outside of the woods.
Out of the woods, warm sunshine on the body, so that people all over the bones some hair crisp, micro-squint to adjust to the sun, Citis micro-biased head, looking at the distance of a huge stone on the woman figure.
The sun shines on the slender woman's body, the transmission of attractive curves, a pair of sexy slender legs, it seems particularly sultry.
coldly looking at the Shanyu on the boulder, Citis hands holding the back of the head, slowly to the boulder, looked up at the face of the cold woman, look particularly in that pair of sexy long legs stay for a while, smoking a nose, light tunnel: "The legs are very beautiful, do not dazzle the ..."
Just a short word, cold Shanyu, suddenly Qiao face livid.
The fullness of the chest slightly undulating, Shanyu bite a silver teeth, cold way: "Know what I come to you to do?" ”
"Punch me?" Citis The palm of his hand and touched his nose, and asked casually.
"You that punch, will my brother seriously injured, now he still lying in bed can't move, since you do so ruthless, I was his sister, naturally can not let him beaten in vain." Yu Yumi mou glared at Citis, hate authentic.
The corners of the mouth provoke a touch of mockery, Citis, "then you mean, in that case, I still have to stand there, let him that punch my arm broken?" ”
Shanyu SIP Red Lip, the United States still stubborn anger stare Citis, the eyes of hate still not reduce.
"And when he broke my arm, you may be in your heart for me this unfortunate person a few minutes of silence, and then no guilt of the heart, also do not care if I will be crippled after the rest of my life, hehe, or last sentence, you Shanyu in addition to have no rational partiality, what else can do? The most fucking hate you women, your brother is a person, Lao Tze is not a person? ! " The more said the more angry, to later, small face slightly red Citis is a direct explosion of foul language.
"Damn, the chest is not brain is used to say that you such an idiot woman." ”
"Citis, you little bastard, shut up!" ”
Qiao face a burst of green a white, Shanyu finally is in Citis the last sentence scold sound in screaming out.
Looking at the Qiao face livid, eyes Shanyu, Chatilen smiled and smacked his lips, the heart of a great feeling.
Take a deep breath, slowly calm down in the heart of anger, Shanyu sexy long legs leap, jump directly under the boulder, bite the Silver teeth way: "Anyway, today will not easily let you this little bastard." "Finish, the left foot before a tread, graceful Jiao's body rowed up a tempting curve, sexy right leg, unexpectedly with Xu some of the sound of broken wind, mercilessly to the Citis between the legs kick."
See this woman incredibly direct hands, Citis is also a brawl, hurried back a few steps, risk to avoid the blast with the long legs.
"Well, how talented you are, but only the eighth paragraph of the gas, today is not good to teach you, you really want to arrogant heaven." "Looking at the constant evasion of the Citis, Kang Yulen smile, slender legs as if the wind and rain generally, in the violent kicking and throwing between, with a wave of play, scraping the ground dead leaves."
Three stars of the strength, indeed is far from Shaw rather than, in such a fierce offense, Citis unexpectedly short time difficult to have offensive spare, had to take evasive.
Some embarrassed to hide Shanyu aggressive legs offensive, Citis small face is extremely calm, eyes narrow, sharp eyes, constantly looking for each other's flaws.
Again with the arm block a Shanyu of the split leg, Citis arm slightly some hair pain, it seems that Shanyu is not a real idiot, at least she did not use the full force to deal with Citis, now offensive although seemingly fierce, but at most let him eat some flesh of pain.
Looking at the body of the Citis, Shanyu red lip lifted a touch of pride, toe point, again fierce rubbing attack.
Attack again, Shing face is suddenly a change, before always take evasive Citis as if suddenly from docile sheep into desperately evil wolf general, double Palm curl, the fierce suction will foothold unstable Shanyu shape pull slightly toward the front.
The body has just leaned forward, Shanyu in the body of the vindictive is rapidly condensed in the foot of the palm, is to close the ground, the suction, but is a fierce abrupt disappearance, replaced, is a ferocious push force ...
A suction between a push, Shanyu's body finally is lost balance, staggered back a few steps, unexpectedly is a butt sit down on the ground.
Was Citis this sudden eruption overturned body, Shanyu seems extremely stunned, incredibly forget Lima get up, wait for her reaction came, a figure is like evil tiger flutter general, from the air and down, will be crushed under the body.
"Damn it, young master is going to rape you today!" ”
Some bruises on the face, all over the injury let Citis suck a breath of chills, both hands to hold Shang Yuhao wrist Mengmen, gnashing teeth authentic.                                         
 
 
47th Chapter Blasphemy
Listen to the young anger of the low roar, Shanyu Yizheng, immediately Qiao face is full of shame and anger, death of the struggle, but was suddenly the strength of the Citis tightly hold the wrist Mengmen, a trace of vaporizing feeling, let her body some make no effort.
Once again struggled for a moment no fruit, Shanyu also had to stop useless move, eyes glaring Citis, plump chest slightly undulating, shame scold a curse: "Little bastard, go away!" ”
Citis cracked the mouth, the face of the bruises to bring a wave of pain, a few breath of cold, bowed his head coldly smile: let you? The young master was beaten in vain? The young master said to rape you! ”
By a small number of years old in the body, and repeatedly said to rape himself, Shanyu in shame and anger, but also some laugh and cry, she would not believe this guy really dare to do that thing.
Wrist twisted twist, no movement, helpless Shanyu had to squint him, can not help the cold hum way : " little bastard do not learn, and so you develop completely, and people say such words." "
Questioned the ability of a man, Citis eyebrow suddenly a pick, bow down malicious way: "You try?" ”
Be Citis eyes stare at the heart of some creepy, Shanyu swallow a mouthful of saliva, but arrogant she, still stubborn raise white chin, cold smile: "As long as you dare to try, I dare to you that thing to cut!" ”
The mouth of a smoke, for this dead also not to give up the woman, Citis is also some helpless, say really, although he to this woman some anger, can still far not reach to rape of that kind of horror, no matter how said, she is the name of her cousin.
However, even if this, but their own this fight, can not be in vain?
Eyes slightly narrowed, Citis chuckle, suddenly fierce leaned down body, mercilessly pressure on Shanyu body, two bodies of the fit, directly lead to Citis chest was two regiment soft delicate.
Was Citis this sudden action shock Leng in the past, Shanyu small mouth slightly open, it seems to have not from the shock of their own has been blasphemy back to God.
Citis ignored suddenly quiet Shanyu, the left hand quickly grabbed her two hands, the right hand fierce under the probe, in that pair of sexy slender legs above, mercilessly touched a few, a few years ago he knew that this woman on their legs almost have a deformity of narcissism, although this pair of legs, it really makes each man's heart ...
Was Citis hands in his legs a burst of touch, Shanyu body suddenly stiff, a moment later, a scream, fierce from Shanyu slightly open small mouth shouted out.
The eardrum was shocked some numbness, Citis after touching like a monkey general bounce up shape, and then fly general to the foot of the mountain, he knew, this woman is probably going mad again.
The scream lasted a long time, this just slowly stopped, Shing face at this moment full of anger blush, the United States eyes with anger, staring at the foot of the mountain looming, the sharp teeth of the shrill: "Citis, Little bastard, I will cut you to pieces!" ”
The distant figure ignored the scream from the mountain and disappeared into the field of vision after a slight turn.
"Bastards, bastards, bastards!" ”
Looking at the disappearing Citis, Shing face livid, a pair of Jade fist mercilessly hit the Earth on the side.
Vent for a long while later, Shanyu finally slowly calmed the mood, Qiao face blush red look at his legs that some of the fuzzy hand-paw printing, in the handprint, it seems that still remains a share of vaporizing feeling, let people not gung-hung.
Bite a silver teeth, Shanyu all over some weak propped up body, looking at their messy clothes, suddenly some want to cry no tears, this time not only didn't teach that guy, but also missed by he accounted for a big bargain, this outcome, let Shanyu is unwilling.
Think of the previous Citis presumptuous move, Shanyu although the heart and shame and anger, but did not like a few years ago as dragging the sword full family kill Citis.
Now she is also an adult, and naturally will not be like that, make full family all know oneself by that guy touched thigh, Qiao face yin clear indefinite stand in the same place thought for a good while, Shanyu this just hate and hate stamped stomp, whispered scold: "Little bastard, don't let me catch the chance, otherwise must you look good!" ”
Smoked a very upturned jade nose, Shanyu 锊 good to disperse the black hair, and then cut the messy clothes, some dejected to the foot of the mountain slow walk.
......
Escape the mountain after the Citis, is also a bit disturbed, hiding at the foot of the mountain to see the Shing face livid after leaving, this just a little relieved.
Helpless to touch the nose, Citis's right hand unconsciously rub each other rubbing, muttered: "than a few years ago, touch more comfortable ..."
"Alas, and this idiot woman to meet always unbearable temper, it seems that childhood grudges against her, is really not the general deep." Twisted the neck, Citis a wry smile, a deep breath, pressure down the mind of some thoughts, again to restore the past insipid, slowly line out.
Line out of the hiding place, Citis footsteps suddenly a meal, some smiled guiltily turned his head, looking at the distance that leaning on the trunk of Tsing Yi Girl, embarrassed smile: "Smoked son, what are you doing here?" ”
The distance of the smoked son, lazy leaning on the trunk, small waist of a bunch of purple unofficially engaged with the wind drift, eyes swept Citis, like a Smile smile way: "Citis brother, just I saw Shang elder sister angrily walk past, you have to offend her?" ”
Smiled guiltily to touch the nose, Citis came forward, dry smile: "Who knows she again hair what crazy ..."
Looking at the smile of the Citis, smoked some helpless shook his head: "Citis brother as long as one and she entangled together, will always have a head fever dry some people dumbfounded." ”
Listen to this if some point, Citis some guilty, innocently shrugged, said: "You know, I was forced." ”
noncommittal chuckle smiled, smoked children sip small mouth, small hands negative behind, girl lithe posture, quite moving.
"Tomorrow is the day to go into the vindictive court to find the FA, Citis brother is ready to go." The maiden went away, echoes wreathed.                                       

